
Mi 



H 'Hi 



m&im^Sm^ 



»»»»»»» » »» 



1,. 




' V, 









r rn 



ililill 



iiilliiiililllililiiili 



3 9153 00062725 9 



o 



Ethics and the 

Materialist Conception 

of History 



By KARL KAUTSKY 
Translated by JOHN B. ASKEW 



THIRD EDITION: REVISED 



CHICAGO 

CHARLES H. KERR & COMPANY 

1909 






J»NN r. HIGGINS, PRINTER AND BINOCB 

a79*2e6 C. MONROE STRICT 

CHICAGO. U. S. A. 



PREFACE 

Like so many other Marxist publications the 
present one owes its origin to a special occasion, 
it arose out of a controversy. The polemic in 
which I was involved last Autumn with the edi- 
tors of Vorwarts brought me to touch on the 
question of their " ethical tendencies." What I 
said, however, on this point was so often mis- 
understood by one side, and on the other brought 
me so many requests to give a more thorough 
and systematic exposition of my ideas on Ethics, 
that I felt constrained to attempt at least to give 
a short sketch of the development of Ethics on 
the basis of the materialist conception of history. 
I take as my starting point, consequently, that 
materialist philosophy which was founded on 
one side by Marx and Engels, on the other, 
though in the same spirit, by Joseph Dietzgen. 
For the results at which I have arrived I alone 
am responsible. 

My original intention only got so far as to 
write an article for the " Neue Zeit " on the sub- 
ject. But never had I so miscalculated over the 
plan of a work as this time ; and not only in re- 
3 



4 PREFACE 

spect of its scope. I had begun the work in 
October, because I thought there were now go- 
ing to be a few months of quiet for the party, 
which might be devoted to theoretical work. The 
Jena Congress had run so harmoniously that 
I did not expect to see a conflict in our own 
party so soon. On the other hand it looked at 
the beginning of October as if there had come 
in the Russian revolution a pause for gathering 
together and organizing the revolutionary forces. 
As is well known, however, everything turned 
out quite differently. An unimportant personal 
question was the occasion of a sharp discussion, 
which indeed did not for a moment disturb the 
party, but all the same cost the party officials 
and especially those in Berlin, a considerable 
amount of time, worry and energy. What, how- 
ever, certainly demanded even more time and en- 
ergy was the Russian revolution, which unex- 
pectedly in the course of that very October re- 
ceived a powerful impetus and regained its pre- 
vious height. That glorious movement naturally 
absorbed even out of Russia all the interest of 
revolutionary thinking people. It was a mag- 
nificent time, but it was not the most suitable 
moment to write a book on ethics. However, 
the subject had captivated me and I could not 
free myself, and so I concluded my work despite 
the many distractions and interruptions, which 



PREFACE 5 

the Berlin storm in a teacup, and the hurricane 
in the Russian ocean brought with them. It is 
to be hoped that the little work does not bear too 
obviously on its face the marks of its stormy 
birth. When, however, I had brought it to a 
conclusion another question arose. Far beyond 
the limits of an article had it grown, and yet 
was hardly fitted for a book. It contents itself 
with giving a general idea of my thought, and 
gives very few references to facts and arguments 
to prove or illustrate what has been brought for- 
ward. 

I asked myself whether I ought not to recon- 
struct and enlarge my work by the addition of 
such arguments and facts. If, however, that had 
to be done it would mean delaying the publica- 
tion of the book for an indefinite period ; because 
to carry out this work would require two years' 
quiet undisturbed labor. We are, however, com- 
ing to a time when for every Social Democrat 
quiet and undisturbed work will be impossible, 
where our work will be continual fighting. 
Neither did I desire that the publication should 
be put off for too long a time in face of the 
influence which has been won in our ranks by 
the ethics of Kant, and I consequently hold it 
necessary to show the relations which exist be- 
tween the materialist conception of history and 
Ethics. 



PREFACE 

Consequently I have resolved to allow the 
little book to appear. However, to show that 
with this not all is said which I might have said 
on Ethics, and that I hold myself in reserve to 
deal with the subject more fully in a period of 
greater calm, I call the present work simply an at- 
tempt — an Essay. Certainly when these quieter 
times will come is not to be seen at present, as 

1 have already remarked. At this very time the 
myrmidons of the Czar are zealously at work to 
rival the deeds of the Alvas and Tillys during 
the religious struggles of the sixteenth and seven- 
teenth centuries — not in military achievements, 
but in brutal destruction. The west European 
champions of culture and order greet that with 
enthusiasm as the restoration of legal conditions. 
But just as little as the hirelings of the Haps- 
burgs succeeded, despite temporary successes, in 
conquering North Germany and Holland for 
Catholicism will the Cossacks of the Romanoffs 
succeed in restoring the rule of absolutism. 
This has sufficient strength remaining to lay 
its country waste, not to rule it. In any case 
the Russian Revolution is not by a long way at 
an end — it cannot close so long as the peasants 
are not appeased. The longer it lasts, so much 
the greater will be the disturbances in the rank 
of the west European proletariat, so much the 
n-earer financial catastrophes, so much the more 



PREFACE 7 

probable that even in west Europe there should 
set in a period of sharp class struggles. 

That is no time which calls for the theoretical 
labors of revolutionary writers. But this draw- 
back for our theoretical labors, which will prob- 
ably be felt in the next few years, we need not 
lament. The materialist conception of history 
is not only important because it allows us to 
explain history better than has been done up to 
now, but also because it enables us to make 
history better than has been hitherto done. And 
the latter is more important than the former. 
From the progress of the practice our theoretical 
knowledge grows and in the progress of the 
practice our theoretical progress is proved. No 
world-conception has been in so high a degree a 
philosophy of deeds as the dialectical materialism. 
Not only upon research but upon deeds do we 
rely to show the superiority of our philosophy. 

Even the book before us has not to serve 
for contemplative knowledge, but for the fight, 
a fight in which we have to develop the highest 
ethical strength as well as the greatest clearness 
of knowledge if we are to win. 

Karl Kautsky. 

Berlin-Friedenan, January, ipo6. 



TABLE OF CONTENTS 

CHAPTER PAGE 

I. Ancient and Christian Ethics . . . ii 

II. The Ethical Systems of the Period of 

THE Enlightenment 26 

III. The Ethics of Kant: 

1 The Criticism of Knowledge ... 35 

2 The Moral Law 46 

3 Freedom and Necessity 59 

4 The Philosophy of Reconciliation . . 65 

iV. The Ethics of Darwinism: 

1 The Struggle for Existence ... 70 

2 Self-Movement and Intelligence , . ^(^ 

3 The Motives of Self-Maintenance and 

Propagation 84 

4 The Social Instinct 89 

V. The Ethics of Marxism : 

1 The Roots of the Materialist Concep- 

tion of History 105 

2 The Organization of the Human Society : 

a The Technical Development . . no 

h Technic and Method of Life . 123 

c Animal and Social Organization 129 

3 The Changes in the Strength of the 

Social Instincts: 

a Language 134 

h War and Property 144 

9 



lO TABLE OF CONTENTS 

CHAPTER PAGE 

4 The Influence of the Social Instincts: 

a Internationalism 155 

b The Class Division 161 

5 The Tenets of Morality: 

a Custom and Convention . . . 174 
b The System of Production and 

Its Superstructure 184 

c Old and New 190 

d The Moral Ideal 194 



ETHICS AND THE MATERIAL^ 
1ST CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 

CHAPTER I 
Ancient and Christian Ethics 

In the history of Philosophy the question of 
Ethics comes to the fore soon after the Persian 
wars. The repulsion of the gigantic Persian des- 
potism had had a similar effect on the tiny Hel- 
lenic people to that of the defeat of the Russian 
despotism on the Japanese. At one blow they be- 
came a world-power, ruling the sea which sur- 
rounded them and with that commanding its 
trade. And if now over Japan the great industry 
is going to break with a weight of which they 
have only as yet experienced the commencement, 
so, after the Persian wars, Greece, and Athens 
in particular, became the headquarters of the 
world commerce of that time, commercial cap- 
italism embraced the entire people and dissolved 
all the traditional relations and conceptions which 
had hitherto ruled the individual and regulated 
his dealings. The individual found himself sud- 
denly transplanted into a new society — and 
II 



12 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

indeed the more so the higher he stood socially 
— in which he lost all the traditional supports, 
in which he found himself left wholly to him- 
self. And yet despite all this seeming anarchy, 
everyone felt not only a need for distinct rules 
of conduct, but he found more or less clearly 
that in his own inner being there worked a regu- 
lator of his action which allowed him to decide 
between good and bad, to aim for the good and 
to avoid the bad. This regulator revealed itself 
as a highly mysterious power. Granted that it 
controlled the actions of many men, that its de- 
cisions between good and bad were given without 
the least delay and asserted themselves with all 
decision — if any one asked what was the actual 
nature of this regulator and on what foundation 
it built its judgments, then were both the regu- 
lator which dwelt in the breast of every man, as 
well as the judgments which appeared so natural 
and self evident, revealed as phenomena which 
were harder to understand than any other phe- 
nomena in the world. 

So we see then that since the Persian wars 
Ethics, or the investigation of this mysterious reg- 
ulator of human action — the moral law — comes 
to the front in Greek Philosophy. Up to this 
time Greek Philosophy had been in the main nat- 
ural philosophy. It made it its duty to investi- 
gate and explain the laws which hold in the world 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 1 3 

of nature. Now nature lost interest with the 
philosophers ever more and more. Man, or the' 
ethical nature of humanity, became the central 
point of their investigations. Natural Philosophy 
ceased to make further progress, the natural sci- 
ences were divided from philosophy ; all progress 
of the ancient philosophy came now from the 
study of the spiritual nature of man and his 
morality. 

The Sophists already had begun to despise the 
knowledge of nature. Still farther went Soc- 
rates, who was of opinion that he could learn 
nothing from the trees, but certainly from the 
human beings in the town. Plato looked on 
Natural Philosophy as play. 

With that, however, the method of philosophy 
changed. Natural Philosophy is of necessity 
bound to rely on the observation of nature. On 
the other hand how is the moral nature of man 
to be recognized with more certainty than 
through the observation of our own personality? 
The senses can be mistaken, other men can de- 
ceive us. But we ourselves do not lie to our- 
selves, when we wish to be truthful. Thus 
finally that alone was recognized as certain 
knowledge which man produced from himself. 

But not alone the subject and the method, but 
also the object of philosophy was different. Nat- 
ural Philosophy aimed at the examination of the 



14 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

necessary connection of cause and effect. Its 
point of view was that of causality. Ethics on the 
other hand dealt with the will and duty of man, 
with ends and aims which he strives for. Thus 
its point of view is that of a conscious aim, 
teleology. 

Now these new conceptions do not always re- 
veal themselves with equal sharpness in all the 
various schools of thought. 

There are two methods of explaining the 
moral law within us. 

One can look for its roots in the obvious 
motive forces of human action, and as such ap- 
peared the pursuit of happiness or pleasure. 
Under the production of wares, the production of 
private producers externally independent of each 
other, happiness and pleasure and the conditions 
necessary thereto are also a private affair. 
Consequently men come to look for the founda- 
tion of the moral law in the individual need for 
happiness or pleasure. That is good that makes 
for the individual's pleasure, and increases his 
happiness. And evil is that which produces the 
contrary. How is it then possible that not every- 
body under all circumstances wishes only the 
good? That is explained by the fact that there 
are various kinds of pleasure and happiness. 
Evil arises when men choose a lower kind of 
pleasure or happiness in preference to a higher, 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I5 

or sacrifice a lasting pleasure to a momentary and 
fleeting one. Thus it arises from ignorance or 
short-sightedness. Accordingly Epicurus looked 
on the intellectual pleasures as higher than the 
physical because they last longer and give unal- 
loyed satisfaction. He considers the pleasure of 
repose greater than the pleasure of action. 
Spiritual peace seems to him the greatest pleas- 
ure. In consequence all excess in pleasure is to 
be rejected; and every selfish action is bad, since 
respect, love and the help of my neighbors, as 
well as the prosperity and welfare of the com- 
munity to which I belong are factors which are 
necessary to my own prosperity, which, however, 
I cannot attain if I only look out for myself 
without any scruples. 

This view of Ethics had the advantage that it 
appeared quite natural and it was very easy to 
reconcile it with the needs of those who desired to 
content themselves with the knowledge which 
our senses give us of the knowable world as the 
real and to whom human existence appeared only 
a part of this world. On the o lier hands this 
view of ethics was bound to produce in its turn 
that materialist view of the world. Founding 
Ethics on the longing for the pleasure or hap- 
piness of the individual or on egoism and the 
materialist world concept conditioned and lent 
each other mutual support. The connection of 



l6 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

both elements comes most completely to ex- 
pression in Epicurus (341-270 B. C.) His ma- 
terialist philosophy of nature is founded with a 
directly ethical aim. 

The materialist view of nature is in his view 
alone in the position to free us from the fear 
which a foolish superstition awakes in us and 
to give us that peace of soul without which true 
happiness is impossible. 

On the other hand, all those elements who 
were opposed to the materialism were obliged to 
reject his ethics, and vice versa; those who were 
not satisfied with this ethics were not satisfied 
with the m.aterialism either. And this ethic of 
egoism, or the pursuit of the individual happi- 
ness, gave ample opportunity for attack. In the 
first place it did not explain how the moral law 
arose as a moral binding force, as a duty to do 
the right and not simply as advice, to prefer the 
more rational kind of pleasure to the less rational. 
And the speedy decisive moral judgment on 
good and bad is quite different from the balan- 
cing up between different kinds of pleasures or 
utilities. Also, finally, it is possible to feel a 
moral duty even in cases where the most gen- 
erous interpretation can find no pleasure or utility 
from which the pursuit of this duty can be de- 
duced. If I refuse to lie, although I by that 
means stir up public opinion forever against me, 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I7 

if I put my existence at stake, or even bring on 
myself the penalty of death, then there can be 
no talk of even the remotest pleasure or happi- 
ness which could transform the discomfort or 
pain of the moment into its opposite. 

But what could the critics bring forward to 
explain this phenomenon? In fact nothing, 
even if according to their own view a great deal. 
Since they were unable to explain the moral law 
by natural means it became to them the surest 
and most unanswerable proof that man lived not 
only a natural life, but also outside of nature, 
that in him supernatural and non-natural forces 
work, that his spirit is something supernatural. 
Thus arose from this view the ethic of philo- 
sophic idealism and monotheism, the new belief 
in God. 

This belief in God was quite different to the 
old polytheism; it differed from the latter not 
only in the number of the gods ; it did not arise 
from the fact that these were reduced to one. 
Polytheism was an attempt to explain the pro- 
cess of Nature. Its gods were personifications 
of the forces of Nature ; they were thus not over 
Nature, and not outside of Nature, but in her 
and formed a part of her. Natural Philosophy 
superseded them in the degree in which it dis- 
covered other than personal causation in the 
processes of nature, and developed the idea of 



l8 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

law, of the necessary connection of cause and 
effect. The gods might here and there maintain 
a traditional existence for a time even in the 
philosophy, but only as a kind of superman who 
no longer played any active role. Even for Epi- 
curus, despite his materialism, the gods were not 
dead, but they were changed ijito passive spec- 
tators. 

Even the non-materialist ethical school of phi- 
losophy, such as was most completely represented 
by Plato (427-347 B. C), and whose mythical 
side was far more clearly developed by the neo- 
platonists, especially by Plotinus (204-270 
A. D.) — even this school did not find the gods 
necessary to explain nature, and dealt with them 
in no other way than did the materialists. Their 
idea of God did not spring out of the need to 
explain the natural world around us, but the 
ethical and spiritual nature of man. For that 
they required to assume a spiritual Being stand- 
ing outside of and over nature, thus outside of 
time and space, a spiritual Being which formed 
the quintessence of all morality and who ruled 
the crowd who worked with their hands. And 
just as the former conceived themselves as noble, 
and the latter appeared to them common and vul- 
gar, so did nature become mean and bad, the 
spirit on the other hand elevated and good. 
Man was unlucky enough to belong to both 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 19 

worlds, that of matter and of spirit. Thus he 
is half animal and half angel, and oscillates be- 
tween good and evil. But just as God rules na- 
ture, has the moral in man the force to overcome 
the natural, the desires of the flesh and to triumph 
over them. More complete happiness is never- 
theless impossible for man so long as he dwells 
in this vale of tears, where he is condemned to 
bear the burden of his own flesh. Only then 
when he is free from this and his spirit has re- 
turned to its original source — to God — can he 
enjoy unlimited happiness. 

Thus it will be seen that God plays a very 
different role to what he does in the original 
Polytheism. This one God is no personification 
of an appearance of the outer nature, but the 
assumption for itself of an independent existence 
on the part of the spiritual (or intellectual) 
nature of man. Just as this is a unity so can the 
Godhead be no multiplicity. And its most com- 
plete philosophic form, the one God, has no 
other function than that of accounting for the 
moral law. To interfere in the course of the 
world in the manner of the ancient gods is not 
his business, here suffices, at least for philos- 
ophers, the assumption of the binding force in 
the natural law of cause and effect. 

Certainly the more this view became popular 
and grew into the religion of the people, the 



20 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

more did a highest, all embracing and all ruling 
spirit take on again personal characteristics ; the 
more did he take part in human affairs, and the 
more did the old gods smuggle themselves in. 
They came in as intermediators between God 
and man, as saints and angels. But even in 
this form the contempt for nature held good, as 
well as the view that the spiritual and especially 
the ethical nature of man was of supernatural 
origin and afforded an infallible proof of the 
existence of a supernatural world. 

Between the two extremes Plato and Epicurus, 
there were many intermediary positions possible. 
Among these the most important was the Stoic 
Philosophy, founded by Zeno (B. C. 341-270). 
Just like the Platonic Philosophy it attacked those 
wdio sought to derive the moral law from the 
pleasure or egotism of the single passing indi- 
vidual ; it recognized in him a higher power, 
standing over the individual, which can drive 
man to action, and which brings him pain and 
grief, nay even to death. But different to Plato 
they saw in the moral law nothing supernatural, 
only a product of nature. Virtue arises from 
the knowledge of nature; happiness is arrived 
at when man acts in accordance with nature, that 
is in accordance with the universe or the uni- 
versal Reason. To know nature and act in ac- 
cordance with her, reasonably, which is the same 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 21 

as virtuously, and voluntarily to submit to her 
necessity, disregarding individual pleasure and 
pain, that is the way to happiness which the 
wise go. The study of nature is, however, only 
a means to the study of virtue. And nature itself 
is explained by the stoics from a moral point of 
view. The practical result of the Stoic ethics is 
not the search for happiness, but the contempt 
of pleasure and the good things of the world. 
But this contempt of the world was finally to 
serve the same end, that which appeared to 
Zeno as well as Epicurus as the highest — viz., 
a state of repose for the individual soul. Both 
systems of ethics arose out of the need for rest. 

This intermediary position of the Stoic ethics 
between the Platonic and the Epicurean corre- 
sponded to the view of the universe which Stoic- 
ism drew up. The explanation of nature is by 
no means without importance to them, but nature 
appeared to them as a peculiar kind of monotheis- 
tic materialism which assumes a divine original 
force from which even the human soul springs. 
But this original force, the original fire, is bodily, 
it exists in and not outside of nature, and the 
soul is not immortal, even if it survives the 
human body. Finally it will be consumed by 
the original fire. 

Stoicism and Platonism finally became ele- 
ments of Christianity and overcame in this form 



22 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

the materialist Epicureanism. This latter ma- 
terialism could only prove satisfactory to a social 
class which was satisfied with things as they 
were, which found in them its pleasure and hap- 
piness, and had no need for another state of 
affairs. 

It was necessarily rejected by classes to whom 
the world as it was seemed bad and full of pain 
— to the decaying class of the old aristocracy 
as well as to the exploited classes — for whom 
present and future in this world could only be 
equally hopeless when the material world, that 
is the world of experience, was the only one, and 
no reliance was to be placed in an almighty spirit 
who had it in his power to bring this world to 
destruction. Finally materialism was bound to 
be rejected by the whole society so soon as this 
had so far degenerated that even the ruling classes 
suffered under the state of affairs, so that even 
these came to the opinion that no good could 
come out of the existing world, but that this only 
brought forth evil. To despise the world with 
the Stoics, or look for a Redeemer from the 
other side with the Christians, that was the only 
alternative. 

A new element came in Christianity with the 
invasions of the Barbarians, which substituted 
for the decadent society of the Roman Empire 
another in which the decrepit remains of the 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 23 

Romati system of production and their views of 
life combined with the youthful German society, 
the latter being organized on the basis of the 
mark, and a people of simple thought, content 
to enjoy life ; these elements combined to produce 
a strange new formation. 

On the one hand the Christian Church became 
the bond which held the new state together: 
here again the theory is apparently confirmed 
that the spirit is stronger than matter, since the 
intelligence of the Christian priesthood showed 
itself strong enough to tame the brute force of 
the German Barbarians. And this brute force, 
springing as it did from the material world, ap- 
peared to the representatives of Christianity, in 
addition, as the source of all evil, where it was 
not ruled by spirit and held in check ; on the other 
hand they saw in the spirit the foundation of 
all that was good. 

Thus the new social situation only contributed 
to strengthening the philosophic foundation of 
Christianity and its system of ethics. But on 
the other hand there came through this new 
situation the joy in life and a feeling of self 
confidence into society which had failed at the 
time of the rise of Christendom. Even to the 
Christian clergy — at least in the mass — the 
world no longer appeared a vale of tears and 
they acquired a capacity for enjoyment — a 



24 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

happy Epicureanism, certainly a coarser form 
and one which had nothing in common with the 
ancient philosophy. Nevertheless the Christian 
priesthood was obliged to hold to the Christian 
ethic, no longer as the expression of their own 
moral feeling, but as a means of maintaining 
their rule over the people. And everything 
forced them to recognize more and more the 
philosophic foundation of this system of ethics, 
namely the independence, nay the mastery of the 
spirit, over the real world. Thus the new social 
situation produced on the one hand a tendency 
to a materialist system of ethics, while on the 
other a series of reasons arose to strengthen the 
traditional Christian ethic. Thus arose the 
double morality, which became characteristic of 
Christianity, the formal recognition of a system 
of ethics which is only partially the expression 
of our moral feeling and will, and consequently 
of that which controls our action. In other 
words, moral hypocrisy became a standing social 
institution, which was never so widely spread as 
under Christianity. 

Ethics and religion appeared now as insepar- 
ably bound together. Certainly the moral law 
was the logical creator of the new God; but in 
Christianity God appeared as the author of the 
moral law. Without a belief in God, without re- 
ligion, no morality. Every ethical question be- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 25 

came a theological one, and as the most original 
and simple form of social indignation is the 
moral, the feeling of moral indignation, the feel- 
ing of the immorality of the existing social in- 
stitutions — so did every social uprising commence 
in the form of a theological criticism, to which 
certainly came as an additional factor the cir- 
cumstance that the Church was the foremost 
means of class rule and the Roman Priesthood 
the worst exploiters in the middle ages, so that 
all rebellion against any form of exploitation al- 
ways affected the Church in the first place. 

Even after the Renaissance at a time when 
philosophic thought had again arisen, questions 
of ethics remained for a long time questions of 
theology. 



26 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 



CHAPTER II 

The Ethical Systems of the Period of the 
Enlightenment 

After the Renaissance the study of nature 
again began to arouse interest, and with it also 
philosophy, which from then till well into the 
eighteenth century became principally natural 
philosophy, and as such raised our knowledge of 
the world to far above the level reached in the 
ancient world. They set out from the progress 
which the Arabs had made in natural science 
during the middle ages over the Greeks. The 
high-water mark of this development is certainly 
formed by the theory of Spinoza (1632-1677). 

Ethics took a second place with these thinkers. 
It was subordinated to natural science, of which 
it formed a part. But it came again to the fore 
so soon as the rapid development of Capitalism 
in west Europe in the eighteenth century had cre- 
ated a similar situation to that which had been 
created by the economic awakening which fol- 
lowed on the Persian wars in Greece. Then 
began, to speak in modern language, a revaluing 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 2^ 

of all values, and therewith a zealous thinking 
out and investigation into the foundation and 
essence of all morality. With that went certainly 
an eager research into the nature of the new 
method of production. Simultaneously with the 
appearance of ethics there began a new science 
of which the ancients were ignorant, the special 
child of the capitalist system of production, whose 
explanation it serves : political economy. 

In Ethics, however, we find three schools of 
thought side by side, which often run parallel to 
the three systems of the ancients, the Platonic, 
the Epicurean, and the Stoic: An anti-material- 
ist — the traditional Christian — a materialist, 
and finally a middle system between the two. 
The optimism and joy of life in the rising Bour- 
geoisie, at least in their progressive elements, 
especially their intellectuals, felt itself strong 
enough to show itself openly and to throw aside 
all hypocritical masks, which the ruling Chris- 
tianity had hitherto forced on them. And mis- 
erable as frequently the present might be, yet 
the uprising Bourgeoisie felt that the best part of 
reality, the future, belonged to them, and they 
felt the ability in themselves to change the vale 
of tears into a Paradise, in which man could fol- 
low his inclinations. In reality and in the natural 
impulses of man their thinkers saw the germs of 
all good and not all evil. This new school of 



28 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

thought found a thankful public not only among 
the more progressive elements in the Bourgeoisie, 
but also in the court nobility, who at that period 
had acquired such an absolute power in the state 
that even they thought that they could dispense 
with all Christian hypocrisy in their life of pleas- 
ure, all the more as they were now divided by a 
deep chasm from the life of the people. They 
looked on citizens and peasants as being of a 
lower order to whom their philosophy was in- 
comprehensible, so that they could freely and 
undisturbedly develop it without fear of shaking 
their own means of rule, the Christian religion, 
and Ethics. 

The conditions of the new view of life and 
ethics developed most vigorously in France. 
There they came most clearly and courageously 
to expression. But as in the case of the ancient 
Epicureanism so in the enlightenment philosophy 
of Lametric (1709-1751), Holbach (i 723-1 789), 
Helvetius (1715-1771), the ethic of egoism, of 
utility or pleasure, stood in close logical connec- 
tion with a materialist view of the universe. The 
world as experience presents it to us appeared 
the only one which can be taken into account by 
us. The causes of this new Epicureanism had 
great similarity to the ancient, as well as the re- 
sults at which both arrived. Nevertheless they 
were in one very essential point of a totally 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 29 

difierent character. The old Epicureanism did 
not arise as the disturber of the traditional re- 
ligious views: it had understood how to accom- 
modate itself to them. It was, however, not the 
theory of a revolutionary class, it did not preach 
war, but contemplative enjq^-ments. Far more 
was the Platonic idealism and theism the theory 
of the overthrow of the traditional religious 
views, a theory of the discontented classes. 

Otherwise was it with the Philosophy of En- 
lightenment. Certainly even this had a conserv- 
ative root, it regarded contemplative enjoyment 
as happiness, that is so far as it served the needs 
of the court nobility, which drew its living from 
the existing autocratic regime. But in the main 
it was the philosophy of the most intelligent and 
farthest developed as well as the most courageous 
elements in the Bourgeoisie. It gave them a rev- 
olutionary character. Standing from the very 
beginning in the most absolute opposition to the 
traditional religion and ethics they acquired more 
and more, the more the Bourgeoisie increased in 
strength and class consciousness, the conception 
of a fight — a conception which was quite strange 
to the old Epicureans — the fight against priests 
and tyrants; the fight for new ideals. 

The nature and method of the moral views and 
the height of the moral passions are according 
to the French materialists determined by the 



30 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

conditions of human life, especially by the con- 
stitution of the state as well as by education. 
It is always self interest that determines men; 
it can, however, become a very social interest, if 
society is so organized that the individual interest 
coincides with the interest of the community, so 
that the passions of men serve the common wel- 
fare. True virtue consists in the care for the 
common weal, it can only flourish where the 
commonwealth at the same time advances the 
interests of the individual, where he cannot dam- 
age the commonwealth without damaging him- 
self. 

It is incapacity to perceive the more durable 
interests of mankind, ignorance as to the best 
form of government, society and education which 
renders a state of affairs possible which of neces- 
sity brings the individual interest into conflict 
with that of the community. It only remains to 
make an end of this ignorance, to find a form of 
state, society and education corresponding to the 
demands of reason, in order to establish happi- 
ness and virtue on a firm and eternal foundation. 
Here we come on the revolutionary essence of 
the French materialism, which indicts the exist- 
ing state as the cause of immorality. With that 
it raises itself above the level of Epicureanism, 
with that, however, it weakens the position of 
its own Ethics. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 3I 

Because it is no mere question of inventing 
the best form of state and society; these have 
got to be fought for, the powers that be must be 
confronted and overthrown in order to estabUsh 
an empire of virtue. That requires, however, 
great moral zeal, and where is that to come from 
if the existing society is so bad that it prevents 
altogether the growth of virtue of morality? 
JMust not morality be already there in order that 
the higher society may arise? Is it not neces- 
sary that the moral should be alive in us before 
the moral order can become a fact? Whence, 
however, is a moral ideal to be derived from in 
a world of vice? 

To that we obtain no satisfactory answer. 

In very different fashion to the French did 
the Englishmen of the eighteenth century en- 
deavor to explain the moral law. They showed 
themselves in general less bold and more in- 
clined to compromise, in keeping with the history 
of England since the Reformation. Their insu- 
lar position was especially favorable to their 
economic development during this period. They 
were driven thereby to make sea voyages which in 
the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries, thanks 
to the colonial system, formed the quickest road 
to a fortune. It kept England free from all the 
burdens and the ravages of wars on land, such 
as exhausted the European powers. Thus Eng- 



32 ETHICS AND THE AIATERIALIST 

land acquired in the seventeenth and eighteenth 
centuries more wealth than all the other nations 
of Europe and placed herself, so far as her eco- 
nomic position was concerned, at their head. 
But when new classes and new class antagonisms 
and with that new social problems, arise in a 
country at an earlier date than elsewhere, the 
new classes only attain a small degree of class 
consciousness, and still remain to a large degree 
imprisoned in the old methods of thought, so 
that the class antagonisms only appear in a very 
undeveloped form. Thus in such a land it does 
not at once come to a final and decisive struggle 
in the class war, it comes to no decisive over- 
throw of the old classes, who there continue to 
rule without any limit and in all the neighboring 
countries remain at the height of their power. 
The new classes are still incapable of taking on 
the governments because they do not realize their 
own position in society, are frightened by the 
novelty of their own endeavors, and themselves 
seek for support and points of contact in the 
traditional relations. 

So that it seems to be a general law of social 
development, that countries which are pioneers 
in the economic development are tempted to put 
compromise in the place of radical solutions. 

Thus France stood by the side of Italy in the 
Aliddle Ages at the head of the economic devel- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 33 

opment of Europe. She came more and more 
into opposition with the Papacy — their govern- 
ment first rebelled against Rome. But just be- 
cause she opened the way in this direction, she 
never succeeded in founding a national church, 
and only was able to force the Papacy to a com- 
promise which has lasted, with unimportant in- 
terruptions, up to the present. On the other 
hand the most radical champions against the 
Papal might were two states which were econom- 
ically the most backward, Scotland and Sweden. 
Since the Reformation England, together with 
Scotland, has taken the place of France and Italy 
as the pioneer of economic development, and 
thus compromise has become for both England 
and Scotland the form of the solution of 
their class struggles. Just because in Eng- 
land, in the seventeenth century, capital acquired 
power more rapidly than elsewhere, because 
there earlier than in other countries, it came to a 
struggle with the feudal aristocracy, did this 
fight end with a compromise, and that explains 
the fact that the feudal system of landed prop- 
erty even today is stronger in England than in 
any other country of Europe — Austro-Hungary 
perhaps alone excepted. For the same reason, 
that of her rapid economic development, the 
class war between Proletariat and Bourgeoisie 
first blazed up in England of all countries in the 



34 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

world. It blazed up at a time when Proletariat 
and industrial capitalist had not yet got over the 
small bourgeois methods of thought, when many 
and even clear-sighted observers mixed up the 
two classes together as the industrial class; 
when the type of the proletariat, self-conscious 
and confident in the future of his own class, as 
well as that of the autocrat and unlimited ruler 
in the state — the industrial capitalist — had not 
yet developed. Thus the struggle of the two 
classes landed, after a short and showy fiare-up 
in a compromise which made the rule of the 
Bourgeoisie for many years to come more un- 
limited than in any other land with the modern 
system of production. 

Naturally can the effects of this law, just as- 
that of any other, be disturbed by unfavorable 
by-currents, and advanced by favorable. But 
in any case it was so far efficacious that it is 
necessary to be on our guard against the popular 
interpretation of the historical materialism which 
holds that the land which takes the lead in the 
economic development invariably also brings the 
corresponding forms of the class war to the 
sharpest and most decisive expression. 

Even materialism and atheism as well as ethics 
were subject in England to the spirit of com- 
promise, which has ruled since the sixteenth 
century. The fight of the democratic and ris- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 35 

ing class against the governing power, independ- 
ent of the Bourgeoisie and subject to the feudal 
aristocracy with their court nobility and their 
state church, commenced in England more than 
a century before France, at a time when only 
few had got over the Christian thought. If in 
France the fight against the state church became 
a fight between Christianity and atheistic mia- 
terialism, in England it became only a struggle 
between special democratic Christian sects and 
the state-church-organized sect. And if in 
France in the period of the enlightenment, the 
majority of the intelligence and the classes that 
came under its influence thought as materialists 
and atheists, so did the English intelligence look 
for a compromise between materialism and 
Christianity. Certainly materialism found its 
first public form in England in the theory of 
Thomas Hobbes (i 588-1 679) ; certainly were to 
be found in England thinkers on Ethical ques- 
tions, whose courage surpassed that of the most 
courageous Frenchman, such as Mandeville 
( 1 670-1 733) who declared morality to be a 
means of ruling, a discovery to keep the work- 
ers in subjection, and who looked on vice as the 
root of all social good. But such ideas had 
little influence on the thoughts of the many. A 
Christian profession remained the sign of re- 
spectability, and even if this were not felt, still 



36 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

to pretend to feel it became the duty of every 
man of learning, who did not wish to come into 
conflict with society. 

Thus the Englishmen remained very sceptical 
of the materialistic ethics, which wished to found 
the moral law on self love, or on the pleasure 
and the ability of the individual. Certainly the 
intellectual circles of the rising Bourgeoisie 
sought even in England to explain the moral law 
as a natural phenomenon, but they saw that its 
compulsory might could not be explained from 
simple considerations of utility, and that the 
constructions were too artificial which were re- 
quired to unite the commands of morality with 
the motives of utility — let alone to think of 
making out of the latter an energetic motive 
force of the former. Thus they distinguished 
very nicely between the sympathetic and the 
egoistic interests in man, recognized a moral 
sense which drives man to be active for the 
happiness of his fellows. After the Scotch- 
man, Hutcheson (1694-1747), the most distin- 
guished representative of this theory was Adam 
Smith, the economist (1723-1790). In his two 
principal works he investigated the two main- 
springs of human action. In the " Theory of 
Moral Sentiments" (1759) he started out from 
sympathy as the most important bond of human 
society ; his " Wealth of Nations " assumes the 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 37 

egoism, the material interest of the individual, 
to be the mainspring of human action. That 
book appeared in 1776, but the principles which 
it contained Adam Smith uttered orally in Glas- 
gow as early as 1752 or 1753. His theory of 
egoism and his theory of sympathy were not 
mutually exclusive, but were complementary the 
one of the other. 

If these Englishmen set egoism and moral 
sense over against each other, so was that, as 
compared to the materialists, an approach to 
Platonism and Christianity. Nevertheless their 
views were widely different from the latter. 
Since, while according to Christianity, man is 
bad by nature; and according to the Platonic 
theory our natural impulses are the source of 
evil in us, so for the English school of the eight- 
eenth century, the moral sense was opposed 
certainly to egoism, but was just as much as the 
latter a natural impulse. Even the egoism ap- 
peared to them not as a bad, but as a fully 
justifiable impulse which was as necessary for 
the welfare of society as sympathy with others. 
The moral sense was a sense just as any other 
human sense, and in a certain degree their sixth 
sense. 

Certainly with this assumption, just as in the 
case of the French materialists, the difficulty 
was only postponed and not solved. To the 



3^ ETHICS AXD THE MATERIALIST 

question, whence comes this pecuHar sense in 
man, the EngHshman had no answer. It was 
given by nature to man. That might suffice for 
those who traded in a creator of the universe, 
but it did not make this assumption superfluous. 

The task for the further scientific development 
of ethics appeared in this state of the question 
clear. The French, as well as the English, 
school had achieved much for the psychological 
and historical explanation of the moral feelings 
and views. But neither the one nor the other 
could succeed in making quite clear that moral- 
ity was an outcome of causes which lie in the 
realm of experience. The English school must 
be surpassed and the causes of the moral sense 
investigated. It was necessary to go beyond 
the French school and to lay bare the causes 
of the moral ideal. 

But the development goes in no straight line. 
It moves in contradictions. The next step of 
philosophy in regard to ethics took the opposite 
direction. Instead of investigating the ethical 
nature of man in order to bring this more than 
ever under the general laws of nature, it came to 
quite other conclusions. 

This step was achieved by German philoso- 
phy with Kant (1724-1804). Certain people 
like to cry now, " Back to Kant ! " But those 
who mean by that the Kantian ethic, might just 
as well cry "Back to Plato!" 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 39 



CHAPTER III 

The Ethic of Kant 

I. the criticism of knowledge 

Kant took the same ground as the material- 
ists. He recognized that the world outside of 
us is real and that the starting point of all 
knowledge is the experience of the senses. But 
the knowledge which we acquire from experience 
is partly composed of that which we acquire 
through the sense impressions and partly from 
that which our own intellectual powers supply 
from themselves ; in other words, our knowledge 
of the world is conditioned not simply by the 
nature of the external world, but also by that 
of our organs of knowledge. For a knowledge 
of the world therefore the investigation of our 
own intellectual powers is equally as necessary 
as that of the external world. The investigation 
of the first is, however, the duty of philosophy 
— this is the science of science. 

In this there is nothing contained that every 
materialist could not subscribe to, or that, per- 
haps with the exception of the last sentence had 



40 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

not also been previously said by materialists. 
But certainly only in the way in which certain 
sentences from the materialist conception of his- 
tory had already been uttered before Marx, as 
,^ conceptions which had not borne fruit. It was 
Kant who first made them the foundation of his 
entire theory. Through him did philosophy first 
become the science of science, whose duty it is 
not to teach a distinct philosophy, but how to 
philosophize, the process of knowing, method- 
ical thinking, and that by way of a critique of 
knowledge. 

But Kant went farther than this, and his great 
philosophical achievement, the investigation of 
the faculties of knowledge, became itself his 
philosophical stumbling block. 

Since our sensual experience does not reveal 
to us the world as it is in itself, but only as it 
is for us, as it appears to us, thanks to the pe- 
culiar constitution of our faculties of knowledge, 
so the world as it is in itself must be different 
to that which appears to us. Consequently Kant 
distinguishes between the world of phenomena, 
of appearances, and the world of things in them- 
selves, the " noumena," or the intelligible world. 
Certainly this latter is for us unknowable, it 
lies outside of our experience, so that there is 
no need to deal with it ; one might simply take it 
as a method of designating the fact that our 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 4I 

knowledge of the world is always limited by the 
nature of our intellectual faculties, is always 
relative, that for us there can only be relative 
and no absolute truths, not a final and complete 
knowledge, but an endless process of knowing. 

But Kant was not content with that. He felt 
an unquenchable longing to get a glimpse into 
that unknown and inexplorable world of things 
in themselves, in order to acquire at least a no- 
tion of it. 

And indeed he got so far as to say quite dis- 
tinct things about it. The way to this he saw 
in the critique of our powers of thought. 

These latter by separating from experience 
that which comes from the ^senses must arrive at 
the point of describing the forms of knowledge 
and perception as they originally and a priori, 
previous to all experience-, are contained in our 
" feelings." In this manner he discovered the 
ideality of time and space. According to him 
these are not conceptions which are won from 
experience, but simply the forms of our concep- 
tion of the world, which are embedded in our 
faculties of knowledge. Only under the form of 
conceptions in time and space can we recognize 
the world. But outside of our faculties of 
knowledge there is no space and no time. Thus 
Kant got so far as to say about the world of 
things in themselves, that completely unknow- 



42 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

able world, something very distinct, namely, that 
it is timeless and spaceless. 

Without doubt this logical development is one 
of the most daring achievements of the human 
mind. That does not say by any means that it 
is not open to criticism. On the contrary there 
is a great deal to be said against it, and in fact 
there are very very weighty objections which have 
been brought against it. The assumption of the 
ideality of space and time in the Kantian sense 
led to inextricable contradictions. 

There can certainly be no doubt that our con- 
cepions of time and space are conditioned by the 
constitution of our faculties of knowledge, but 
I should have thought that that would only neces- 
sarily amount to saying, that only those connec- 
tions of events in the universe can be recognized 
which are of such a nature as to call forth in our 
intellectual faculties the concepts of space and 
time. The ideality of time and space would 
then imply just as the thing in itself, no more 
and no less than a limit to our powers of know- 
ing. 

Relations of a kind which cannot take the 
form of space or time concepts — even if such 
really exist, that we do not know — are for us 
inconceivable, just as much as the ultra-violet 
and ultra-red rays are imperceptible for our 
powers of vision. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 43 

But Kant did not mean the matter in this sense 
at all. Because space and time provide the forms 
in which alone my faculties of knowledge can 
recognize the world, he takes for granted that 
time and space are forms which are only to be 
found in my faculty of knowledge, and cor- 
respond to no sort of connection in the real world. 
In his *' Prolegomena to every future Meta- 
physic " Kant compares in one place the con- 
cept of space with the concept of color. This 
comparison appears to us very apt, it by no 
means, however, proves what Kant wants to 
prove. If cinnabar appears red to me, that fact 
is certainly conditioned by the peculiarity of my 
visual organs. Out of that there is no color. 
What appears to me as color is called forth by 
waves of aether of a distinct length which affect 
my eye. Should any one wish to consider these 
waves in relation to the color as the thing in itself, 
which in reality they are not, then our power of 
vision would not be a power to see the things 
as they are, but power to see them as they are 
not ; not a capacity of knowledge, but of illusion. 

But it is quite another matter when we look 
not at one color alone, but take several colors 
together and distinguish them from one another. 
Each of them is called forth by distinct ether 
waves of different lengths. To the distinctions 
in the colors there correspond differences in the 



44 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

lengths of the ether waves. These distinctions 
do not He in my organ of vision but have their 
ground in the external world. My organs of 
vision have only the function of making me con- 
scious of this difference in a certain form, that 
of color. , As a means to a recognition of this dis- 
tinction it is a power of real knowledge and not 
of illusion. These distinctions are no mere ap- 
pearances. That I see green, red and white, that 
has its ground in my organ of sight. But that 
the green is different to the red, that testifies 
to something that lies outside of me, to a real 
difference between the things. 

Besides that the peculiarity of my organ has 
the effect that by its means I can only recognize 
the motions of the ether. No other communica- 
tion from the outer world can reach me through 
that medium. 

Just as with the power of vision in particular 
so is it with the organs of knowledge in general. 
They can only convey to me Space and Time 
conceptions, that is, they can only show me those 
relations of the things which can call forth Time 
and Space conceptions in my head. To impres- 
sions of another kind, if there are any, they 
cannot react. And my faculty of knowledge ren- 
ders it possible for me to obtain these impressions 
in a particular way. So far are the categories of 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 45 

space and time founded in the construction of 
my faculty of knowledge. 

But the relations and distinctions of the things 
themselves, which are shown to me by means of 
the individual space and time concepts, so that 
the different things appear to me as big and 
small, near and far, sooner or later, are real 
relations and distinctions of the external world, 
which are not conditioned through the nature of 
my faculty of knowledge. 

Even if we therefore are not in a position 
to recognize a single thing by itself, if our facul- 
ty of knowledge is in respect to that a faculty 
of ignorance, we can yet recognize the real dif- 
ferences between things. These distinctions are 
no mere appearances, even if our conception of 
them is conveyed to us by means of appearances ; 
they exist outside of us, and can be recognized 
by us, certainly only in certain forms. 

Kant, on the other hand, was of the opinion 
that not simply are space and time forms of con- 
ception for us, but that even the temporal and 
spacial differences of phenomena spring solely 
from our heads, and indicate nothing real. If 
that were really so, then would all phenomena 
spring simply from our heads, since they all 
take the form of temporal and spacial differences. 
Thus we could know absolutely nothing about 
the world outside of us, not even that it existed. 



46 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

Should there exist a world outside of us, then, 
thanks to the ideality of space and time, our fac- 
ulty of knowledge would be not an imperfect, 
one-sided mechanism, which communicated to us 
only a one-sided knowledge of the world, but a 
complete mechanism of its kind, and one which 
served to completely cut us off from all knowl- 
edge of the world. Certainly a mechanism to 
which the name " Faculty of Knowledge " is just 
about as suitable as the fist to the eye. 

Kant could attack ever so energetically the 
"mystical" idealism of Berkeley, which he hoped 
to replace with his critical idealism. His criti- 
cism took a turn, which nullifies his own as- 
sumption that the world is real and only to be 
known through experience, and thus mysticism" 
cast out from the one side finds on the other a 
wide triumphal doorway open, through which it 
can enter with a flourish of trumpets. 

II. THE MORAL LAW 

Kant assumed as his starting point that the 
world is really external to us and does not simply 
exist in our heads, and that knowledge about it 
is only to be attained through experience. His 
philosophical achievement was to be the examina- 
tion of the conditions of experience, of the boun- 
daries of our knowledge. But just this very ex- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 47 

amination became for him an incitement to sur- 
mount this barrier, and to discover an unknow- 
able world_, of which he actually knew that it was 
of quite another nature than the world of ap- 
pearances, that it was completely timeless and 
spaceless, and therefore causeless as well. 

But why this break-neck leap over the boun- 
daries of knowledge which caused him to lose 
all firm ground under the feet? The ground 
could not be a logical one, since through this 
leap he landed in contradictions which nullified 
his own assumptions. It was a historical ground 
which awaked in him the need for the assumption 
of a supersensuous world — a need which he 
must satisfy at all price. 

If, in the eighteenth century, France was a 
hundred years behind England, just so much 
was Germany behind France. If the English 
bourgeoisie no longer needed the materialism, 
since without it, and on religious grounds, they 
had got rid of the feudalist state and its church, 
the German bourgeoisie did not yet feel strong 
enough to take up openly the fight against the 
state and its church. They therefore withdrew 
in fear from the materialism. This came in the 
eighteenth century to Germany, just as to Rus- 
sia, not as the philosophy of conflict but of pleas- 
ure, in a form suitable to the needs of the " en- 
lightened " despotism. It grew at the princely 



48 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

courts, side by side with the narrowest orthodoxy. 
In the bourgeoisie there remained, however, even 
in its boldest and most independent pioneers, as a 
rule, some relic of Christian belief, from which 
they could not emancipate themselves. 

That w^as bound to make the English philoso- 
phy appeal to German philosophers. In fact they 
had also a very great influence on Kant. I can- 
not remember ever to have found in his writings 
any mention of a French materialist of the eight- 
eenth century. On the other hand he quoted 
with preference Englishmen of the seventeenth 
and eighteenth centuries, Locke, Hume, Berkeley 
and Priestley. 

But between the German and English philoso- 
phy there was a great difference. The English 
philosophized at a time of great practical ad- 
vance, of great practical struggles. 

The practice captured their entire intellectual 
force; even their philosophy was entirely ruled 
by practical considerations. Their philosophers 
were greater in their achievements in economics, 
politics, natural science, than in philosophy. 

The German thinkers found no practice which 
could prevent them from concentrating their en- 
tire mental power on the deepest and most ab- 
stract problems of science. They were therefore 
in this respect without their like outside of Ger- 
many. That was not founded on any race quality 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 49 

of the Germans, but on the circumstances of the 
time. In the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries 
the deepest philosophic thinkers were to be found 
in Italy, France, Holland, England, and not in 
Germany. The quiet that came over German 
political life in the century following the Thirty 
Years War first gave Germany the lead in Philos- 
ophy, just as Marx's " Capital " had its origin in 
the period of reaction following on 1848. 

Kant, despite his sympathy for the English, 
could not find satisfaction in their philosophy. 
He was just as critical towards it as towards ma- 
terialism. 

In both cases Ethics was bound to strike him 
as the weakest point. It seemed to him quite im- 
possible to bring the moral law into a necessary 
connection with nature ; that is, with the world of 
phenomena. Its explanation required another 
world, a timeless and spaceless world of pure 
spirit, a world of freedom in contrast to the world 
of appearances (phenomena) which is ruled by 
the necessary chain of cause and effect. On the 
other hand his Christian feelings, the outcome of 
a pious education, were bound to awaken the need 
for the recognition of a world in which God and 
immortality were possible.^ 

*As a curiosity it may be mentioned here that it is 
possible to confront Bernstein's witty remark "Kant 
against Cant" with the fact that Kant himself was Cant. 
"His ancestors came from Scotland. . . . The father, 
a saddler by profession, maintained in his name the 



50 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

As Kant had to allow that God and immortal- 
ity were completely superfluous in the world of 
our experience, he was obliged to look for a 
world " beyond " experience for them, and thus 
the spaceless and timeless world of things in 
themselves corresponded most completely to his 
needs. 

Kant obtained the best proof for the existence 
of God and immortality in this world of the 
" beyond " from the moral laws. Thus we find 
with him, as with Plato, that the repudiation of 
the materialist explanation and the belief in a 
special world of spirits, or if it is preferred a 
world of spirit, lend each other mutual support 
and render it necessary. 

How, however, did Kant manage to obtain 
farther insight into this spirit world ? The critique 
of pure reason only allowed him to say of it, 
that it was timeless and spaceless. Now this 
spacelessness has to be filled up with a content. 
Even for that Kant has an idea. 

Scottish spelling Cant, the Philosopher first changed the 
letters to prevent the false pronunciation as Zant. 
[Kuno Fischer History of Modern Philosophy, Vol. III., 
p. 52, German Ed.] His family was very religious 
and this influence Kant never got over. Not less than 
Kant is the "cant" related to puritan piety. The word 
signifies first the puritan method of singing, then the 
puritan religious and finally the customary, thoughtless 
oft-repeated phraseology to which men submit them- 
selves. Bernstein appealed, in his "Assumptions of So- 
cialism," for a Kant as an ally against the materialist 
"party-cant." 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 5 1 

The unknowable world of things in themselves 
becomes at least partly knowable directly one 
succeeds in getting hold of a thing in itself. 
And Kant finds this for us. It is the personality 
of man. I am for myself at once phenomenon 
and thing in itself. My pure reason is a thing 
in itself. As a part of the sensuous world I am 
subject to the chain of cause and effect, therefore 
to necessity ; as a thing in itself I am free, that 
is, my actions are not determined by the causes 
of the world of the senses, but by the moral law 
dwelling within me, which springs from the pure 
reason and calls out to me not " Thou must," but 
" Thou shalt." This shall were an absurdity if 
there did not correspond to it, a can, if I were 
not free. 

The moral freedom of man is certainly a com- 
plicated thing. It brings along with it certainly 
no less contradictions than the ideality of time 
and space. Since this freedom comes to expres- 
sion in actions which belong to the world of 
phenomena, but as such fall into the chain of 
cause and effect, — they are necessary. The same 
actions are at the same time free and necessary. 
Besides this freedom arises in the timeless, intel- 
ligible world, while cause and effect always fall 
in a particular time. The same time-determined 
action has thus a time, as well as a cause in 
time. 



52 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

But what is now the moral law, which from 
the world of things in themselves, the ** world 
of the understanding, extends its working right 
into the world of appearances, the world of the 
"senses," and then subordinates itself? Since it 
springs from the world of the understanding its 
determining ground can only lie in the pure 
reason. It must be of a purely formal nature, 
because it must remain fully free from all rela- 
tion to the world of the senses, which would at 
once involve a relation of cause and effect, a 
determining ground of the will which would at 
once annihilate its freedom. 

" There is, however," says Kant in his Critique 
of Practical Reason, " besides the matter of the 
law, nothing further contained than the law- 
giving form. Thus the law-giving form, so far 
as it is contained in the maxim, is the only thing 
that can constitute a determining ground of the 
free will." 

From that he draws the following " Funda- 
mental Law of the Pure Practical Reason." 

" Act so that the maxim of thy action may be 
a principle of universal legislation." 

This principle is by no means startlingly new. 
It forms only the philosophic translation of the 
ancient precept, to do unto others as we would 
be done by. The only new thing is the declara- 
tion that this precept forms a revelation of an 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 53 

intelligible vv^orld ; a' revelation which with the 
greatest application of philosophic insight was 
to be discovered as a principle which applied not 
only for humanity, " but for all finite Beings who 
possess Reason and will', nay even including the 
Infinite Being as the highest intelligence." 

Unfortunately the proof for this law which ap- 
plies even to the Supreme Intelligence shows a 
very serious flaw. It ought to be " independent 
of all conditions appertaining to the world of 
the senses," but that is easier said than fulfilled. 
Just as little as it is possible with the air pump 
to create a completely airless space; just as it 
must always contain air, though it be in so 
refined degree, that it is no more to be recog- 
nized by us, in the same way we cannot possibly 
grasp a thought, which is independent of all con- 
ditions appertaining to the world of the senses. 
Even the moral law does not escape this fate. 

The moral law already includes conditions 
which belong to the world of the senses. It is 
not a law of the " pure will " in itself, but a law 
of the control of my will when brought in contact 
with my fellow men. It assumes this ; for me, 
however, these appearances are from the world 
of the senses. 

And still more is assumed, however, by the 
conception of the moral law : " act so that the 
maxim of thy action may be a principle of uni- 



54 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

versal legislation." This assumes not only men 
outside of me^ but also the wish that these fellow 
men should behave themselves in a particular 
manner. They are so to behave themselves as 
the moral law prescribes to me to act. Not only 
society but also a distinct form of social condi- 
tions is assumed as possible and desirable. 

That in fact the need for such is concealed in 
the ground of his " practical reason " and de- 
termines his spaceless and timeless moral law, 
Kant himself betrays in his '' Critique of Prac- 
tical Reason " in a polemic against the deduction 
of the moral law from pleasure.^ 

*' It is therefore surprising that intelligent men 
could have thought of calling the desire for hap- 
piness a universal practical law, on the ground 
that the desire is universal and therefore also the 
maxim by which everyone makes this desire de- 
termine his will. 

*' For, whereas, in other cases a universal law 
of nature makes everything harmonious, here, on 
the contrary, if we attribute to the maxim the 
universality of law the extreme opposite of har- 
mony will follow, the greatest opposition and the 
complete distraction of the maxim itself and its 
purpose. For, in that case, the will of all has not 
one and the same object, but everyone has his 

1 Kant's " Critique of Practical Reason," Tr. by T. W. Abbott. 
Lond. 1889. Sect. 10, theorem II, pp. 115-6. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 55 

own (his private welfare), which may accident- 
ally accord with the purposes of others which are 
equally selfish, but it is far from sufficiency for a 
law, because the occasional exceptions which one 
is permitted to make are endless and cannot be 
definitely embraced in a universal rule. In this 
manner there results a harmony Hke a married 
couple bent on going to ruin. " O, marvellous 
harmony, what he wishes, she wished also," or 
like what is said of the pledge of Francis I, to 
the Emperor Charles V. : " What my brother 
Charles wishes, that I wish also" (viz. Milan). 

Thus pleasure is not to be a maxim which 
can serve as a principle of universal legislation, 
and that because it can call forth social dishar- 
monies. The moral law has thus to create a 
harmonious society, and such must be possible, 
otherwise it would be absurd to wish to create it. 

The Kantian moral law assumes thus, in the 
first place, a harmonious society as desirable and 
as possible. But it also assumes that the moral 
law is the means to create such a society, that 
this result can be achieved through a rule which 
the individual sets to himself. We see how 
thoroughly Kant was deceived, when he thought 
that his moral law was independent from all 
conditions appertaining to the world of sense, and 
that it formed thus a principle which would ap- 



56 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

ply to all timeless and spaceless spirits, including 
God Almighty himself. 

In reality Kant's moral law is the result of very 
concrete social needs. Naturally, since it springs 
from the wish for a harmonious society, it is 
possible to deduce from it the ideal of a harmon- 
ious society and thus it has been possible to stamp 
Kant as a founder of Socialism. Cohen repeats 
this again also in his latest work " Ethics of the 
Pure Will " (Ethik des reinen Willens) 1905. 
In reality, however, Kant is far farther removed 
from Socialism than the French materialism of 
the eighteenth century. While according to these 
the Moral Law was determined by the condition 
of the state and society, so that the reform of 
morality rendered in the first place necessary the 
reform of the State and Society, and so the fight 
against immorality widened itself into a fight 
against the ruling powers ; according to Kant the 
society which exists in time and space is deter- 
mined by a moral law standing outside of time 
and space, which directs its commands to the in- 
dividual not the society. Is the morality of the 
individual imperfect, one must not lay the blame 
for that on the State and Society, but in the fact 
that man is not entirely angel, but half animal and 
consequently always being drawn down by his 
animal nature, against which he can only fight 
through the raising and the purifying of his own 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 57 

inner man. The individual must improve himself 
if the Society is to be improved. 

It is clear that Socialism takes peculiar forms 
if v^e look on Kant as its founder. This peculi- 
arity will be in no way diminished when we ob- 
serve the farther development of the moral law 
by him. From the moral law springs the con- 
sciousness of Personality, and the dignity of man, 
and the phrase : " Act so, that you, as well in 
your own person as in the person of every other, 
at all times look on man as end, and never simply 
as a means." 

" In those words," says Cohen (pp. 303-4) " is 
the deepest and most far-reaching sense of 
the categoric imperative brought to expression; 
they contain the moral programme of the new 
time and the entire future world history. The 
idea of the final (or end) advantage of Humanity 
becomes thereby transformed into the idea of 
Socialism, by which every man is defined as a 
final end, as an end in itself." 

The programme of the " entire future world 
history " is conceived in somewhat narrow fash- 
ion. The " timeless moral law, that man ought 
to be an end, and at no time simply a means, has 
itself only an " end " in a society in which men 
are used by other men simply as means to their 
ends. In a communist society, this possibility 
disappears and with that goes the necessity of 



58 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

the Kantian Programme for the " entire future 
world history." What becomes then of this? 
We have then in the future either no Socialism, 
or no world history to expect. 

The Kantian Moral Law was a protest against 
the very concrete feudal society with its personal 
relations of dependency. The would-be " social- 
ist " principle which fixes the Personality and 
Worth of men is accordingly just as consistent 
with Liberalism or Anarchism as with Socialism, 
and contains, in no greater degree any new idea 
than the one already quoted, of the universal 
legislation. It amounts to the philosophical form- 
ula for the idea of *' Freedom, Equality and Fra- 
ternity " already then developed by Rousseau, 
and which, moreover, was to be found in primi- 
tive Christianity. The only thing Kantian, even 
here, is simply the mere form in which this prin- 
ciple is proved. 

The dignity of Personality is namely derived 
from the fact, that it is a part of a super-sensuous 
world, that as a moral being it stands outside 
nature and over nature. Personality is " Free- 
dom and Independence from the mechanism of 
the entire nature," so that " the person as belong- 
ing to the world of sense is subordinate to its own 
personality, so far as it belongs to the world of 
intelligence." Thus it is not then to be wondered 
if man^ as belonging to both worlds, is obliged to 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 59 

look on his own being with regard to its second 
and highest quaHfication, not otherwise than with 
respect and to conceive the greatest respect for 
the laws of the same. With that we would be 
happily arrived again at the primitive Christian 
argument for the equality of all men, which neces- 
sarily arises from the fact that we are all children 
of God. 

III. FREEDOM AND NECESSITY 

Meanwhile, reject as we must the assumption 
of the two worlds to which, according to Plato 
and Kant, man belongs, it is nevertheless true that 
man lives at the same time in two worlds, and the 
moral law inhabits one of them, which is not the 
world of experience. But all the same even this 
world is no super-sensuous one. The two worlds, 
in which man lives^ are the Past and the Future. 
The Present forms the boundary of the two. His 
whole experience lies in the past, all experience 
is past, and all the connecting links which past 
experience shows him lie with inevitable necessity 
before, or still more, behind him. In these there 
is nothing more left to alter, he can do nothing 
more in regard to them than recognize their ne- 
cessity. Thus is the world of experience the 
world of knowing, and the world of necessity. 

It is otherwise with the Future. Of it I have 



6o ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

not the smallest experience. Apparently free it 
lies before me, as the world which I do not ex- 
plore as one knowing it, but in which I have to 
assert myself as an active agent. Certainly I can 
extend the experience of the past into the future, 
certainly I can conclude that these will be even 
so necessarily determined as those, but even if I 
can only recognize the world on the assumption 
of necessity, yet I shall only be able to act in it 
on the assumption of a certain Freedom. Even if 
compulsion is exercised over my actions, there 
remains to me the choice, whether I shall yield to 
it, or not, there remains to me as last resort the 
possibility of withdrawing myself by a voluntary 
death. Action implies continual choice between 
various possibilities, and be it alone that of doing 
or not doing, it means accepting or rejecting, it 
means defending and opposing. Choice, however, 
assumes in advance the possibility of choice just 
as much as the distinction between the acceptable 
and the inacceptable, the good and the bad. The 
moral judgment, which is an absurdity in the 
world of the past, the world of experience, in 
which there is nothing to choose, where iron ne- 
cessity rules, is unavoidable in the world of the 
unknown future — of freedom. 

But not simply the feeling of freedom is as- 
sumed by action, but also certain aims. If in 
the world of the past, the sequence of cause and 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 6 1 

effect (causality) rules, so in the world of ac- 
tion, of the future; the thought of aim (Teleol- 
ogy). For action the feeling of freedom is an 
indispensable psychological necessity, which is 
not to be got rid of by any degree of knowledge. 
Even the sternest Fatalism, even the deepest 
conviction that man is a necessary product of his 
circumstances, cannot bring it about that we 
cease to love, and to hate, to defend and attack. 

But all that is no monopoly of man but holds 
also of the animals. Even these have freedom 
of the will, in the sense that man has, namely as 
a subjective, inevitable feeling of freedom, which 
springs from ignorance of the future and the ne- 
cessity of exercising a direct influence on it. 

And just in the same way they have command 
of a certain insight into the connection of cause 
and effect. Finally the conception of an end is 
not quite strange to them. In respect of insight 
into the past and the necessity of nature on the 
one hand, and on the other in respect of the power 
of foreseeing the future, and the setting up of 
aims for their action the lowest specimens of hu- 
manity are distinguished far less from the ani- 
mals than from civilized men. 

The setting up of aims is not, however, any- 
thing which exists outside the sphere of necessity, 
of cause and effect. Even though I set up aims 
for myself only in the future, in the sphere of 



62 ETHICS AND THE AIATERIALIST 

apparent freedom, yet the act of setting up aims 
itself, from the very moment when I set up the 
aim, belongs to the past, and can thus in its neces- 
sity be recognized as the result of distinct causes. 
That is not in any way altered by the fact that 
the attainment of the end is still in the future, 
in the sphere of uncertainty, thus in this sense 
in that of freedom. Let the attainment of the end 
be assumed as ever so far distant, the setting up 
of the aim itself lies in the past. In the sphere of 
freedom there lie only those aims which are not 
yet set up, of which we do not even know any- 
thing as yet. 

The world of conscious aims is thus not the 
world of freedom in opposition to that of neces- 
sity. For each of the aims which we set our- 
selves, just as for each one of the means which 
we apply to its attainment, the causes are already 
given and are under certain circumstances recog- 
nizable as those which brought about the setting 
up of these aims and determined the way in which 
that was to be achieved. 

It is impossible, however, to distinguish the 
realm of necessity and that of freedom simply as 
past and future; their distinction often coincides 
also with that of nature and society, or to be 
more exact, of society and that other nature from 
which the former displays only one particular and 
peculiar portion. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 63 

If we look at nature in the narrower sense, as 
apart from Society and then both in their relation 
to the future, we find at once a serious difference. 
The natural conditions change much slower than 
the Social. And the latter are at the period when 
men commence to philosophise, at the period of 
the production of wares, of a highly complicated 
nature, whereas there are in nature a large num- 
ber of simple processes, whose subjection to law 
can be relatively easily perceived. 

The consequence is, that despite our apparent 
freedom of action in the future, this action, never- 
theless as far as nature is concerned comes to be 
looked on as determined at an early period. Dark 
as the future lies before me, I know of a certainty 
that summer will follow winter, that to-morrow 
the sun will rise, that to-morrow I shall have 
hunger and thirst, that in winter the need for 
warming myself will occur to me, and that my 
action will never be directed to escaping these 
natural necessities, but with the idea of satisfying 
them. Thus I recognize, despite all apparent free- 
dom that in face of nature my action is neces- 
sarily conditioned. The constitution of nature 
external to us and of my own body produce neces- 
sities which force on me a certain willing and 
acting which being given according to experience 
can be reckoned with in advance. 

It is quite otherwise with my conduct to my 



64 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

fellow men, my social actions. In this case the 
external and internal causes, which necessarily 
determine my action, are not so easy to recognize. 
Here I meet with no overpowering forces of na- 
ture, to which I am obhged to submit myself, but 
with factors on a level with myself, men like 
myself, who by nature have no more strength 
th^n I have. Over against these I feel myself 
to be free, but they also appear to me to be free 
in their relations to their fellow men. Towards 
them I feel love and hate, and on them and my 
relations to them I make moral judgments: 

The world of freedom and of the moral law 
is thus certainly another than that of recognized 
necessity, but it is no timeless and spaceless and 
no super-sensual world, but a particular portion 
of the world of sense seen from a particular 
point of view. It is the world as seen in its ap- 
proach to us, the world on which we have to 
work, which we have to rearrange, before all. 

But what is to-day the future will be to-morrow 
past; thus what to-day is felt to be free action 
will be recognized to-morrow as necessary action. 
The moral law in us, which regulates this action, 
ceases, however, with that to appear as an un- 
caused cause, it falls into the sphere of experience 
and can be recognized as the necessary effect of a 
cause — and only as such cause are we at all able 
to recognize it, or can it become an object of 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 65 

Science. In that he transferred the moral from 
the " this side," the sensual world, to the " other 
side," the super-sensual world, Kant has not ad- 
vanced the scientific knowledge of it, but has 
closed all access to it. This obstacle must be got 
rid of before everything else, we must rise above 
Kant if we are to bring the problem of the moral 
law nearer to its solution. 



IV. THE PHILOSOPHY OF RECONCILIATION 

The Ethic forms the weakest side of the Kant- 
ian Philosophy. And all the same it is just 
through the Ethic that it has won its greatest 
success, because it met very powerful needs of the 
time. 

The French Materialism had been a philosophy 
of the fight against the traditional methods of 
thought, and consequently against the institutions 
which rested on them. An irreconcilable hatred 
against Christianity made it the watchword, not 
only of the fight against the church, but of that 
against all the social and political forces which 
were bound up with it. 

Kant's Critique of the Pure Reason equally 
drives Christianity from out of the Temple; but 
the discovery of the origin of the moral law, 
which is brought about by the Critique of the 
Practical Reason, opens for it again the door with 



^ ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

all due respect. Thus through Kant, Philosophy 
became, instead of a weapon of the fight against 
the existing methods of thought and institutions, 
a means of reconciling the antagonisms. 

But the way of development is that of struggle. 
The reconciliation of antagonisms implies the 
stoppage of development. Thus the Kantian 
Philosophy became a conservative factor. 

The greatest advantage thereby was drawn by 
theology. It emancipated this from the quandary, 
into which the traditional belief had fallen 
through the development of science, in that it 
rendered it possible to reconcile science and re- 
ligion. 

" No other science," says Zeller, '^ experienced 
the influence of the Kantian Philosophy in a 
higher degree than the Theology. Here Kant 
found the soil best prepared for his principles; 
with that, however, he brought to the traditional 
methods of thought a reform and an increase in 
depth, which it was badly in need of. (Geschichte 
der deutschen Philosophie, 1873, p. 519.) 

Just after the outbreak of the French Revolu- 
tion a specially strong need arose for a theology, 
which was in a position to hold its own against 
materialism, and to drive it out of the field among 
educated people. Zeller writes then further. 

" Kant's religious views corresponded exactly 
both to the moral and intellectual need of the 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 6/ 

time; it recommended itself to the enlightened 
by its reasonableness, its independence of the 
positive, its purely practical tendency; to the re- 
ligious by its moral severity and its lofty concep- 
tions of Christianity and its founder." German 
theology from now on took Kant as their au- 
thority. " His Moral Theology became after a 
few years the foundation on which Protestant 
theology in Germany almost without exception, 
even the Catholic to a very large extent, was 
built up. The Kantian Philosophy, exercised for 
that reason, that the majority of German theo- 
logians for close on fifty years took their start 
from it, a highly permanent and far-reaching in- 
fluence on the general education. 

Vorlander quotes in his History of Philosophy 
(Leipzig 1903) the word of a modern German 
Theologian, Ritschl, who declared: 

" Thus the development of the method of 
knowledge by Kant implied at the same time a 
practical rebirth of Protestantism. (Vol. H, p. 
476.)" 

The great Revolution created the soil for the 
influence of Kant, which was strongest in the 
two decades after the Terror. Then this influ- 
ence became paler and paler. The Bourgeoisie 
acquired after the thirties, even in Germany, 
strength and courage for more decided struggles 
against the existing forms of State and thought, 



68 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

and to an absolute recognition of the world 
of the senses as the only real one. Thus through 
the Hegelian dialectic there arose new forms of 
Materialism, and just in the most vigorous form 
in Germany, for the very reason that their Bour- 
geoisie was well behind that of France and Eng- 
land ; because they had not conquered the existing 
state machine; because they had that still to up- 
set, therefore they required a fighting philosophy 
and not one of reconciliation. 

In the last decades, however, their desire to 
fight has greatly diminished. Even though they 
have not attained all that they wish, yet they 
have all which was necessary for their develop- 
ment. Further struggles on a large scale, ener- 
getic fights against the existing, must be of much 
less use to them than to their great enemy, the 
proletariat, that grew in a most menacing fashion 
and now for its part required a fighting philoso- 
phy. This was so much the more susceptible to 
the influence of materialism, the more the de- 
velopment of the world of the senses showed the 
absurdity of the existing order and the necessity 
of its victory. 

The Bourgeoisie, on the other hand, became 
more and more susceptible to a philosophy of re- 
conciliation, and thus Kantism was aroused to a 
fresh life. This resurrection was prepared in the 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 69 

reactionary period after 1848 by the then com- 
mencing influence of Schopenhauer. 

But in the last decade the influence of Kant has 
found its way into Economics and SociaHsm. 
Since the laws of Bourgeois Society, which were 
discovered by the Classical Economists, showed 
themselves more clearly as laws which made the 
class war and the disappearance of the Capitalist 
order necessary, the Bourgeois Economists took 
refuge in the Kantian Moral Code, which being 
independent of Time and Space must be in a 
position to reconcile the class antagonisms and 
prevent -the Revolutions which take place in 
Space and Time. 

Side by side with the ethical school in Econom- 
ics we got an ethical Socialism, when endeavors 
were made in our ranks to modify the class an- 
tagonisms, and to meet at least a section of the 
Bourgeoisie half way. This policy of Reconcilia- 
tion also began with the cry : Back to Kant ! And 
with a repudiation of materialism, since it denies 
the Freedom of the Will. 

Despite the categoric imperative, which the 
Kantian Ethic cries to the individual, its historical 
and social tendency, from the very beginning on 
till today, has been that of toning down, of recon- 
ciling the antagonisms, not of overcoming them 
through struggle. 



70 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 



CHAPTER IV 

The Ethic of Darwinism 

i. the struggle for existence 

Kant, like Plato, had divided mankind into two 
parts, a natural and a supernatural, an animal and 
an angelic. But the strong desire to bring the 
entire world, including cur intellectual functions, 
under a unitary conception, and to exclude all 
factors besides the natural from it, or in other 
words the materialist micthod of thought, was too 
deeply grounded in the circumstances for Kant 
to be able to paralyze it for any length of time. 
And the splendid progress made by the natural 
sciences, which began just at the very time of 
Kant's death to make a spurt forwards, brought 
a series of new discoveries, which more and more 
filled up the gap between man and the rest of 
nature, and among other things revealed the 
fact that the apparently angelic in man was also 
to be seen in the animal world, and thus was of 
animal nature. 

All the same the Materialist Ethics of the nine- 
teenth century, so far as it was dominated by 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 7I 

the conceptions of natural science, equally in the 
bold and outspoken form which it took in Ger- 
many, as well as in the more retiring and modest 
English, and even now French version, did not 
get beyond that which the eighteenth century had 
taught. Thus Feuerbach founded morality on 
the desire for happiness, Auguste Comte, the 
founder of Positivism, took on the other hand 
from the English the distinction between moral 
or altruistic feelings, and the egoistical, both of 
which are equally rooted in human nature. 

A great and decided advance over this position 
was first made by Darwin, who proved in his 
book on the Descent of Man, that the altruistic 
feelings formed no peculiarity of man, that they 
are also to be found in the animal world, and 
that there, as here, they spring from similar 
causes, which are in essence identical and which 
have called forth and developed all the faculties 
of beings endowed with the power of moving 
themselves. With that almost the last barrier 
between man and animal was torn down. Darwin 
did not follow up his discoveries any further, and 
yet they belong to the greatest and most fruitful 
of the human intellect, and enable us to develop a 
new critique of knowledge. 

When we study the organic world, it shows to 
us, in contrast to the inorganic, one very striking 
peculiarity : We find in it adaptation to end. All 



^^2 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

organized beings are constructed and endowed 
more or less with a view to an end. The end 
which they serve is nevertheless not one which 
lies outside of them. The world as a whole has 
^no aim. The aim lies in the individuals them- 
selves, its parts are so arranged and fitted out, 
that they serve the individual, the whole. Pur- 
pose and division of labor arise together. The 
essence of the organism is the division of labor 
just as much as adaptation to end. One is the 
condition of the other. 

The division of labor distinguishes the organ- 
ism from inorganic individuals, for example, crys- 
tals. Even crystals are distinct individuals with 
a distinct form. They grow, when they find the 
necessary material for their formation under 
the requisite conditions, but they are through and 
through symmetrical. On the other hand the 
lowest organism is a vesicle much less visible 
and less complicated than a crystal, but a vesicle 
whose external side is different, and has different 
functions to the inner. 

That the division of labor is one which is 
suitable for the purpose, that is, one which is 
useful to the individual, renders his existence 
possible, or even ameliorates it, seems wonderful. 
But it would be still more wonderful if individ- 
uals maintained themselves and procreated with a 
division of labor which was not suitable for the 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 73 

purpose, which rendered their existence difficult 
or even impossible. 

But what is the work which the organs of the 
organism have to accomplish? This work is the 
struggle for life, that is, not the struggle with 
other organisms of the same kind, as the word is 
occasionally used, but the fight with the whole of 
nature. Nature is in continual movement and is 
always changing her forms, hence only such in- 
dividuals will be able to maintain their form for 
any period of time in this eternal change who 
are in a position to develop particular organs 
against those external influences which threaten 
the existence of the individual as well as to 
supply the place of those parts which it is obliged 
to give up continually to the external world. 
Quickest and best will those individuals and 
groups assert themselves, whose weapons of de- 
fence and instruments for obtaining food are the 
best adapted to their end, that is best adapted to 
the external w^orld, to avoid its dangers and to 
capture the sources of food. The uninterrupted 
process of adaptation, and the selection of the 
fittest, by means of the struggle for existence 
produce, under such circumstances as usually 
form themselves on the earth since it has bourne 
organized beings, an increasing division of labor. 
In fact the more developed the division of labor 
is in a society, the more advanced does that so- 



74 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

ciety appear to us. The continual process of ren- 
dering the organic world more perfect is thus 
the result of the struggle for existence in it — 
and that probably for a long time to come will be 
its future result, that is as long as the conditions 
of our planet do not essentially alter. Certainly 
we have no right to look on this process as a 
necessary law for all time. That would amount 
to imputing to the world an end which is not to 
be found in it. 

The development need not always proceed at 
the same rate. From time to time periods can 
come, when the various organisms, each in its 
way, arrive at the highest possible degree of 
adaptation to the existing conditions, that is, are 
in the most complete harmony with their sur- 
roundings. So long as these conditions endure 
they will develop no farther, but the form which 
has been arrived at will develop into a fixed 
type, which procreates itself unchanged. A 
further development will only then occur when 
the surroundings undergo a considerable altera- 
tion, when the inorganic nature is subject to 
changes which disturb the balance of the organic. 
Such changes, however, take place from time to 
time, either single, sudden and violent, or numer- 
ous and unnoticed, the sum total and effect of 
which, however, equally brings on new situations, 
as for example alterations in the ocean currents, 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 75 

in the surface of the earth, perhaps even in the 
position of the planet in the universe, which 
bring about chmatic changes, transform thick 
forests into deserts of sand, cover tropical land- 
scapes with icebergs and vice versa. These alter- 
ations render new adaptations to the changed 
conditions necessary, they produce migrations 
which likewise bring the organisms into new 
surroundings, and produce fresh struggles for 
life between the old inhabitants and the new 
incomers, exterminate the badly adapted and the 
unadaptable individuals and types, and create 
new divisions of labor, new functions and new 
organs or transform the old. It is not always 
the highest developed organisms which best as- 
sert themselves by this new adaptation. Every 
division of labor implies a certain one-sidedness. 
Highly developed organs, which are specially 
adapted for a particular method of life, are for 
another far less useful than organs which are 
less developed, and in that particular method of 
life less effective, but more many-sided and more 
easily adaptable. Thus we see often higher de- 
veloped kinds of animals and plants die out, and 
lower kinds take over the farther development of 
new higher organisms. Probably man is not 
sprung from the highest type of apes, the man 
apes, which are tending to die out, but from a 
lower species of four-handed animals. 



"J^i ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

II. SELF-MOVEMENT AND INTELLIGENCE 

At an early period the organisms divided them- 
selves into two great groups — those which de- 
veloped the organs of self motion, and those 
which lacked it, animals and plants. 

It is clear that the power of self movement 
is a mighty weapon in the struggle for life. It 
enables it to follow its food, to avoid danger, to 
bring its young into places where they will be 
best secured from dangers and which are best 
provided with food. 

Self motion, however, necessarily implies an 
intelligence, and vice versa. The one of these 
factors without the other is absolutely useless. 
Only in combination do they become a weapon 
in the struggle for life. The power of self-move- 
ment is completely useless, when it is not com- 
bined with a power to recognize the world in 
which I have to move myself. What use would 
the legs be to the stag, if he had not the power 
to recognize his enemies and his food grounds ? 
On the other hand, for a plant intelligence of 
any kind would be useless. Were the blade of 
grass able to see, hear or smell the approaching 
cow, that would not in the least help it to avoid 
being eaten. 

Self-movement and intelligence thus neces- 
sarily go together, one without the other is use- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 'J'J 

less. Wherever these faculties may spring from, 
they invariably come up together and develop 
themselves jointly. There is no self-movement 
without intelligence, and no intelligence without 
self-movement. And together they serve the 
same ends, the securing and alleviation of the 
individual existence. 

As a means to that they and their organs are 
developed and perfected by the struggle for life, 
but only as a means thereto. Even the most 
highly developed intelligence has no capacities 
which would not be of use as weapons in the 
struggle for existence. Thus is explained the 
one-sidedness and the peculiarity of our intelli- 
gence. 

To recognize . things in themselves may ap- 
pear to many philosophers an important task ; 
for our existence it is highly indifferent, what- 
ever we have to understand by the thing in itself. 
On the other hand for every being endowed with 
power of movement it is of the greatest import- 
ance to rightly distinguish the things and to 
recognize their relations to one another. The 
sharper his intelligence in this respect the better 
service will it do him. For the existence of the 
singing bird it is quite indifferent what those 
things may be in themselves which appear to it 
as a berry, a hawk, or a thunder cloud. But in- 
dispensable is it for his existence to distinguish 



78 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

exactly berries, hawks, and clouds from the other 
things among his surroundings, since that alone 
puts him in a position to find his food, to escape 
the enemy, and to reach shelter in time. It is 
thus inevitable that the intelligence of the animal 
should be a power of distinguishing in space. 

But just as indispensable is it to recognize the 
sequence of the things in time, and indeed their 
necessary sequence as cause and effect. Since the 
movement as cause can only bring as a universal 
result the maintenance of existence, if it aims at 
special more immediate or remoter effects which 
are so much the more easily to be achieved, the 
better the individual has got to learn these effects 
with their causes. To repeat the above example 
of a bird, it is not sufficient that it should knov^ 
how to distinguish berries, hawks, and thunder 
clouds from the other things in space, it must 
also know that the enjoyment of the berries has 
the effect of satisfying its hunger, that the ap- 
pearance of the hawk will have the effect that the 
first small bird which it can grasp will serve it 
as food, and that the rising thunder clouds pro- 
duce storm, rain, and hail as results. 

Even the lowest animal, so soon as it possesses 
a trace of ability to distinguish and self move- 
ment, developes a suspicion of causality. If the 
earth shakes, that is a sign for the worm that 
danger threatens and an incentive to flight. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 79 

Thus if the intelhgence is to be of use to 
the animal in its movements it must be organized 
so that it is in a position to show him the dis- 
tinctions in time and space as well as the causal 
connections. 

But it must do even more. All the parts of the 
body serve only one individual, only one end, the 
maintenance of the individual. The division of 
labor must never go so far that the individual 
parts become independent, because that would 
lead to the dismemberment of the individual. They 
will work so much the more efficiently, the tight- 
er the parts are held together, and the more 
uniform the word of command. From this fol- 
lows the necessary unity of the consciousness. 
If every part of the body had its own intellectual 
organs, or did each of the senses which conveys 
to us a knowledge of the outer world produce its 
own consciousness, then would all knowledge of 
the world in such a case and the cooperation of 
the various members of the body be much im- 
peded, the advantages of the division of labor 
would be aboHshed, or changed into disadvan- 
tages, the support which the senses or the organs 
of movement mutually give to each other would 
cease and there would come instead mutual hin- 
drance. 

Finally, however, the intelligence must possess 
in addition the power to gather experiences and 



8o ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

to compare. To return once more to our singing 
bird, he has two ways open to him to find out 
what food is the best for him and where it is 
easiest to be found ; w^hat enemies are dangerous 
for him and how to escape them. One, his own 
experience, the other the observation of other 
and older birds, who have already made experi- 
ence. No master is, as is well known, born. 
Every individual can so much the easier maintain 
himself in the struggle for life, the greater his 
experience and the better arranged they are; to 
that, however, belongs the gift of memory and 
the capacity to compare former impression with 
later, and to extract from the common and uni- 
versal element, to separate the essential from the 
unessential, that is : to think. Does observation 
communicate to us the differences, the particular 
factor through the senses, so does thinking tell 
us the common factor, the universal element in 
the things. 

" The universal," says Dietzgen, " is the con- 
tent of all concepts, of all knowledge, of all sci- 
ence, of all acts of thought. Therewith the anal- 
ysis of the organ of thought exhibits the latter, 
as the power to investigate the universal in the 
particular." 

All these qualities of the intellectual powers, 
we find developed in the animal world, even if 
not in so high a degree as in men, and they are 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 8l 

often for us difficult to recognize, since it is 
no^ always easy to distinguish conscious actions 
springing from intelligence, from the involuntary 
and unconscious actions, simple reflex actions and 
instinctive movements which even in men play a 
great role. 

If we find all these qualities of the intellectual 
faculties to be a necessary concomitant of the 
power of self movement already in the animal 
world, so do we, on the other hand, find in the 
same qualities also the same limitations which 
even the most embracing and most penetrating 
understanding of the highly developed civilized 
man cannot surmount. 

Forces and capacities which were acquired as 
weapons in the battle for existence can naturally 
be made available for other purposes as well, 
besides those of rendering existence secure, when 
the organism has brought its power of self move- 
ment and its intelligence, as well as its instincts 
of which we will soon speak, to a high enough 
degree of development. The individual can em- 
ploy the muscles, which were developed in it 
for the purpose of snatching its booty, or ward- 
ing off the foe, as well for dancing and playing. 
But their particular character is obtained by these 
powers and capacities all the same, only f ^-om the 
struggle for life which developed them. Play 
and dance develop no particular muscles. 



%o 



^ 



82 ETHICS AND THE AIATERIALIST 

That holds good also of the intellectual powers 
and faculties. Each was developed as a necessary 
supplement to the power of self-movement in the 
struggle for life, in order to render possible to the 
organism the most suitable movement in the sur- 
rounding world for its own preservation, yet it 
could all the same be made to serve other pur- 
poses. To these belong also pure knowing with- 
out any practical thoughts in the background, 
without regard for the practical consequences 
which it can bring about. But our intellectual 
powers have not been developed by the struggle 
for existence, to become an organ of pure knowl- 
edge, but only to be an organ which regulates our 
movements in conformity with their purpose. 
The more completely it functions in respect of the 
latter, the more incomplete is it in the first. 
From the very beginning most intimately connect- 
ed with the power of self movement, it develops 
itself completely only in mutual dependence on the 
power of self movement and can only be brought 
to perfection in this connection. Also the power 
of the human faculties of cognition and human 
knowledge is most intimately bound up with hu- 
man practice, as we shall see. 

It is the practice, however, which guarantees 
to us the certainty of our knowledge. 

So soon as my knowledge enables me to bring 
about distinct efi'ects, the production of which 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 83 

lies in my power, the relation of cause and effect 
ceases for me to be simply chance or simple ap- 
pearance, or simple forms of knowledge, as the 
pure contemplation and thought might well de- 
scribe them. The knowledge 'of this relation be- 
comes, through the practice, a knowledge of 
something real and is raised to certain knowledge. 

The boundaries of practice witness certainly 
to the boundaries of our certain knowledge. 

That theory and practice are dependent on one 
another and only through the mutual permeation 
of the one by the other can at any time the high- 
est result attainable be arrived at, is only an out- 
come of the fact that movement and intellectual 
powers, from their earliest beginnings, were 
bound to go together. In the course of the de- 
velopment of human society the division of labor 
has brought it about that the natural unity of 
these two factors would be destroyed, and created 
classes to whom principally the movement, and 
others to whom principally the knowing, fell. 
We have already pointed out how this was re- 
flected in philosophy, through the creation of two 
worlds, a higher or intellectual, and a lower or 
bodily. 

But wholly were the two functions naturally 
in no individual to be divided, and the proletariat 
movement of today is directing its energies with 
good effect to abolishing this distinction and with 



84 ETHICS AXD THE MATERIALIST 

it also the dualist philosophy, the philosophy of 
pure knowledge. Even the deepest, most abstract 
knowledge, which apparently is farthest removed 
from the practical, influence this, and are influ- 
enced by it, and to bring in us this influence to 
consciousness becomes the duty of a critique 
of human knowledge. As before, knowledge re- 
mains in the last resort always a weapon in the 
struggle for existence, a means to give to our 
movements, be they movements in nature or 
society, the most suitable forms and directions. 

" Philosophers have only interpreted the world 
diflferently," said Marx. " The great thing, how- 
ever, is to change it." 

III. THE MOTIVES OF SELF MAINTENANCE AND 
PROPAGATION 

Both powers of self movement and of knowing 
belong inseparably together as weapons in the 
struggle for existence. The one developed itself 
along with the other, and in the degree in which 
these weapons win in importance in the organism, 
do the other more primitive ones, which are less 
necessary, as for example, that of fruitfulness 
and of vitality diminish. On the other hand, to 
the degree that these diminish must the import- 
ance of the first named factors for the struggle 
for life increase, and it must call forth their 
greater development. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 85 

But self movement and knowledge form by 
themselves by no means a sufficient weapon in 
the struggle. Of wdiat use is merely the strong- 
est muscles, the most agile joints, the sharpest 
senses, the greatest understanding, in this strug- 
gle, if I do not feel in me the impulse to employ 
them to my preservation — if the sight of food 
or the knowledge of danger leaves me indifferent 
and awakes no emotion in me? Self movement 
and intellectual capacity first, then, become weap- 
ons in the struggle for existence, if with them 
there arises a longing for the self preservation 
of the organism, which brings it about that all 
knowledge which is of importance for its exist- 
ence at once produces the will to carry out the 
movement necessary for its existence, and there- 
with calls forth this movement. 

Self movement and intellectual powers are 
without importance for the existence of the indi- 
vidual without his instinct of self preservation, 
just as this latter again is of no importance with 
both the former factors. All three are most inti- 
mately bound up with each other. The instinct of 
self preservation is the most primitive of the 
animal instincts and the most indispensable. 
Without it no animal species endowed in any 
degree with the power of self movement and a 
faculty of intelligence could maintain itself even 
a short time. It rules the entire life of the ani- 



86 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

mal. The same social development, which as- 
cribes the care of the intellectual faculties to 
particular classes, and the practical movement to 
others, and produces in the first an elevation of 
the " spirit " over the gross " matter," goes so 
far in the process of isolating the intellectual 
faculties, that the latter, out of contempt for the 
*' mechanical " practice which serves for the 
maintenance of life, comes to despise life itself. 
But this kind of knowledge has never as yet been 
able to overcome the instinct of self preservation, 
and to paralyze the " practise " which serves for 
the maintenance of life. Although many a suicide 
be philosophically grounded, we always, in every 
practical act of the denial of life, finally meet with 
disease or desperate social circumstances as the 
cause, but not a philosophical theory. Mere phi- 
losophizing cannot overcome the instinct of self 
preservation. 

But if this is the most primitive and widely 
spread of all instincts it is still not the only one. 
It serves only for the maintenance of the individ- 
ual. However long this may endure, finally it 
disappears without leaving any trace of its in- 
dividuality behind, if it has not reproduced itself. 
Only those species of organisms will assert them- 
selves in the struggle for existence, who leave a 
progeny behind them. 

Now with the plants and the lower animals re- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 8/ 

production is a process which demands no power 
of self movement and no faculty of intelligence. 
That changes, however, with the animals so soon 
as reproduction becomes a sexual act, in which 
two individuals are concerned, who have to unite 
in order to lay either eggs and seeds (sperm) 
on the same spot outside of the body, or to 
incorporate the sperm in the body of the individ- 
ual carrying the eggs. That demands a will, an 
impulse to find each other, to unite. Without 
that can the non-sexual propagation not take 
place, the stronger it is in the periods favorable 
for reproduction, so much the sooner will it take 
place, so much the better will be the prospects 
of a progeny, for the maintenance of the species. 
On the other hand these prospects are bad for 
individuals and species in whom the impulse for 
self reproduction is weakly developed. From a 
given degree of the development consequently 
natural selection must develop through the 
struggle for life an outspoken impulse to repro- 
duction in the animal world and ever more 
strengthen it. 

But it does not always suffice to the attainment 
of a numerous progeny. We have seen that in 
the degree in which self movement and intellect- 
ual powers grow, the number of the germs, which 
the individual produces, as well as its vitality, 
have a tendency to diminish. On the other hand 



88 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

the greater the division of labor, the more compli- 
cated the organism, the longer the period which 
is requisite for its development and its attainment 
to maturity. Even if a part of this period is laid 
in the maternal body, that has its limits. Even 
from considerations of space is this body not in 
a position to bear an organism as big as itself. It 
must expel the young long before that period is 
arrived at. From the young animals, however, 
the capacities for self movement and intelligence 
are the latest achieved, and they are mostly very 
weakly developed as they leave the protecting 
cover of the Qgg or the maternal body. The egg 
expelled by the mother is completely without mo- 
tion and intelligence. Then the care for the 
progeny becomes an important function of the 
mother: the hiding and defence of the eggs and 
of the young, the feeding of the latter, etc. As 
the impulse for reproduction, so is it with the 
love for the young, especially in the animal world 
is the maternal love developed as an indispensable 
means, from a certain stage of the development 
on, to secure the perpetuation of the species. 
With the impulse towards individual self preser- 
vation these impulses have nothing to do: they 
often come into conflict with it, and they can be 
so strong that they overcome it. It is clear that 
under otherwise equal conditions, those individ- 
uals and species have the best prospect of repro- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 89 

ducing themselves and handing on their qualities 
and impulses in whom the impulse of self main- 
tenance is not able to diminish the impulse to 
reproduce and protect the progeny. 

IV. THE SOCIAL INSTINCT 

Besides these instincts which are peculiar to 
the higher animals, the struggle for life develops 
in particular kinds of animals still others, which 
are special and conditioned by the peculiarity of 
their method of life, for example, the migratory 
instinct, which we will not farther study. Here 
we are interested in another kind of instinct 
which is of very great importance for our sub- 
ject: the social instinct. 

The cooperation of similar organisms in larger 
crowds is a phenomenon which we can discover 
quite in their earliest stages : the microbes. It 
is explained alone by the simple fact of reproduc- 
tion. If the organisms have no self movement, 
the progeny will consequently gather round the 
producer, if they are not by any chance borne 
away by the movements of the external world, 
water currents, winds, and phenomena of that 
sort. The apple falls, as is well known, not far 
from the stem, and when it is not eaten, and 
falls on fruitful soil, there grow from the pips 
young trees, which keep the old tree company. 



90 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

But even in animals with power of self-move- 
ment it is very natural that the young should 
remain with the old, if no external circumstances 
supply a ground for them to remove themselves. 
The living together of individuals of the same 
species, the most primitive form of social life, is 
also the most primitive forms of life itself. The 
division of organisms, which have a common 
origin, is a later act. 

The separation can be brought about by the 
most diverse causes. The most obvious, and 
certainly the most effective, is the lack of sus- 
tenance. Each locality can only yield a certain 
quantity of food. If a certain species of animals 
multiplies beyond the limits of their food supply, 
the superfluous ones must either emigrate or 
starve. Above a certain number the numbers of 
organisms living in one place can not go. 

But there are certain species of animals, for 
whom the isolation, the division in individual 
pairs, who live only for themselves, for whom 
such a life affords an advantage in the struggle 
for existence. Thus, for example, for the cat 
species, which lie in wait for their booty and take 
it with an unexpected spring. This method of 
acquiring their sustenance would be made more 
difficult, if not impossible, if they circulated in 
herds. The first spring on the booty would drive 
all the game away for all the others. For wolves 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY QI 

which do not come unexpectedly on their prey, 
but worry it to death, the foregathering in herds 
affords an advantage ; one hunts the game to the 
other, which blocks for it the way. The cat 
nevertheless hunts more successfully alone. 

On the other hand again there are animals 
who choose isolation because in this fashion they 
are less conspicuous and can easiest hide them- 
selves, soonest escape the foe. The traps set by 
man have, for example, had the effect that many 
animals which formerly lived in societies, are 
now only to be found isolated, such as the beavers 
in Europe. That is the only way for them to 
remain unnoticed. 

On the other hand, however, there are numer- 
ous animals which draw advantage from their 
social life. They are seldom beasts of prey. 
We have mentioned the wolf above. But even 
they only hunt in bands when food is scarce, in 
winter. In summer when it is easier to get, they 
live in pairs. The nature of the beast of prey 
is always inclined to fighting and violence, and 
consequently does not agree well with its equals. 

The herbivora are more peaceful from the very 
manner in which they obtain their food. That 
very fact of itself renders it easier for them to 
herd together, or to remain together, because they 
are more defenceless, they win, however, through 
their greater numbers, new weapons in the strug- 



92 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

gle for life. The union of many weak forces in 
common action can produce a new and greater 
force. Then through union the greater strength 
of certain individuals is used for the good of all. 
When the stronger ones fight now for themselves, 
they fight for the good of the weaker, when the 
more experienced look out for their own safety, 
find out for themselves feeding grounds, they do 
it also for the inexperienced. Now it becomes 
possible to introduce a division of labor among 
the united individuals, fleeting though it be, yet 
it increases their strength and their safety. It is 
impossible to watch the neighborhood with the 
most complete attention and at the same time to 
feed peacefully. Naturally during sleep all ob- 
servation of all kind comes to an end. But in 
society one watcher suffices to render the others 
safe during sleep or while eating. 

Through the division of labors the union of 
individuals becomes a body with different organs 
to cooperate to a given end, and this end is the 
maintenance of the collective body ; it becomes an 
organism. This is by no means to say that the 
new organism, society, is a body in the same way 
as an animal or a plant, but it is an organism of 
its own kind, which is far more widely distin- 
guished from those two than the animal from the 
plant. Both are made up from cells without 
power of self motion and without consciousness 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 93 

of their own ; society on the other hand from 
individuals with their own power of movement 
and consciousness. If, however, the animal or- 
ganism has, as a whole, a power of self motion 
and consciousness, they are lacking nevertheless 
to society as well as to the plant. But the indi- 
viduals which form the society can entrust indi- 
viduals among their members with functions 
through which the social forces are submitted to 
a uniform will, and uniform movements in the 
society are produced. 

On the other hand the individual and society 
are much looser connected than the cell and the 
whole organism, in both plant and animal. The 
individuals can separate itself from one society 
and join another as emigration proves. That is 
impossible for a cell ; for it the separation from 
the whole is death, if we leave certain cells of a 
particular kind out of account, such as the sper- 
ma and eggs in the procreative processes. Again 
society can forthwith impose on new individuals 
any change of form, without any change of sub- 
stance, which is impossible for an animal body. 
Finally the individuals who form society can, 
under circumstances, change the organs and or- 
ganization of society, while anything of that kind 
is quite impossible in an animal or vegetable 
organism. 

If, therefore, society is an organism, it is no 



94 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

animal organism, and to attempt to explain any 
phenomena peculiar to society from the laws of 
the animal organism is not less absurd than when 
the attempt is made to deduce peculiarities of the 
animal organism, such as self movement and 
consciousness, from the laws of vegetable being. 
Naturally this does not say there is not also 
something common to the various kinds of organ- 
isms. 

Just as the animal, so will also the social or- 
ganism survive so much the better in the struggle 
for existence the more unitary its movements, the 
stronger the binding forces, the greater the har- 
mony of the parts. But society has no fixed 
skeleton, which supports the weaker parts, no 
skin which covers the whole, no circulation of 
the blood which nourishes all the parts, no heart 
which regulates it, no brain which makes a unity 
out of its knowing, its working and its move- 
ments. Its unity and harmony, as well as the 
coherence can only arise from the actions and 
will of its members. This unitary will will, how- 
ever, be so much the more assured the more it 
springs from a strong impulse. 

Among species of animals, in whom the social 
bond becomes a weapon in the struggle for life, 
this encourages consequently social impulses 
which in many species and many individuals 
grow to an extraordinary strength, so that they 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 95 

can overcome the impulse of self preservation and 
reproduction when they come in conflict with the 
same. 

The commencement of the social impulse we 
can well look for in the interest which the simple 
fact of living together in society produces in the 
individuals for his fellows, to whose society he 
is accustomed from youth on. On the other hand 
reproduction and care for the progeny already 
render longer or shorter relations of a more inti- 
mate kind necessary between different individuals 
of the same species. And just as these relations 
have formed the starting point for the formation 
of societies, so could the corresponding impulses 
easily give the point of departure for the develop- 
ment of the social impulses. 

These impulses themselves can vary according 
to the varying conditions of the various species, 
but a row of impulses forms the requisite con- 
ditions for the growth of any kind of society. 
In the first place naturally comes altruism, self 
sacrifice for the whole. Then bravery in the de- 
fence of the common interests ; fidelity to the 
community; submission to the will of society; 
then obedience and discipline ; truthfulness to so- 
ciety whose security is endangered or whose ener- 
gies are wasted when they are misled in any way 
by false signals. Finally ambition, the sensibility 
to the praise and blame of society. These all are 



96 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

social impulses which we find expressed already 
among animal societies, many of them in a high 
degree. 

These social impulses are nevertheless nothing 
but the highest virtues, they sum up the entire 
moral code. At the most they lack the love for 
justice, that is the impulse for equality. For its 
development there certainly is no place in the 
animal societies, because they only know natural 
and individual inequality, and not those called 
forth by social relations, the social inequalities. 
The lofty moral law, that the comrade ought 
never to be merely a means to an end, which the 
Kantians look on as the most wonderful achieve- 
ment of Kant's genius, and as the moral pro- 
gramme of the modern era, and for the entire 
future history of the world, that is in the animal 
world a commonplace. The development of hu- 
man society first created a state of affairs in 
which the companion became a simple tool of 
others. 

What appeared to a Kant as the creation of 
a higher world of spirits, is a product of the 
animal world. How narrowly the social im- 
pulses have grown up with the fight for existence, 
and to what an extent they originally were useful 
in the preservation of species, can be seen from 
the fact that their effect often limits itself to indi- 
viduals whose maintenance is advantageous to the 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 97 

species. Quite a number of animals, which risk 
their Hves to save younger or weaker comrades, 
kill without a scruple sick or aged comrades who 
are superfluous for the preservation of the race, 
and are become a burden to society. The " moral 
sense," '' sympathy," does not extend to these 
elements. Even many savages behave like that. 

An animal impulse and nothing else is the 
moral law. Thence comes its mysterious nature, 
this voice in us which has no connection with 
any external impulse, or any apparent interest, 
this demon or god, which since Socrates and 
Plato, those moralists found in themselves who 
refused to deduce morality from self love or 
pleasure. Certainly a mysterious impulse, but 
not more mysterious than sexual love, the ma- 
ternal love, the instinct of self preservation, the 
being of the organism itself and so many other 
things, which only belong to the world of phe- 
nomena and which no one looks on as products 
of a supersensuous world. 

Because the moral law is the universal instinct, 
of equal force to the instinct of self preservation 
and reproduction, thence its force, thence its 
power which we obey without thought, thence 
our rapid decisions, in particular cases, whether 
an action is good or bad, virtuous or vicious; 
thence the energy and decision of our moral judg- 
ment, and thence the difficulty to prove it when 



gS ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

reason begins to analyze its grounds. Then one 
finally finds that to comprehend all means to 
pardon all, that everything is necessary, that 
nothing is good and bad. 

Not from our organs of knowing, but from our 
impulses comes the moral law and the moral 
judgment as well as the feeling of duty and the 
conscience. 

In many kinds of animals the social impulses 
attain such a strength, that they become stronger 
than all the rest. Do the former come in conflict 
with the latter, they then confront the latter with 
overpowering strength as commands of duty. 
Nevertheless that does not hinder in such a case 
a special impulse, say of self preservation or of 
reproduction being temporarily stronger than the 
social impulse and overcoming it. But is the 
danger past, then the strength of the self preserv- 
ing impulse or the reproductive instinct shrivels 
up, just as that of reproduction after the com- 
pletion of the act. The social instinct remains 
however, existing in the old force, regains the 
dominion over the individual and w^orks now in 
him as the voice of conscience and of repentance. 
Nothing is more mistaken than to see in con- 
science the voice of fright of his fellows, their 
opinion or even their power of physical compul- 
sion. It has effect even in respect of acts, which 
no one has heard of, even acts which appear to 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 99 

the neighbors very praiseworthy, it can even 
work as repugnance of acts which have been 
undertaken from fear of his fellows and their 
public opinion. 

Public opinion, praise and blame are certainly 
very influential factors. But their effect as- 
sumes in advance a certain social impulse, 
namely, ambition, they cannot produce the social 
impulses. 

We have no reason to assume that conscience 
is confined to man. We would find it difficult to 
find even in men, if everyone did not feel its effect 
on himself. Conscience is certainly a force, which 
does not obviously and openly show itself, but 
works only in the innermost being. 

But nevertheless many investigators have gone 
so far as to posit even in animals a kind of con- 
science. Thus says Darwin in his book " The 
Descent of Man." 

" Besides Love and Sympathy the animals 
show other qualities connected with the social in- 
stincts, which we should call moral in men ; and 
I agree with Agassiz that dogs have something 
very like a conscience. Dogs certainly have a 
certain power of self control, and this does not 
appear to be altogether a consequence of fear. 
As Braubach remarks, a dog will restrain itself 
from stealing food in the absence of its master." 

If conscience and feeling of duty are a conse- 



100 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

quence of the lasting predominance of the social 
impulses in many species of animals, if these im- 
pulses are those through which the individuals of 
such species are the most constantly and most 
enduringly determined, while the force of the 
other impulses is subject to great oscillations, 
yet the force of the social impulse is not free 
from all oscillations. One of the most peculiar 
phenomena is that social animals, when united 
in greater numbers, also feel stronger social im- 
pulses. It is for example a well known fact 
that an entirely different spirit reigns in a well 
filled meeting then in a weak, that the bigger 
crowd alone has an inspiring effect on the 
speaker. In a crowd the individuals are not only 
more brave, that could be explained through the 
greater support which each believes he will get 
from his fellows; they are also more unselfish, 
more self sacrificing, more enthusiastic. Cer- 
tainly then only too often so much the more 
calculating, cowardly and selfish when they find 
themselves alone. And that applies not only in 
men but also in the social animals. Thus 
Espinas, in his book, *' Animal Societies," quotes 
an observation of Forel. The latter found : 

" The courage of every ant, by the same form, 
increases in exact proportion to the number of 
its companions or friends, and decreases in exact 
proportion the more isolated it is from its com- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY lOI 

panions. Every inhabitant of a very populous 
ant heap, is much more courageous than a simi- 
lar one from a small population. The same fe- 
male worker, which will allow herself to be killed 
ten times in the midst of her companions, 
will show itself extraordinarily timid, avoid the 
least danger, fly before even a much weaker ant 
so soon as she finds herself twenty steps from her 
own home." 

With the stronger social feeling there need not 
necessarily be bound up a higher faculty of in- 
telligence. In general every instinct probably 
has the effect to somewhat obscure the exact ob- 
servation of the external world. What we wish, 
that we readily believe, but what we fear that 
we easily exaggerate. The instincts have the ef- 
fect that very easily many things appear dispro- 
portionately big or near, while others are over- 
looked. How blind and deaf the instinct for re- 
production can render many animals at times is 
well known. The social instincts which do not 
show themselves as a rule so acutely and inten- 
sively, generally obscure much less the intellec- 
tual faculties. They can, however, influence 
them very considerably on occasions. Think, for 
instance, on the influence of faithfulness, and dis- 
cipline among sheep, who follow their leading 
sheep blindly, wherever it may go. 

The moral law in us can lead our intellect 



102 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

astray just as any other impulse. In itself it is 
neither a product of wisdom nor does it produce 
wisdom. What is apparently the most elevated 
and divine in us, is essentially the same as that 
which we look on as the commonest and most 
devilish. The moral law is of the same nature as 
the instinct for reproduction. Nothing is more 
ridiculous, than when the former is put on a ped- 
estal and the latter is turned away with loathing 
and contempt. But no less false is it to infer that 
man can and ought to follow all his instincts 
without check. That is only so far true as it is 
impossible to condemn any one of these as such. 
But that by no means implies that they cannot 
come to cross purposes. It is simply impossible 
that any one should follow all his instincts with- 
out restraint, because they restrain one another. 
Which, however, at a given moment wins, and 
what consequences this victory brings for the 
individual and his society with it, there neither 
the Ethic of pleasure nor that of a moral law 
standing outside of space and time affords us 
any help. 

If, however, the moral law is recognized as 
a social impulse, which like all the impulses is 
brought out in us by the struggle for life, the 
supersensuous world has lost a strong sup- 
port in human thinking. The simple gods of 
Polytheism were already dethroned by natural 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I03 

Philosophy. If nevertheless a new Philosophy 
could arise which not only reawakened the belief 
in God and a supersensuous world but put it more 
firmly on a higher form, as was done in ancient 
times by Plato, and on the eve of the French 
Revolution by Kant, so did the cause lie in the 
unsolved problem of the moral law, to whose 
explanation neither its deduction from pleasure 
nor from the moral sense sufficed — and yet 
these offered the only " natural " causal explana- 
tion which seemed possible. Darwinism was the 
first to make an end to the division of man, which 
this rendered necessary, into a natural and animal 
on the one hand and a supernatural heavenly, on 
the other. 

But with that was the entire ethical problem 
not yet solved. Were moral impulse, duty and 
conscience as well as the ground type of the 
virtues to be explained from the social impulse, 
yet this breaks down when it is a question of 
explaining the moral idea. Of that there is not 
the least sign in the animal world. Only man 
can set himself ideals and follow them. 
Whence come these? Are they prescribed to 
the human race from the beginning of all time 
as an irrevocable demand of nature or an eternal 
Reason, as commands which man does not pro- 
duce but which confront man as a ruling force 
and show him the aims toward which he has ever 



104 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

more and more to strive? That was in the 
main the view of all thinkers of the i8th cen- 
tury, atheists as well as theists, materialists and 
idealists. This view took even in the mouth of 
.^ the boldest materialism the tendency to assume 
a supernatural Providence, which indeed had 
nothing more to do in nature but still hovers over 
human society. The evolution idea which recog- 
nized the descent of man from the animal world 
made this kind of idealism absurd in a material- 
istic mouth. 

All the same before Darwin founded his epoch- 
making work that theory had arisen which re- 
vealed the secret of the moral ideal. It was the 
theory of Marx and Engels. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY IO5 



CHAPTER V 

The Ethics of Marxism, 

I. THE ROOTS OF THE MATERIALIST CONCEPTION 
OF HISTORY, 

The rapid progress of the natural sciences 
since the French Revolution is intimately con- 
nected with the expansion of capitalism from 
that time on. The capitalist big industry rests 
more and more on the application of science and 
consequently had every reason to supply it with 
men and means. The modern technic gives to 
science not only new objects of activity but also 
new tools and new methods. The international 
communication finally brought new material to 
it. Thus it acquired strength and means to 
carry the idea of evolution successfully through. 

But even more than for natural science was 
the French Revolution an epoch of importance 
for the Science of society, the so-called mental 
sciences. Because in natural science the idea of 
evolution had already given a great stimulus to 
many thinkers. In mental science on the other 
hand it was only to be found in the most rudi- 



I06 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

mentary attempts. Only after the French Revo- 
lution could it develop in them. 

The mental sciences — Philosophy, Law, His- 
tory, Political Economy — had been for the ris- 
ing Bourgeoisie before the French Revolution in 
the first place a means of fighting the ruling pow- 
ers, social and political, which opposed them and 
had their roots in the past. To discredit the past, 
and to paint the new and coming in contrast to 
it, as the only good and useful, that formed the 
principal occupation of these sciences. 

That has altered since the Revolution. This 
gave the Bourgeoisie the essence of what they 
wanted. It revealed to them, however, social 
forces which wanted to go further than them- 
selves. These new forces began to be more dan- 
gerous than the relics of the deposed old. To 
come to an agreement with the latter became 
only a requirement of political sagacity on the 
part of the Bourgeoisie. Therewith, however, 
their opinion on the past was bound also to grow 
milder. 

On the other hand the Revolution had brought 
a great disillusionment to the Ideologues them- 
selves. Great as were its achievements for the 
Bourgeoisie, they were not up to the expectations 
of a harmonious empire of " morality," general 
well being, and happiness, such as had been 
looked for from the overthrow of the old. No 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 10/ 

one dared to build hopes on the new ; the more 
unsatisfactory the present, so much the more 
terrifying were the reminiscences of the most 
recent past which the present had brought to a 
head, so much the more bright did the farther 
past appear. That produced as is well known 
Romanticism in art. But it produced also simi- 
lar movements in the mental sciences. Men be- 
gan to study the past, not in order to condemn it, 
but to understand it; not to show up its absurd- 
ity, but to understand its reasonableness. 

But the Revolution had done its work too 
thoroughly for men to dream of re-establish- 
ing what had been set aside. Had the past been 
rational, so it was necessary to see that it had 
become irrational. The socially necessary and 
reasonable ceased with that to appear as an un- 
changeable conception. Thus arose the view of 
a social evolution. 

That applied first to the knowledge of German 
History. In Germany the above described pro- 
cess was most markedly to be seen. The revolu- 
tionary method of thought had never penetrated 
so deeply, had never struck such deep roots as in 
France, the Revolution had not worked so thor- 
oughly, had shaken the forces and opinions of 
the past in a less degree, and finally had appeared 
on the scene more as a disturbing than an eman- 
cipating element. 



I08 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

But to the Study of the German past there as- 
sociated itself the investigation of similar periods. 
In America the young community of the United 
States was already so far advanced, that there a 
separate class of intellectuals had already devel- 
oped a real American literature and science. 
What specially distinguished America from Eu- 
rope, was, however, the close contact of the cap- 
italist civilization of the white man w4th Indian 
barbarism. That was the object which especially 
attracted literature and sciences. Soon after the 
German romanticism there arose the American 
Indian romance and soon after the rise of the 
historical school of law, the revival of the old 
fairy tales and the world of legends, and the com- 
parative philological research in Germany, the 
scientiiic theory of the social and linguistic condi- 
tions of the Indians in America. 

At an earlier period, however, the settlement 
of the English in India had afforded the pos- 
sibility, nay, the necessity, of a study of the 
languages, the customs, the laws of these terri- 
tories. At the commencement of the nineteenth 
century the knowledge of Sanscrit had pene- 
trated as far as Germany, which laid the foun- 
dation for the comparative study of languages, 
which in its turn afforded the most valuable 
insight into the life of the Indo-Germanic 
peoples in primitive times. All this rendered it 



CONCEPTION OF IIISTOIvY IO9 

possible to treat the accounts given by civilized 
observers on primitive peoples as well as the 
discoveries of weapons and tools of disappeared 
races differently from formerly when they had 
been simply looked on as curiosities. They now 
became material to prolong the already revealed 
parts of human development still further into the 
past and to close up many of the gaps. 

In this entire historical work there was, how- 
ever, lacking the object which had up to then 
ruled the entire writing of history — the distin- 
guished human individual. In the written 
sources, from which formerly the knowledge of 
human history was exclusively culled, only the 
extraordinary had been related, because it was 
that only which seemed noteworthy to the chron- 
icler of the events of his time. Who cared to 
describe what was everyday, what everybody 
knew! The extraordinary man, the extraordi- 
nary event, such as wars and revolutions, alone 
seemed worth relating. Thus it was that for the 
traditional historians, who never got beyond writ- 
ing up from the sources handed down to them 
with more or less criticism, the big man was the 
motor power in history ; in the feudal period the 
king, the military commander, the religious 
founder, and the priests. In the eighteenth cen- 
tury these very men were branded by the Bour- 
geois intellectuals as the authors of all the evil 



110 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

in the world, and the philosophers on the other 
hand as legislators and teachers, as the only real 
instruments of progress. But all progress ap- 
pears to be only external, or simple change of 
clothes. That period in which the sources of his- 
torical writing began to flow more abundantly, 
the time of the victory of the Greeks over the 
Persian Invasion, was the culminating period of 
the social development. From that time on so- 
ciety in the lands round the Mediterranean began 
to decay, it went down and down till the Bar- 
barian Immigration. Only slowly have the peo- 
ples of Europe since then developed themselves 
again to a higher level socially, and even in the 
1 8th century they had not risen far above the 
lead of classical antiquity, so that in many points 
of politics, of philosophy, and especially of art 
the latter could rank as a pattern. 

History, as a whole, appeared simply as a rise 
and descent, a repetition of the same circle ; and 
just as the simple individual can set himself 
continually higher aims than he arrives at, be- 
cause as a rule he fails, so did this circle appear 
as a horrible tragi-comedy in which all that was 
most elevated and strongest was doomed to play 
wretched parts. 

Quite otherwise was it with primitive history. 
That with its individual departments, History of 
Law, Comparative Philology, Ethnology, foun-^ in 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY III 

the material which they worked up, not the ex- 
traordinary and the individual but the every day 
and commonplace described. But for that very 
reason can primitive history trace with certainty 
a line of continuous development. And the 
more her material grows, the more it is possible 
to compare like with like, the more it is discov- 
ered that this development is no chance, but ac- 
cording to law. The material which is at our 
disposal is on the one side facts of the technical 
arrangements of life, on the other of law, custom 
and religion. To them the law controlling this 
means nothing else than to bring technics into a 
causal connection with the legal, moral, and re- 
ligious conceptions without the help of extraor- 
dinary individuals or events. 

This connection was, however, discovered al- 
most simultaneously from another side, namely 
statistics. 

So long as the Parish was the most important 
economic institution, statistics were hardly re- 
quired. In the Parish it was easy to get a view 
of the state of affairs. But even if statistics 
were made there, they could scarcely suggest 
scientific observations, as with such small figures 
the law had no chance of showing itself. That 
was bound to alter, as the capitalist method of 
production created the modern states, which were 
not, like the earlier, simple bundles of communes 



112 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

or parishes and provinces, but unitary bodies with 
important economic functions. 

Besides that, however, the capitaHst method of 
production developed the state not simply to the 
inner market, but beside that created the world 
market. That produced highly complicated con- 
nections which were not to be controlled with- 
out the means of statistics. Founded for the 
practical purpose of tax gathering and raising 
of recruits, for customs, and finally for the In- 
surance societies, it gradually embraced wider 
and wider spheres and produced a mass of ob- 
servations on a large scale, which showed laws 
which must impress themselves on observant 
compilers of the material. In England this hap- 
pened at the end of the 17th century, when Petty 
arrived at a political arithmetic, in which, how- 
ever, " estimates " played a very big role. At 
the beginning of the nineteenth century the 
method of statistical enquiries was so complete 
and its sphere so varied that it was possible to 
discover with the greatest certainty the laws gov- 
erning the actions of great masses of men. The 
Belgian Quetelet made an attempt in the thirties, 
to describe in this manner the physiology of 
human society. 

They saw that the determining element in the 
alterations of human action was always a ma- 
terial change, usually an economic one. Thus 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY II3 

was the decrease and increase of crime, of sui- 
cide, marriages, shown to be dependent on the 
prices of corn. 

Not as if economic motives were for instance 
the sole cause that marriages were made at all. 
Nobody would declare the sexual passion to be 
an economic motive. But the alteration in the 
annual number, of marriages is called forth by 
changes in the economic situation. 

Besides all these new sciences there Is finally 
to be mentioned a change in the character of the 
modern writing of history. The French Revo- 
lution came to the fore so clearly as a class-strug- 
gle, that not only its historian must recognize 
that, but a number of the historians were in- 
spired to investigate in other periods of history 
the role of the class wars, and to see in them 
the motive forces of human development. The 
classes are, however, again a product of the eco- 
nomic structure of society, and from this spring 
the antagonisms, therefore the struggles of the 
classes. What holds every class together, what 
divides them from other classes, determines their 
opposition to men, is the particular class interests, 
a new kind of interest, about which no moralist 
of the eighteenth century had had any idea what- 
ever school he might belong to. 

With all these advances and discoveries 
which certainly often enough were only piece- 



114 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

meal and by no means quite clear by the time of 
the forties in the nineteenth century all the es- 
sential elements of the materialist conception of 
history had been supplied. They only waited for 
the master who should bring them under control 
and unify them. That was done by Engels and 
Marx. 

Only to deep thinkers such as they were was 
an achievement of that nature possible, in so far 
that was their personal work. But no Engels, 
no Marx could have achieved it in the i8th cen- 
tury, before all the new sciences had produced a 
sufficient mass of new results. On the other 
hand a man of the genius of a Kant or a Hel- 
vetius could also have discovered the materialist 
conception of histor}- if at their time the requisite 
scientific conditons had been at hand. Finally, 
however, even Engels and Marx despite their 
genius and despite the preparatory work, which 
the new sciences had achieved, would not have 
been able even in the time of the forties in the 
19th century, to discover it, if they had not 
stood on the standpoint of the proletariat, and 
were thus socialists. That also was absolutely 
necessary to the discovery of this conception of 
history. In this sense is it a proletariat philoso- 
phy and the opposing views are Bourgeois phi- 
losophies. 

The rise of the idea of evolution took place 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY II 5 

during a period of reaction, when no immediate 
farther development of society was in question ; 
the conception consequently only served for the 
explanation of the previous development, and 
thereby only in a certain sense, that of a justifi- 
cation, nay, at times more, a glorification of the 
past. Just as through Romanticism and the his- 
torical school of jurisprudence, there goes through 
the entire study of early times, even through 
Sanscrit study — I may point to the example of 
Schopenhauer's Buddhism — in the first decades 
of the last century a reactionary trait. So was it 
with that philosophy which made the evolution- 
ary idea of that period the centre of its sys- 
tem, the Hegelian. Even that was only intended 
to be a panegyric on the previous development, 
which had now found its close in the monarchs 
by the will of God. As a reactionary philosophy 
this philosophy of the development was bound 
to be an idealist philosophy, since the present, 
the reality, was in too great a contradiction with 
its reactionary tendencies. 

As soon as reality, that is the capitalist society, 
had got so far as to be able to make itself felt 
in face of these tendencies, the idealist con- 
ception of evolution became impossible. It was 
superseded by a more or less open materialism. 
But only from the proletariat point of view was 
it possible to translate the social development into 



Il6 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

a materialistic one — in other words to recognize in 
the present an evolution of society proceeding 
according to natural laws. 

The Bourgeoisie was obliged to close its eyes 
to all idea of a further social evolution, and re- 
pudiate every philosophy of evolution, which did 
not simply investigate the development of the 
part to understand this, but also in order to un- 
derstand the tendencies of the new society of the 
future and to hammer out weapons for the strug- 
gle of the present, which is destined to bring 
about this form of society of the future. 

So soon as this period of intellectual reaction 
after the great Revolution had been overcome, 
and the Bourgeoisie which had regained self re- 
spect and power had made an end to all artistic 
and philosophic romanticism in order to proclaim 
materialism, they could not all the same get as 
far as the historic materialism. Deeply founded 
as this w^as in the circumstances of the time, so 
was it no less in the nature of the circumstances, 
that that could only . be a philosophy of the 
proletariat, that it was repudiated by science so 
far as it lay in the influence of the Bourgeoisie, 
repudiated to such an extent that even the so- 
cialist author of the history of materialism, Al- 
bert Lange, only mentions Karl Marx in that 
work as an economist and not as a philosopher. 

The idea of evolution, generally accepted for 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY II7 

the natural sciences, even fruitful for certain 
special branches of mental science, has remained 
dead for the sciences as a whole as taught by 
Bourgeois science. The Bourgeoisie could not 
even get further than Hegel in their philosophy. 
They fell back into a materialism which stands 
considerably below that of the i8th century, be- 
cause it is purely natural philosophy, and has 
no theory of society to show. And when this 
narrow materialism no longer suited them, they 
turned to the old Kantianism, purified from all 
the defects which had been superseded by science 
in the meantime, but not emancipated from its 
Ethic which was now the bulwark which was to 
be brought against the materialist theory of 
Social Evolution. 

In the economic sciences the Bourgeoisie hov- 
ered between a historic conception which cer- 
tainly acknowledges an evolution of society, but 
denies necessary laws of this development, and 
a view which recognizes necessary laws of So- 
ciety but denies the social development and 
believes it possible to discover in the psychology 
of primitive man all the economic categories of 
modern society. To this conception there was 
added a naturalistic (or natural scientific) which 
tries to reduce the laws of society to laws of 
biology, that is, to the laws of animal and plant 



Il8 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

organisms, and really amounts to nothing short 
of a denial of social development. 

Since the Bourgeoisie has grown conservative, 
only from the proletarian standpoint is a ma- 
terialist view of social development possible. 

It is true that the dialectical materialism is a 
materialism of its own kind, which is quite dif- 
ferent from the materialism of natural science 
(naturalism). Many friends have wished ac- 
cordingly in order to avoid misunderstandings, 
to substitute another word for the word material- 
ism. 

But if Marx and Engels held on to the word 
materialism that had the same ground as the re- 
fusal to rechristian their manifesto of the Com- 
munists into a manifesto of the Socialists. The 
word socialism covers today such various wares, 
among them some really worthless, Christian and 
national socialisms of all kinds; the word com- 
munism on the other hand describes unmistakably 
and clearly the aims of a proletariat fighting a 
revolutionary fight for its emancipation. 

So also by a designation of the dialetical ma- 
terialism as dialectical " monism," or '' Criti- 
cism " or " Realism " were its significance as op- 
position to the Bourgeois world lost. The word 
" materialism " on the other hand has signified 
since the victory of Christianity a philosophy of 
the fight against the ruling powers. Therefore 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY II9 

has it come into disrepute with the Bourgeoisie, 
but for that very reason have we followers of the 
proletarian philosophy every reason to hold fast 
to this very name, which also can be justified in 
fact. And a conception of Ethics, which rises 
from this philosophy can rank as a materialistic 
one. 

II. THE ORGANIZATION OF HUMAN SOCIETY. 

a. The Technical Development. 

Let us now regard man from the standpoint 
of the materialist conception of history at the 
stage at which we left him in the last chapter, 
at the boundary which divided him from the rest 
of the animal world. What is it that raises him 
above it? Do there exist between him and them 
only gradual differences or is there also an es- 
sential difference? Neither as a thinking nor as 
a moral being is man essentially different from 
the animals. Does not perhaps the difference lie 
in the fact that he produces, that is, adapts ma- 
terial found in nature by means of change of 
form or of place to his purposes? This activity 
is, however, also found in the animal world. To 
leave out of account many insects, such as bees 
and ants we find among many warm blooded 
animals, nay, even among many fishes, species of 
productive activity, namely, the production of 



120 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

refuges and dwellings, with underground build- 
ings, and so on. And, however much of this 
productive activity is also the product and result 
of inherited instincts and the positions, they are 
often so suitably adapted to various circum- 
stances, that consciousness, the knowledge of 
causal connections, must also play a part thereby. 

Or is it the use of tools which raises man 
above the animals? Also note that among ani- 
mals we find at least the beginnings of the appli- 
ation of tools, of branches, of trees for defence, of 
stones for cracking nuts and so on. This intelli- 
gence as well as the development of the feet to 
hands enables the apes to do that. 

Thus not the production of means of consump- 
tion and not the use of tools distinguishes man 
from the animals. What, however, alone dis- 
tinguishes the former is the production of tools, 
which serve for production, for defence or at- 
tack. The animal can at the most find the tool in 
nature: it is not capable of inventing such. It 
may produce things for its immediate use, pre- 
pare dwellings, collect provisions but it does not 
think so far as to produce things which will not 
serve for direct consumption, but the production 
of the means of consumption. 

With the production of the means of production 
the animal man begins to become the human 
man ; with that he breaks away from the animal 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 121 

world to found his own empire, an empire with 
its own kind of development, which is wholly 
unknown in the rest of nature, in which noth- 
ing similar is to be found. 

So long as the animal only produces with the 
organs provided by nature, or only uses tools 
which nature gives him, it cannot rise above the 
means thus provided for them by nature. His 
development only occurs in the manner that his 
own organism develops itself, his own organs 
unfold themselves — the brain included : a slow 
and unconscious process carried on by means of 
the struggle for life, which the animal can in no 
way hurry on by its conscious activity. 

On the other hand the discovery and pro- 
duction of the tool — the word employed in the 
widest sense — means that man consciously and 
purposely gives himself new organs, or strength- 
ens or lengthens his natural organs, so that he 
can still better or easier produce the same that 
these organs produced, but besides that he is in 
a position to arrive at results which were for- 
merly quite unattainable for him. But as man 
is not simply an animal endowed with higher in- 
telHgence and hands — the necessary assumption 
of the application and production of tools, — but 
also must have been from the very beginning a 
social animal, the discovery and production of a 
tool by a specially gifted individual — a Marx 



122 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

or Kant or Aristotle inhabiting the trees of the 
primitive tropical forests who had found it — 
was not lost with his death. His herd took up 
the invention and carried it on, won with it an 
advantage in the struggle for life, so that their 
descendants could flourish better than the other 
members of their kind. But further perspicacity 
which was to be found in the herd served the 
purpose from now on of rendering the discovery 
more complete or to invent new things. 

Even if a certain degree of intelligence and 
the development of the hand forms the necessary 
condition for the discovery and production of 
tools, so the social character of man afforded 
the conditions for the continual addition of new 
and the improvement of old discoveries, thus 
leading to a continual development of the technic. 
The slow and unconscious process of the devel- 
opment of the individuals through the struggle 
for life, as it ruled the entire remaining organic 
world, gives way more and more in the human 
world in favour of the conscious transformation, 
adaptation and improvement of the organs, a 
development which in its beginning, measured by 
modern standards, is extremely slow and hard to 
notice, but which all the same goes much quicker 
than the natural selection. The technical prog- 
ress forms from now on the foundation of the 
entire development of man. On that and not on 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 123 

any special divine spark rests all by which man 
is distinguished from the animals. 

Every single step forwards on this path of 
technical development is a conscious and inten- 
tional. Each arises from the endeavor to 
increase the powers of man over the limits set 
by nature. But each of these technical advances 
brings also of necessity effects with it, which 
were not intended by its authors and could not 
be, because they were not in a position even to 
expect them, effects, which just as much as nat- 
ural selection could be called adaption to the 
surroundings, surroundings, however, which 
men had artificially modified. In these adapta- 
tions, however, consciousness, the knowledge of 
the new surroundings, and its requirements, 
again plays a role, this nevertheless is not that 
of an independent directory force. 

b. Technic and Method of Life. 

Let us seek^ in order to get a clearer idea of 
what has been said, to give ourselves an idea 
what consequences it was bound to have when 
primitive man arrived at the first tool, where he 
joined the stone and the stick, which the ape 
had already used, to make a hammer, an axe or a 
spear. Naturally the description which here fol- 
lows can only be a hypothetical one, as we have 
no witness of the whole process. But it is not to 



124 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

serve as a proof, only as an illustration. We 
make it as simple as possible, disregarding for 
example the influence which the fishing could 
have had on primitive man. 

So soon as primitive man possessed the spear, 
he was put in a position to hunt still bigger ani- 
mals. Was his food up to then principally from 
tree fruits and insects, as well as probably little 
birds and young birds, now he could kill even 
bigger animals, meat became from now on more 
important for his food. The majority of the 
bigger animals, however, live on the earth, not in 
the trees, hunting thus drew him from his airy 
regions down to the earth. Still more. The 
animals most adapted for the chase, the rumin- 
ants, are rare in the primitive forest. The more 
man became a hunter, the more could he emerge 
from the forest in which primitive man was hid. 

This account, as I have said, is purely hypo- 
thetical. The process of evolution may have been 
the reverse. Equally as the discovery of the tool 
and the weapons could have driven men out of 
the primitive forest to draw forth into open grass 
land where the trees were farther apart, just as 
well might forces which drove primitive man 
from his original abode have been the spur to 
the discovery of weapons and tools. Let us as- 
sume, for instance, that the number of men in- 
creased over their means of subsistence in a glacial 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I25 

period, say the glacier of the central Asiatic 
mountain range sank low down and forced the 
inhabitants from their forests into the grass plains 
which bordered it or that an increasing dryness 
of the climate ever more and more cleared the 
forest and caused more and more grass land to 
come up in it. In all these cases primitive man 
would have been obliged to give up his free life 
and to move about on the earth; he was obliged 
from now on to seek for animal food, and could 
no longer in the same degree feed himself from 
tree fruits. The new method of life induced him 
to use often stones and sticks and brought him 
nearer to the discovery of the first tools and 
weapons. 

Whatever development we accept, the first or 
the second — and both could have taken place 
independent of each other at different points — 
from both of them we see clearly the close con- 
nection which exists between new means of pro- 
duction and new methods of life and new needs. 

Each of these factors necessarily produces the 
other, each becomes necessarily the cause of 
changes, which in their turn hide new fresh 
changes in their bosom. Thus every discovery 
produces inevitable changes, which give rise to 
other discoveries, and therewith brings new needs 
and methods of life which again call forth 
new discoveries and so on — a chain of endless 



126 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

development which becomes so much quicker 
and compHcated, the farther it proceeds and the 
more the possibiHty and faciUty of new discoveries 
grows. 

Let us consider the consequences which the 
rise of hunting as a source of food for man and 
his emergence from the primitive forest was 
bound to draw with it. 

Besides the meat, man took in place of the 
tree fruits, roots and fruits of the grasses, corn 
and maize into his bill of fare. In the primitive 
forest a cultivation of plants is impossible and 
to clear the primitive forest is beyond the power 
of primitive man. The latter could not, how- 
ever, even arrive at this idea. He lived from 
tree fruits ; to plant fruit trees which would first 
bear fruit after many years assumes that al- 
ready a high degree of culture and settlement 
has been attained. On the other hand the plant- 
ing of grasses in meadows and steppes is much 
easier than in the primitive forest and can be 
brought about with much simpler tools. The 
thought of planting grasses, which often bear 
fruits after only a few weeks, is, however, easier 
conceivable than that of planting trees. Cause 
and effect are so nearly connected in this case 
that their dependence is easier to see and even 
the unsettled primitive man might expect to be 
be able to hope to be able to hold out the period 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 1 27 

between seed time and harvest in the neighbor- 
hood of the cultivated ground. 

On the other hand man so soon as he left the 
primitive forest was far more at the mercy of 
climatic changes than in his primitive home. In 
the thick forest the changes of temperature be- 
tween day and night are much less than on the 
open plain, on which during the day a burning 
sun rules and by night a powerful radiation and 
loss of heat. Storms are also less noticeable in 
the forest than in a woodless territory, and 
against rain and hail this latter offers much less 
protection than the almost impenetrable foliage 
of the forest. Thus man forced on to the plains 
was bound to feel a need for shelter and cloth- 
ing which the primitive man in the tropical for- 
est never felt. If the man apes had already 
built themselves formal nests for the night repose 
he was bound to go farther and build walls and 
roofs for protection, or to seek shelter in caves 
or holes. On the other hand it was no great 
step to clothe himself in the skins of animals, 
which remained over after the flesh had been 
taken out of them. It was certainly the need for 
protection against cold which allowed mankind 
to aspire for the possession of fire. Its technical 
ability he could only gradually learn after he had 
used it a long time. The warmth which it gave 
out was on the other hand at once evident. How 



128 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

man came to the use of fire will perhaps never be 
certainly known. But it is certain that man in 
the primitive forest had no need for it as a 
source of heat, and was not able amid the con- 
tinual damp to maintain it. Only in a drier re- 
gion, where greater quantities of dry fire 
material were to be found at intervals, moss, 
leaves, brushwood, could fires arise which made 
man acquainted with fire. Perhaps through light- 
ning or more likely from the sparks of a flint, 
the first tool of primitive man, or from the heat 
which arose from boring holes in hard wood. 

We see how the entire life of man, his needs, 
his dwelling, his means of sustenance were 
changed, and one discovery finally brought nu- 
merous others in its train, so soon as it was once 
made, so soon as the making of a spear or an 
axe had been achieved. In all these transforma- 
tions consciousness played a great part, but the 
consciousness of other generations than those 
which had discovered the spear or the axe. And 
the tasks which were presented to the conscious- 
ness of the later generations, were not set by 
that of the former, they arose by necessity and 
spontaneously as soon as the discovery was made. 

But with the change of dwelling, of the needs 
of the winning of sustenance, of the entire meth- 
od of life, are the effects of the discovery not 
exhausted. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I29 

c. Animal and Social Organism. 



o>' 



The division of labour among the organs in 
the animal organism has certain limits, since they 
are hide bound to the animal organism, and can- 
not be changed at pleasure and their number is 
limited. On the other hand a limit is herewith 
set for the variety of the functions which an 
animal organism is capable of performing. It 
is, for instance, impossible that the same limb 
should serve equally well for holding things, for 
running and for flying, not to speak of other 
specializations. 

The tool on the other hand can be changed by 
man. He can adapt it to a simple definite pur- 
pose. Is this fulfilled then he puts it on one 
side, it does not hinder him in other work for 
which he requires quite other tools. If the num- 
ber of his limbs is limited, his tools are innumer- 
able. 

But not simply the number of the organs of 
the animal organism is limited, but also the force 
with which any of them can be moved. It can 
be in no case greater than the strength of the 
individual himself, to whom they belong, they 
must always be less, since it has to nourish all 
its organs besides the one in motion. On the 
other hand, the force which moves a tool is by 
no means confined to one individual. So soon 



130 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

as it is separated from the human individual, 
many individuals can unite to operate it, nay, 
they can use other than human forces for the 
purpose, say the beasts of burden, again water, 
wind or steam. 

Thus in contrast to the animal organism the 
development of the artificial organs of man is 
unlimited, at least measured by human ideas. 
They find their limit only in the mass of the 
moving forces, which Sun and Earth place at the 
disposal of man. 

The separation of the artificial organs of man 
from his personality has, however, still other ef- 
fects. If the organs of the animal organisms 
are bound up with it, that means that every 
individual has the same organs at his disposal. 
The sole exception is formed by the organs of 
reproduction. Only in this region is a division 
of labour to be found among the higher organ- 
isms. Every other division of labour in the ani- 
mal organism rests simply on the fact that cer- 
tain individuals take over certain functions for 
a certain period, for example, the sentry duty, 
as leader, etc., without requiring for the purpose 
organs which are different to those of other in- 
dividuals. 

The discovery of the tool on the other hand 
made it possible that in a society certain indi- 
viduals should exclusively use certain tools or 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I3I 

any way so much oftener that they understand 
its use far better than any one else. Thus we 
come to a form of division of labour in human 
society, which is of quite another kind from 'the 
modest beginnings of such in the animal societies. 
In the latter there remains, with all the division 
of labour a being by itself, which possesses all 
the organs, which it requires for its support. In 
human society that is less the case, the farther 
the division of labour advances in it. The more 
developed is this, so much the greater the num- 
ber of the organs which society has at its disposal 
for the gaining of their sustenance and the main- 
tenance of their method of life, but so much the 
greater also the number of the organs, which are 
required, and so much more dependent the or- 
gans over which the individual commands. So 
much the greater the power of society over na- 
ture, but so much the more helpless the individ- 
ual outside of society, so much the more depend- 
ent from it. The animal society, which arises 
as a natural growth, can never raise its members 
above nature. On the other hand human society 
forms for the human individual a nature which 
is a quite peculiar world, apart from the rest, a 
world which apparently interferes with its being 
made more than nature, with which latter it imag- 
ines itself the better able to cope the more the 
division of labour increases. 



132 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

And the latter is practically just as unlimited 
as the technical progress itself; it finds its limits 
only in the expansion of the human race. 

If we found above, that the animal society is 
an organism of a peculiar kind, different from 
the plant and animal, so we now find that the 
human society again forms a peculiar organism, 
which is not only different from the plant and 
animal individual, But is essentially different from 
the animal society. 

Before all there come two distinguishing feat- 
ures into account. We have seen that the ani- 
mal organism itself possesses all the organs 
which it requires for its own existence, while the 
human individual under the advanced division of 
labour cannot live by itself without society — 
the Robinson Crusoes, who without any means 
produce everything for themselves are only to 
be found in children's story books and scientific 
w^orks of Bourgeois economists, who believe that 
the best way to discover the laws of society is to 
completely ignore it. Man is in his whole na- 
ture dependent on society, it rules him, only 
through the peculiar nature of this is he to be 
understood. 

The peculiar nature of society is, however, in 
a continual change, because in distinction to the 
animal society human society is always subject to 
development in consequence cf the advance cf 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I33 

their technic. Animal society develops itself 
probably only in the same degree as the animal 
species which forms it. Far faster does the pro- 
cess of development proceed in human society. 
But nothing can be falser than to conceive it 
according to the nature of the development of the 
individual, and distinguish the ways of youth, 
of maturity, of decay and death in it. So long 
as the sources of force hold out over which the 
earth commands, therefore so long the founda- 
tion of technical progress does not disappear, we 
have no decay and death of human society to ex- 
pect, this will, with the advance in technic ever 
more and more advance and is in this sense im^ 
mortal. 

Every society is modeled by the technical ap- 
paratus at its command, and the people who set 
it going, for which purpose they enter into the 
complicated social relations. So long as this 
technical apparatus keeps on improving, and the 
people who move it, neither diminish in number 
nor in mental nor physical strength, there can 
be no talk of a dying out of society. 

That sort of thing has never occurred as a per- 
manent condition to any society as yet. Tempo- 
rarily certainly it occurs, in consequence of pe- 
culiarities with w^hich we will make acquaintance 
later on, that the social relations which sprang 
from social needs, get petrified and hinder the 



134 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

technical apparatus and the growth of the mem- 
bers of society in number and in intellectual and 
physical force, nay even give rise to a reaction- 
ary movement. That can, however, to speak his- 
torically, never last long, sooner or later these 
fetters of society are burst, either by internal 
movement, revolutions, or, and what is oftener the 
case, by impulse from without by wars. Again 
society changes from time to time a part of its 
members, its boundaries or its names and it can 
seem to the observer as if the society had shown 
traces of old age, and was now dead. In reality, 
however, if we want to take a simile from the 
animal organism, it has only been suffering from 
a disease from which it has everged with re- 
newed strength. Thus did for instance the so- 
ciety of the Roman imperial times not die but 
rejuvenated through German blood, they began 
after the migrations of the peoples with partially 
new people to improve and build up their tech- 
nical apparatus. 

III. THE CHANGES IN THE STRENGTH OF THE SO- 
CIAL INSTINCTS. 

a. Language. 

Since human society in contrast to the animal 
is continually changing, for that very reason the 
people in it must be continually changing. The 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 1 35 

alteration in the conditions of life must react on 
the nature of the men, the division of labour 
necessarily develops some of his natural organs 
in a greater degree and transforms many. Thus 
for instance the development of the human ape 
from a tree fruit eater into a devourer of ani- 
mals and plants, which are to be found on the 
ground, was bound to be connected with a trans- 
formation of the hind pair of hands into feet. 
On the other hand, since the discovery of the 
tool no animal has been subject to such manifold 
and rapid changes in his natural surroundings 
as man and no animal confronted with such by 
an ever growing problem of adaptation to his 
surroundings as he, and had to use its intellect to 
the same degree as he. Already at the beginning 
of that career which he opened with the discov- 
ery of the first tool, superior to the rest of the 
animals by reason of his adaptability and his in- 
tellectual powers, he was obliged in the course of 
his history to encourage both qualities in the 
highest degree. 

If the changes in the society are able to trans- 
form the organism of man, his hands, his feet, his 
brain, how much the more and how much greater 
to change his consciousness, his views of that 
which was useful and harmful, good and bad, 
possible and impossible. 

If man begins his rise over the animals with 



136 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

the discovery of the tool, he has no need to first 
create a social compact as was believed in the 
i8th century and as many theoretical jurists still 
believe in the 20th. He enters on his human de- 
velopment as a social animal with strong social 
impulses. The first ethical result of human so- 
city could only be to influence the force of 
these impulses. According to the character of 
society tiiese impulses will be either strengthened 
or weakened. There is nothing more false than 
the idea that the social impulses are bound to be 
continually strengthened, as society develops. 

At the beginning of human society that cer- 
tainly will have been true. The impulses which 
in the animal world had already developed the 
social impulses, human society, permits to remain 
in full strength, it adds further to that — co- 
operation in work. This co-operation itself has 
made a new instrument of intercourse of social 
understanding necessary, language. The social 
animals could get through, with few means of 
mutual understanding, cries of persuasion, of 
joy, of fright, of alarm, of anger and sensational 
noises. Every individual is with them a whole, 
which can exist for itself alone. But sensa- 
tional noises do not, however, suffice, if there is 
to be common labour or if different tasks are to 
be allotted, or different products divided. They 
do not suffice for individuals who are helpless 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 137 

without the help of other individuals. Division 
of labour is impossible without a language, which 
describes not merely sensations, but also things 
and processes, it can only to that degree develop 
in which language is perfected, and it for its part 
brings with it the need for it. 

In language itself the description of activities 
and especially the human, is the most primitive; 
that of the things comes later. The verbs are 
older than the nouns, the former form the roots 
from which the latter are derived. 

Thus declares Lazarus Geiger: 

" When we ask ourselves why light and color were no 
nameable objects for the first stage of language while 
the act of painting of the colors was, the answer lies 
in this that man first only described his actions or 
those of his kind; he noticed only what happened to 
himself or in the immediate and to him directly inter- 
esting neighborhood, at a period when he had for such 
things as light and dark, shining objects and lightning 
no sense and no power of conception. If we take 
samples from the great number of concepts which we 
have already touched on (in the book) they go back 
in their beginning to an extremely limited circle of 
human movements. For this reason the conception gf 
natural objects evolves in such a remarkably roundabout 
manner from that conception of a human activity, which 
in one way or other called attention to them and often 
brings something that is a distant approximation to 
them. So the tree is something stripped of its bark, the 
bark somethinsr ^fround. the corn which frrours. on ji- 
sometnmg without tne husk. Thus earm and sea, naj 



138 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

even the idea cloud, and heaven itself, emerge from the 
same root concept of something ground up or painted, 
a sort of clay-like liquid." (Der Ursprung der Sprache, 
p. 151-3.) 

This way of the development of language is 
not surprising if we grasp the fact that the first 
duty of language was the mutual understanding 
of men in common activities and common move- 
ments. This role of language as a help in the 
process of production makes it clear why lan- 
guage had originally so few descriptions of color. 
Gladstone and others have concluded from that 
that the Homeric Greeks and other primitive peo- 
ples could only distinguish few colors. Nothing 
more fallacious than that. Experiments have 
shown that barbarian peoples have a very highly 
developed sense of color. But their color tech- 
nic is only little developed, the number of col- 
ors which they can produce is small, and hence 
the number of their descriptions of color is 
small. 

" When man gets so far as to apply a color stuff, 
then the name of his color stuff easily takes on an ad- 
jectival character for him. In this way arise the first 
names of colors." (Grant Allen, The Color Sense, p. 
254-) 

Grant Allen points to the fact, that even today 
the names of colors increase as the color tech- 
nic grov/s. The names of the colors serve first 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I39 

the purpose of technic and not the purpose of 
describing nature. 

The development of language is not to be 
understood without the development of the 
method of production. From this latter it de- 
pends whether a language remains the dialect of 
a tiny tribe or a world language, which a hun- 
dred million men speak. 

With the development of language an uncom- 
monly strong means of social cohesion is won, 
an enormous strengthening and a clear conscious- 
ness of the social impulses. In addition it cer- 
tainly produced quite other effects ; it is the most 
effectual means of retaining acquired knowledge, 
of spreading this, and handing it on' to later gen- 
erations; it first makes it possible to form con- 
cepts, to think scientifically. Thus it starts the 
development of science and with that brings about 
the conquest of nature by Science. Now man 
acquires a mastery over Nature and also an ap- 
parent independence of her external influences, 
which arouse in him the idea of freedom. On 
this I may be allowed a private deviation. Scho- 
penhauer very rightly says : 

The animal has only visual presentations and con- 
sequently only motives which it can visualize. The de- 
pendence of its acts of will from the motives is thus 
clear. In men this is no less the case and they are im- 
pelled (always taking the individual character into ac- 



140 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

count) by the motive with the strictest necessity: only 
these are not for the most part visual but abstract pre- 
sentations, that is conceptions, thoughts which are 
nevertheless the result of previous views thus of im- 
pression from without. That gives him a certain free- 
dom, in comparison namely with the animals. Because 
he is not like the animal determined by the visual sur- 
roundings present before him but by his thoughts 
drawn from previous experiences or transmitted to him 
through teaching. Hence the motive which necessarily 
moves him is not at once clear to the observer with the 
deed, but he carries it about with him in his head. That 
gives not only to his actions taken as a whole, but to 
all his movements an obviously different character from 
those of the animal; he is at the same time drawn by 
finer invisible ones. Thus all his movements bear the 
impress of being guided by principles and intentions, 
which gives them the appearance of independence and 
obviously distinguishes them from those of the animal, 
All these great distinctions depend however entirely 
from the capacity for abstract presentations, concept 
tions. (Preisschrift ueber die Grundlage der Morai 
i860 p. 148.) 

The capacity for abstract presentations depends 
again on language. Probably it was a deficiency 
in language which caused the first concept to be 
formed. In Nature there are only single things ; 
language is, however, too poor to be able to de- 
scribe every single thing. Man must conse- 
quently describe all things which are similar to 
each other with the same word; he undertakes 
with that however, at the same time uncon- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I4I 

sciously a scientific work, the collection of the 
similar, the separation of the unlike. Language 
is then not simply an organ of mutual under- 
standing of different men with each other but 
has become an organ of thinking. Even when 
we do not speak to others, but think to ourselves 
only the thoughts must be clothed in certain 
words. 

Does, however, language give man a certain 
freedom in contrast to the animals, this, all the 
same, only develops on a higher plane what the 
formation of the brain had already begun. 

In the lower animals the nerves of motion are 
directly connected with the nerves of sensation ; 
here every external impression at once releases 
a movement. Gradually, however, a bundle of 
nerves develops into a centre of the whole ner- 
vous system, which receives all the impressions 
and is not obliged to transmit all to the motor 
nerves, but can store them up and work them 
off. The higher animal gathers experiences 
which it can utilize and impulses which even 
under certain circumstances it can hand on to its 
descendants. 

Thus through the medium of the brain the 
connection between the external impression and 
the movement is obscured. Through language, 
which renders possible the communication of 
ideas to others, as well as abstract conceptions, 



142 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

scientific knowledge, and convictions, the connec- 
tion between sensation and movement becomes in 
many cases completely unrecognizable. 

Something very similar happens in economics. 
The most primitive form of the circulation of 
wares is that of barter of commodities: of 
products which serve for personal or productive 
consumption. Here from both sides an article 
of consumption is given and received. The ob- 
ject of the exchange, that is consumption, is 
clear. 

That alters with the rise of an element to 
facilitate circulation, money. Now it is easy to 
sell without at once buying, just as the brain 
makes it possible that impressions should work 
on the organism without at once releasing a 
movement. And as this renders possible a stor- 
ing up of experiences and impulses, which can 
even be transmitted to descendants, so can noto- 
riously from gold a treasury be collected. And 
as the collection of that treasury of experiences 
and impulses under the necessary social condi- 
tions finally renders really possible the develop- 
ment of science and the conquest of nature by 
science, so does the collection of every treasure 
render possible when certain social conditions are 
also there the transformation of money into cap- 
ital, which raises the productivity of human labor 
in the highest degree and completely revolution- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 143 

izes the world within a few centuries to a greater 
degree than formerly occurred in hundreds of 
thousands of years. 

And so just as there are Philosophers who be- 
lieve that the elements, Brain and Language, in- 
tellectual powers and ideas which form the con- 
nection between sensation and movement are not 
simple means to arrange this connection more 
conveniently for the individual and society, thus 
apparently to increase their strength, but that 
they are of themselves sprung from independent 
sources of power, nay, finally coming even from 
the creator of the world, — so there are econo- 
mists who imagine that money brings about the 
circulation of goods and, as capital, renders it 
possible to develop human production enormous- 
ly; that it is this that is the starter of this cir- 
culation, the creator of these forces, the pro- 
ducer of all values which are produced over and 
above the product of the primitive handwork. 

The theory of the productivity of capital rests 
on a process of thought which is very similar to 
that of the freedom of the will and the concep- 
tion of a moral law, independent of time and 
space, which regulates our actions in time and 
space. 

Marx was just as logical when he contradicted 
the one process of thought as the other. 



144 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

b. War and Property. 

A further means beside community in work 
and language to strengthen the social impulses, 
is formed by the social development through the 
rise of war. 

We have no reason to suppose that primitive 
man was a warlike being. Herds of ape men 
who gathered together in the branches of trees 
with copious sources of food can have squabbled 
and driven each other away. That this got so 
far as killing their opponents, of that there is no 
example among the living apes of today. Of 
male gorillas it is reported that they occasionally 
fight each other with such fury, that one kills 
the other, but that is a fight for a wife, not a 
fight for feeding grounds. 

That changes so soon as man becomes a hunter, 
who has command of tools, which are directed 
in killing, and who has grown accustomed to 
killing, to the shedding of strange blood. Also 
another factor comes into account, which Engels 
has already pointed out to explain the cannibal- 
ism which often comes up at this period : the un- 
certainty of the sources of food. Vegetable food 
is in the tropical forest in abundance. On the 
grassy plains, on the other hand, roots and fruits 
are not always to be found, the capture of game 
is moreover for the most part a matter of chance. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 145 

The beasts of prey have thus acquired the capac- 
ity of being able to fast for incredibly long per- 
iods. The human stomach has not such powers 
of endurance. Thus necessity easily forces a 
tribe of savages to a fight for life or death with 
another neighboring tribe, which has got a good 
hunting territory; then the passions aroused by 
the fight and agonizing hunger finally drive him 
not simply to kill the foe but also to eat him. 

In this way technical progress lets loose strug- 
gles, which the ape man did not know, fights not 
with animals of other kinds, but with the 
members of his kind themselves, strug- 
gles, often more bloody than those with the 
leopard and the panther, against which at least 
the bigger apes understand very well how to de- 
fend themselves when united in greater num- 
bers. 

Nothing is more fallacious than the idea that 
the progress of culture and increase of knowl- 
edge necessarily bring also higher humanity with 
them. We could far better say, the ape is human- 
er, therefore more human than man. Murder and 
slaughter in numbers of his species for economic 
motives are products of culture of technic in 
arms. And up to now the perfection of these has 
ranked as a great part of the intellectual labor of 
mankind. 

Only under special circumstances and in special 



146 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

classes will there in the farther progress of cul- 
ture be produced what we call the refinement of 
manners. The progress in division of labor as- 
signs the task of killing animals and man to cer- 
tain classes — Hunters, Butchers, Executioners, 
Soldiers, etc., who then occupy themselves with 
brutality or cruelty either as a sport or as a busi- 
ness within the boundaries of civilization. Other 
classes are Entirely relieved of the necessity nay, 
even the possibility of shedding blood, so for in- 
stance, the vegetarian peasants in the river val- 
leys of India, who are prevented by nature from 
keeping great herds of animals and for whom 
the ox is too costly as a beast of burden or the 
cow as a giver of milk for them to be in a posi- 
tion to kill them. Even the majority of the town 
inhabitants of the European states since the de- 
cay of the town Republics and the rise of paid 
armies as well as the rise of a special class of 
butchers are relieved of the necessity to kill life. 
Especially the intellectuals have been for centur- 
ies so unused to the spilling of blood, which they 
ascribed to their higher intelligence, which roused 
milder feelings in them. But in the last century 
the universal military service has become again 
a general institution of most European States 
and the wars are again become people's wars, 
and with that the refinement of manners among 
our intellectuals has reached its end. They 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 147 

have become since then considerably more bru- 
tal; the death penalty which even in the fifty 
years of last century was generally condemned, 
meets with no opposition any longer, and the 
cruelties of colonial wars, which fifty years ago 
at least in Germany would have made their au- 
thors impossible, are excused today — even glor- 
ified. 

In any case war plays among modern peoples 
no more the same role as once among the no- 
madic pastoral and hunting tribes. But if it 
produces cruelty and bloodthirstiness on the one 
hand, it shows itself on the other as a powerful 
weapon to strengthen the bonds within the fam- 
ily, or society. The greater the dangers which 
threaten the individual, so much the more de- 
pendent does he feel himself from his society, his 
family, his class who alone with their joint 
forces can protect him. So much the greater 
the respect enjoyed by the virtues of unselfish- 
ness or a bravery which will risk life for the 
society. The more bloody the wars between 
tribe and tribe, the more will the system of se- 
lection have effect among them, those tribes will 
assert themselves best who have not only the 
strongest but also the cleverest, the bravest, the 
most self sacrificing and best disciplined members 
to show. Thus war works in primitive times in 
the most various manners to strengthen the social 



148 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

instincts in men. War, however, alters its forms 
in the course of the social evolution. Also its 
causes change. 

Its first cause, the uncertainty of the sources 
of food, ceases so soon as agriculture and breed- 
ing of animals are more developed. But then 
begins a new cause of war : the possession of 
wealth. Not private property but the tribal 
property. Side by side with tribes in fruitful 
regions we find others in unfruitful; adjoining 
nomadic, water searching and poor shepherds, 
settled peasants to whom water has no longer 
value, whose farming produces plentiful sur- 
pluses, etc. War now becomes robbery and de- 
fense against robbery, and it has remained in es- 
sence the same till today. 

Even this kind of war has a strengthening 
effect on the social instincts, so long as the prop- 
erty in the tribe is in the main communal. On 
the other hand the strengthening of the social 
instincts through war ceases to strengthen the 
social instincts the more classes are formed in the 
community, and war becomes more and more a 
simple affair of the ruling classes, whose endeav- 
ors are aimed towards an increase in their sphere 
of exploitation ; or to put themselves in the place 
of another ruling class on a neighboring land. 
For the subject classes it is often enough in such 
wars no more about any question of their exist- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 149 

ence, and occasionally not even any question of a 
better or worse standard of life for them but only 
who is to be their lord. On the other hand, the 
army becomes either an aristocratic army, in 
which the mass of the people has no part, or where 
they co-operate it becomes a paid or a compulsory 
army, which is commanded by the ruling classes, 
and must put their lives at stake not for their 
own property, their own wives and children, but 
to champion the interests of others, often hostile 
interests. No more from social instincts but 
solely from fright for a remorselessly cruel penal 
code are such armies held together. They are 
divided by the hate of the mass against the lead- 
ers, by the indifference, even the mistrust of the 
latter against their subordinates. 

At this stage war ceases to be for the mass of 
the people a school of social feelings. In the 
ruling, warrior classes it becomes a school of a 
haughty, overbearing demeanor towards the 
governed classes, because it teaches the ruling 
classes to treat the former just as they do the 
common soldiers in the army, to degrade them 
to blind subordination to an absolute commander 
and to dispose of their forces, nay, even their 
life without any scruples. 

This development of war is as we have said 
already a consequence of the development of 



150 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

property, which again comes from the technical 
development. 

Every object, v^hich is produced in society or 
with which production is carried on in it must 
be at the disposal of some one and dispose of it 
can either a group or a single individual or the 
entire society. The nature of this disposal is 
determined in the first place by the nature of the 
things, and the nature of the method of pro> 
duction and that of the products. Who himself 
made his weapons, used them himself; just so 
who prepared himself a garment or an ornament ; 
on the other hand it was equally natural that the 
house which was built by the common labor of 
the tribe should be inhabited in common by them. 
The various kinds of enjoyment of the various 
things for utility was always allowed, and re- 
peated from generation to generation became the 
fixed customs. 

Thus arose a law of custom, which was then 
extended still further in this way, that as often 
as quarrels arose over this method of all or 
about persons who had the right to all, the as- 
sembled members of the tribe decided. Law did 
not arise from any thought out legislation or 
social compact, but from a custom resting on the 
technical conditions, and where these did not 
suffice, on individual decisions of the society 
which decided each case by itself. Thus arose 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I5I 

little by little a complicated right of property in 
the various means of production and products of 
society. 

Common property, however, preponderated in 
the beginning, especially in the means of pro- 
duction, a soil worked in common, water ap- 
paratus, houses, even also herds of animals and 
other things besides. Even this common prop- 
erty was bound very largely to strengthen the 
social impulses, the interest in the common 
good, and also the subordination to the same and 
the dependence on the same. 

Very differently did the private property of 
single families or individuals work out, so soon 
as it arrived at such a pitch that it began to 
usurp the place of common property. That be- 
gan when in consequence of the growing di- 
vision of labor the various branches of hand 
work began to separate themselves from agricul- 
ture in which they had hitherto found a by-em- 
ployment ; when they became more and more 
independent and separated into branches. 

This development means an extension of the 
sphere of society through the division of labor, 
an extension of the number of those men who 
thereby form a society, because they work for 
each other and thus are mutually dependent for 
their existence on each other. But this extension 
of the social labor does not develop on the lines 



152 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

of an extension of work in common, but towards 
a separation of individuals from the common 
work, and to making their work the private work 
of independent producers who produce that 
which they themselves do not consume, and ob- 
tain in return the products of other branches to 
consume them. 

Thus at this stage the common production 
and common property in the means of production 
of societies, each in the main satisfying its own 
wants, for example, the mark or at least the 
house community give way before the individual 
production and property of single individuals or 
pairs with their children, who produce commodi^ 
ties. That is production not for their own use 
but for sale, for the market. 

With that there arises side by side with private 
property, which had already existed at an earlier 
period, even if not to so great an extent, an 
entirely new element in society : the competitive 
struggle of the different producers of the same 
kind, who struggle against each other for their 
share of the market. 

War and competition are often regarded as 
the only forms of the struggle for existence in the 
entire natural world. In fact both arise from 
the technical progress of mankind and belong 
to its special peculiarity. Both are distinguished 
from the struggle for existence of the animal 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 1 53 

world therein, that the latter is a struggle of 
individuals or entire societies against the sur- 
rounding nature, a fight against living and non- 
living forces of nature in which those best fitted 
out for the particular circumstances could best 
maintain themselves and reproduce their kind. 
But it is no fight for life or death against other 
individuals of the same kind, with the exception 
of a few beasts of prey, even with whom, how- 
ever, the last kind of struggle plays only a sec- 
ondary part in the struggle for life, and with 
the exception of the struggle for the sexual nat- 
ural selection. With man alone, thanks to the 
perfection of his tools, the struggle against in- 
dividuals of the same kind to maintain them- 
selves in the struggle for life comes to the fore. 
But even then there is a great distinction between 
wars and the struggle for existence. The first 
is a struggle which breaks out between two 
different societies; it means an interruption of 
production and this can never be a permanent 
institution. It presupposes, however, at least 
where no great class antagonisms exist, the 
strongest social cohesion and this encourages in 
the highest degree the social instincts. Competi- 
tion on the other hand is a struggle between in- 
dividuals, and indeed between individuals of the 
same society. This struggle is a regulator, certain- 
ly a mos+ peculiar one, which keeps the social co- 



154 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

Operation of the various individuals going, and 
arranges, that in the last resort these private pro- 
ducers shall always produce what is socially 
necessary. If war forms an occasional interrup- 
tion of production, the struggle for existence, so 
does the struggle for life form its constant and 
necessary companion in the production of com- 
modities. 

Just as war so does competition mean a tre- 
mendous waste of force, but it is also a means 
to extort the highest degree of tension of all the 
productive forces and their most rapid improve- 
ment. It has consequently a great economic im- 
portance, till it creates such gigantic productive, 
forces that the frame-work of commodity-pro- 
duction becomes too narrow, as one time the 
frame-work of the primitive social or co-operative 
production became too narrow for the growing 
division of labor. The overproduction not less 
than the artificial limitation of production by 
employers' associations, shows that the time is 
past when competition as a spur to production 
helps on social evolution. 

But it has always done even this, only because 
it drove it on to the greatest possible expansion 
of production. On the other hand the competi- 
tive struggle between individuals of the same 
society has under all circumstances an absolutely 
deadly effect on the social impulses. Since in 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 155 

this struggle each one asserts himself so much the 
better the less he allows himself to be led by 
social considerations, the more exclusively he has 
his own interest in eye. For men under a de- 
veloped system of production of commodities it 
seems only too clear that egoism is the only 
natural impulse in man, and that the social im- 
pulses are only a refined egoism or an invention 
of priests to get the mastery over man, or to be 
regarded as a supernatural mystery. If in so- 
ciety of today the social impulses have kept any 
strength, it is only due to the circumstance that 
general commodity production is only quite a 
young phenomenon, hardly loo years old, and 
that in the degree in which the primitive demo- 
cratic communism disappears and therewith war 
ceases to be a source of social impulses, a new 
source of the same breaks forth so much the 
stronger, the class war of the forwards strug- 
gling exploited classes of the people, a war not 
by paid soldiers, not by conscripts, but by vol- 
unteers, fought not for other people's interests 
but in the interests of their own class. 

IV. THE INFLUENCE OF TKE SOCIAL INSTINCTS. 

a. Internationalism. 

Far more than the degree of strength does the 
sphere in which the social instincts are effective 



156 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

alter itself. The traditional Ethics looked on the 
moral law as the force which regulates the re- 
lations of man to man. Since it starts with the 
individual and not with the society it overlooks 
the fact certainly that the moral law does not 
regulate the intercourse of men with every other 
man, but simply with men of the same society. 
That it only holds good for these will be compre- 
hensible when we recollect the origin of the social 
instincts. They are a means to increase the so- 
cial cohesion, to add to the strength of society. 
The animal has social instincts only for members 
of his own herd, the other herds are more or 
less indifferent to him. Among social beasts of 
prey we find direct hostility to the members of 
other herds. Thus the pariah dogs of Constanti- 
nople in every street look very carefully out that 
no other dog comes into the district. It would 
be at once chased away or even torn to pieces. 

In a similar relation do the human herds come, 
so soon as hunting and war rise in their midst. 
One of the most important forms of the strug- 
gle for existence is now for them the struggle 
of the herd against other herds of the same kind. 
The man who is not a member of the same 
society becomes a direct enemy. The social im- 
pulses do not only not hold good for him but 
directly against him. The stronger they are, the 
better does the tribe hold together against the 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I 57 

common foe, so much the more energetically do 
they fight the latter. The social virtues, mutual 
help, self sacrifice, love of truth, etc., apply only 
to fellow tribesmen not for the members of 
another social organization. 

It excited much resentment against me when 
I stated these facts in the Neue Zeit and my 
statement was interpreted as if I had attempted 
to establish a special social democratic principle 
in opposition to the principles of the eternal 
moral law, which demands unconditional truth- 
fulness to all men. In reality I have only spoken 
out that which has from the time when our fore- 
fathers became men lived as the moral law with- 
in our breasts, viz., that over against the enemy 
the social virtues are not required. There is 
no need, however, on that account that anybody 
should be especially indignant with the social dem- 
ocracy because there is no party which interprets 
the idea of society more widely than they, the 
party of internationalism, which draws all nations, 
all races into the sphere of their solidarity. 

If the moral law applies only to members of 
our own society, its extent is still by no means 
fixed once for all. It grows far more in the 
same degree in which the division of labor 
progresses, the productivity of human labor 
grows as well as the means of human intercourse 
improve. The number of people increase whom 



158 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

a certain territory can support, who are bound to 
work in a certain territory for one another and 
with one another and who thus are socially tied 
together. But also the number of territories 
increase whose inhabitants live in connection 
with each other in order to work for each other 
and form a social union. Finally the range of 
the territories extends itself which enter into 
fixed social dependence on each other and form 
a permanent social organization with a common 
language, common customs, common laws. 

After the death of Alexander of Macedonia 
the peoples of the Eastern Alediterranean had 
formed already an international circle with an 
international language, — Greek. After the rise 
of the Romans all the lands round the Medi- 
terranean became a still wider international cir- 
cle, in which the national distinctions disap- 
peared, and looked upon themselves as the rep- 
resentatives of humanity. 

The new religion of the circle which took the 
place of the old national religions, was from the 
very beginning a world religion with one God, 
who embraced the entire world, and before whom 
all men were equal. This religion applied itself 
to all mankind, and declared them all to be chil- 
dren of one God, all brothers. 

"Put in fact the moral law held good even here 
only for tlie members of their own circle of cul- 



CONCEPTION OF IIISTORY 159 

ture, for " Christians," for " believers." And the 
centre of gravity in Christianity came ever more 
and more towards the north and west during the 
migration of the peoples. In the South and 
East there formed itself a new circle of culture 
with its one morality, that of Islam, which 
forced its way forward in Asia and Africa, as the 
Christian in Europe. 

Now, however, this last expanded itself 
thanks to capitalism, ever and more to a 
universal civilization, which embraced Buddhists, 
Moslems, Parsees, Brahmans, as well as Chris- 
tians, who more and more ceased to be real 
Christians. 

Thus there formed itself a foundation for the 
final realization of that moral conception already 
expressed by Christianity, though very premature- 
ly, so that it could not be fulfilled, and Vv^hich thus 
remained for the majority of Christians a simple 
phrase, the conception of the equality of men, a 
view that the social instincts, the moral virtues 
are to be exercised towards all men in equal 
fashion. This foundation of a general human 
morality is being formed not by a moral im- 
provement of humanity, whatever we are to un- 
derstand by that, but by the development of the 
productive forces of man, by the extension of 
the social division of human labor, the perfection 
of the means of intercourse. This nev/ morality 



l60 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

is, however, even today far from being a morality 
of all men even in the economically progressive 
countries. It is in essence even today the moral 
of the class conscious proletariat, that part of 
the proletariat which in its feehng and thinking 
has emancipated itself from the rest of the peo- 
ple and has formed its own morality in opposi- 
tion to the Bourgeoisie. 

Certainly it is capital which creates the ma- 
terial foundation for a general human morality, 
but it only creates the foundation by treading this 
morality continually under its feet. The capital- 
ist nations of the circle of European Society 
spread this by widening their sphere of exploita- 
tion which is only possible by means of force. 
They thus create the foundations of a future 
universal solidarity of the nations by a universal 
exploitation of all nations, and those of the draw- 
ing in of all colonial lands into the circle of 
European culture by the oppression of all colonial 
lands vv/ith the worst and most forcible weapons 
of a most brutal barbarism. 

The proletariat alone have no share in the 
capitalist exploitation; they fight it and must 
fight it and they will on the foundation laid down 
by capital of world intercourses and world com- 
merce create a form of society, in which the 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORV l6l 

equality of man before the moral law will become 
— instead of a mere pious wish — reality. 

b. The Class Division. 

But if the economic development thus tends 
to make wider the circle of society within which 
the social impulses and virtues have effect till it 
embraces finally the whole of humanity, it at the 
same time creates not only private interests 
within society which are capable of considerably 
diminishing the effect of these social impulses, 
for the time, but also special classes of society, 
which while within their own narrow circle great- 
ly intensifying the strength of the social instincts 
and virtues, at the same time, however, can mate- 
rially injure their value for the other members 
of the entire society or at least for the opposing 
sections or classes. 

The formation of classes is also a product of 
the division of labor. Even the animal society 
is no homogeneous formation. In its bosom 
there are already various groups, which have a 
different importance in and for the community. 
Yet the group-formation still rests on the natural 
distinctions. There is in the first place that of 
sex, then of age. Within each sex, we find the 
groups of the children, the youths of both sexes, 
the adults, and finally the aged. The discovery 
of the tool has at first the effect of emphasizing 



l62 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

still more the separation of certain of these 
groups. Thus hunting and war fall to the men, 
who are more easily able to get about than the 
women, who are continually burdened with chil- 
dren. That and not any inferior power of self- 
defence probably it was which made hunting and 
fighting a monopoly of man. Wherever in his- 
tory and fable we come across female huntresses 
and warriors, they are always the unmarried. 
Women do not lack in strength, endurance or 
courage, but maternity is not easily to be recon- 
ciled with the insecure life of the hunter and 
warrior. As, however, motherhood drives the 
woman rather to continually stay in one place 
those duties fall to her which require a settled 
life, the planting of field fruits, the maintenance 
of the family hearth. 

According to the importance which now hunt- 
ing and war, on the other side agriculture and 
domestic life attain for society, and according to 
the share which each of the two sexes has, in 
these employments, changes the importance and 
relative respect paid to the man and woman in 
the social life. But even the importance of the 
various ages depends on the method of produc- 
tion. Does hunting preponderate, which renders 
the sources of food very precarious, and from 
time to time necessitates great migrations, the 
old people become easily a burden to the society. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 1 63 

They are often killed, sometimes even eaten. 
It is different when the people are settled; the 
breeding of animals and agriculture produce a 
more plentiful return. Now the old people can 
remain at hom.e and there is no lack of food for 
them. Now is, however, at the same time a great 
sum of experiences and knowledge stored up, 
whose guardians, so long as writing was not dis- 
covered or become common property of the peo- 
ples are the old folk. They are the banders down 
of what might be called the beginning of science. 
Thus they are not now looked on as a painful 
burden, but honored as the bearers of a higher 
wisdom. Writing and printing deprive the old 
people of the privilege to incorporate in their 
persons the sum of all experiences and traditions 
of the society. The continual revolutionizing of 
all experience, which is the characteristic feature 
of the modern system of production, makes the 
old traditions even hostile to the new. The lat- 
ter counts without any further ado as the better, 
the old as antiquated and hence bad. The old 
only receives sympathy, it enjoys no longer any 
prestige. There is now no higher praise for an 
old m.an than that he is still young and still ca- 
pable of taking in new ideas. 

As the respect paid to the sexes, so does the 
respect paid to the various ages alter in society 
with the various methods of production. 



164 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

The progressive division of labor brings fur- 
ther distinctions within each sex, most among the 
men. The woman is in the first place more and 
more tied to the household, whose range dimin- 
ishes, instead of growing, as ever more branches 
of production break away from it, become in- 
dependent and a domain of the men. Technical 
progress, division of labor, the separation into 
trades was limited till last century almost ex- 
clusively to men; the household and the woman 
have been only slightly affected by these changes. 

The more this separation into different pro- 
fessions advances, the more complicated does 
the social organism become, whose organs they 
form. The nature and method of their co-opera- 
tion in the fundamental social process, with 
other words the method of production, has noth- 
ing of chance about it. It is quite independent 
of the will of the individuals, and is necessarily 
determined by the given material conditions. 
Among these the technical factor is again the most 
important, and that phase whose development af- 
fects the method of production. But it is not 
the only one. 

Let us take an example. The materialist con- 
ception of history has been often understood as 
if certain technical conditions of itself meant a 
certain method of production, nay, even certain 
social and political forms. As that, however, is 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I65 

not exact, since we find the same tools in various 
states of society, consequently the materialist 
conception of history is false and the social 
relations are not determined by the technical con- 
ditions. The objection is right, but it does not 
hit the materialist conception of history, but its 
caricature, by a confusion of technical conditions 
and method of production. 

It has been said for instance, the plough forms 
the foundation of the peasant economy. But 
manifold are the social circumstances in which 
this appears! 

Certainly ! But let us look a little more close- 
ly. What brings about the deviations of the 
various forms of society which arise on the peas- 
ant foundations. 

Let us take for example a peasantry, which 
lives on the banks of a great tropical or sub- 
tropical river, which periodically floods its banks, 
bringing either decay or fruitfulness for the soil. 
Water dams, etc., will be required to keep the 
water back here and to guide it there. The sin- 
gle village is not able to carry out such works 
by itself. A number of them must co-operate, and 
supply laborers, common officials must be ap- 
pointed, with a commission to set the labor going 
for making and maintaining the w^orks. The 
bigger the undertaking, the more villages must 
take a part, the greater the number of the forced 



l66 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

laborers, the greater the special knowledge re- 
quired to conduct such works, so much the 
greater the power, and knowledge of the leading 
officials compared with the rest of the popula- 
tion. Thus there grows on the foundation of 
a peasant economy a priest or official class as in 
the river plains of the Nile, the Euphrates or the 
Whang-Ho. 

We find another species of development where 
a flourishing peasant economy has settled in 
fruitful, accessible lands in the neighborhood of 
robbers, nomadic tribes. The necessity of guard- 
ing themselves against these nomads forces the 
peasants to form a force of guards, which can 
be done in various manners. Either a part of 
the peasant applies itself to the trade of arms, and 
separates itself from the others who yield them 
services in return, or the robber neighbors are in- 
duced by payment of a tribute to keep the peace 
and to protect their new proteges from other rob- 
bers, or finally the robbers conquer the land and 
remain as lords over the peasantry, on whom 
they lay a tribute, for which, however they pro- 
vide a protective force. The result is always the 
same: the rise of a new feudal nobility which 
rules and exploits the peasants. 

Occasionally the first and second methods of 
development unite, then we have beside a priest 
and official class a warrior caste. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 167 

Again quite differently does the peasantry de- 
velop on a sea with good harbors, which favor 
sea voyages and bring them closer to other coasts 
with well to do populations. By the side of ag- 
riculture, fishery arises, fishery which soon passes 
over into sea-piracy and sea commerce. At a 
particularly suitable spot for a harbor is gathered 
together plunder and merchants' goods and there 
is formed a tov\ai of rich merchants. Here the 
peasant has a market for his goods, there arise 
for him money receipts, but also the expenditure 
of money, money obhgations, debts. Soon he is 
the debtor of the town money proprietor. 

Sea piracy and sea commerce as well as sea 
wars bring, however, a plentiful supply of slaves 
into the country. The town money owners in- 
stead of exploiting their peasant debtors any 
farther, go to work to drive them from their 
possessions, to unite these into great plantations/ 
and to introduce slave work for peasant, with 
out any change being required in the tools and 
instruments of agriculture. 

Finally we see a fourth type of peasant de- 
velopment in inaccessible mountain regions. The 
soil is there poor and difficult to cultivate. By 
the side of the agriculture, the breeding of stock 
retains the preponderance; nevertheless both are 
not sufficient to sustain a great increase of popu- 
lation. At the foot of the mountains fruitful, 



1 68 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

well tilled lands tempt them. The mountain 
peasants will make the attempt to conquer these 
and exploit them, or where they meet with re- 
sistance to hire out their superfluous population 
•^ as paid soldiers. Their experience in war, in 
combination with the poverty and inaccessibility 
of their land serves to guard it against foreign in- 
vaders, to w^hom in any case their poverty offers 
no great temptation. There the old peasant 
democracy still maintains when all around all the 
peasantry have long become dependent on 
Feudal Lords, Priests, Merchants and usurers. 
Occasionally a primitive democracy of that kind 
itself tyrannizes and explores a neighboring 
country which they have conquered, in marked 
contradiction to their own highly valued liberty. 
Thus the old cantons of the fatherland of Wil- 
liam Tell exercised through their Bailiffs in 
Tessin in the seventeenth and eighteenth cen- 
turies a rule, whose crushing weight could com- 
pare with that of the mythical Gessler. 

It will be seen that very different methods of 
production are compatible with the peasant 
economy. How are these differences to be ex- 
plained? The opponents of the materialist con- 
ception of history trace them back to force, or 
again to the difference of the ideas which take 
form at various periods in the various peoples. 
Now it is certain that in the erection of all 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 169 

these methods of production force played a great 
part, and Marx called it the midwife of every 
new society. But whence comes this role of 
force, how does it come that one section of the 
people conquers with it, and the other not, and 
that the force produces this and not other re- 
sults? To all these questions the force theory 
has no answer to give. And equally by the 
theory of ideas does it remain a mystery where 
the ideas come from which lead to freedom in 
the mountain country, to priest rule in the river 
valley land, to money and slave economy on the 
shores of the sea and in hilly undulating coun- 
tries to feudal serfdom. 

We have seen that these differences in the 
development of the same peasant system rest 
on differences in the natural and social surround- 
ings in which this system is placed. According to 
the nature of the land, according to the descrip- 
tion of its neighbors will the peasant system of 
economy be the foundation for very different 
social forms. These special social forms become 
then side by side with the natural factors, further 
foundations, which give a peculiar form to the 
development based on them. Thus the Ger- 
mans found when they burst in on the Roman 
Empire during the migration of the peoples, the 
Imperial Government with its bureaucracy, the 
municipal system, the Christian Church as social 



170 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

conditions, and these, as well as they could, they 
incorporated into their system. 

All these geographical and historical condi- 
tions have to be studied, if the particular method 
of production in a land at a particular time is 
to be understood. The knowledge of the tech- 
nical conditions alone does not suffice. 

It will be seen that the materialist conception 
of history is not such a simple formula as its 
critics usually conceive it to be. The examples 
here given show us, however, also how class 
differences and class antagonisms are produced 
by the economic development. 

Differences not simply between individuals but 
also between individual groups within the society 
existed already in the animal world as we have 
remarked already, distinctions in the strength, 
the reputation, perhaps even of the material po- 
sition of individuals and groups. Such dis- 
tinctions are natural and will be hardly likely to 
disappear even in a socialist society. The dis- 
covery of tools, the division of labor, and its 
consequences, in short the economic development 
contributes still further to increase such differ- 
ence or even to create new.^ In any case, they 
cannot exceed a certain narrow limit, so long as 
the social labor does not yield a surplus over 
that necessary to the maintenance of the mem- 
bers of the society. As long as that is not the 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I7I 

case, no idlers can be maintained at the cost of 
society, none can get considerably more in social 
products than the other. At the same time, 
however, there arise at this very stage owing to 
the increasing enmity of the tribes to each other 
and the bloody method of settling their differ- 
ences, as well as through the common labor and 
the common property so many new factors, 
through which the social instincts are strength- 
ened that the small jealousies and differences 
arising between the families, the different degrees 
of age or the various callings can just as little 
bring a split in the community as that betvv^een 
individuals. Despite the beginnings of division 
of labor which are to be found there, human 
society was never more closely bound up to- 
gether or more in unison than at the time of the 
primitive gentile co-operative society which pre- 
ceded the beginning of class antagonisms. 

The things, however, alter, so soon as social 
labor begins, in consequence of its necessary pro- 
ductivity, to produce a surplus. Now it becomes 
possible for single individuals and professions 
to secure for themselves permanently a greater 
share in the social product than the others can 
secure. Single individuals, only seldom tempo- 
rarily and as a matter of exception will be able 
to achieve that for themselves alone; on the 
other hand it is very obvious that any class 



172 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

Specially favored in any particular manner by 
the circumstances, for example such as are con- 
ferred by special knowledge or special powers 
of self defence, can acquire the strength to per- 
manently appropriate the social surplus for them- 
selves. Property in the products is narrowly 
bound up with property in the means of pro- 
duction, who possesses the latter can dispose of 
the former. The endeavors to monopolize the 
social surplus by the privileged class produce in 
it the desire to monopolize and take sole pos- 
session of the means of production. The forms 
of this monopoly can be very diverse, either com- 
mon ownership of the ruling class, or caste, or' 
private property of the individual families or 
individuals of this class. 

In one way or another the mass of the work- 
ing people becomes disinherited, degraded to 
slaves, serfs, wage laborers; and with the com- 
mon property in the means of production and 
their use in common is the strongest bond 
torn asunder which held primitive society to- 
gether. 

And where the social distinctions which man- 
aged to form themselves in the bosom of primi- 
tive society kept within narrow limits, now the 
class distinctions which can form them.selves have 
practically no limit. They can grow on the one 
side through the technical progress which in- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 1/3 

creases the surplus of the product of the social la- 
bor over the amount necessary to the simple main- 
tenance of society ; on the other hand through 
the expansion of the community while the num- 
ber of the exploiters remains the same or even 
decreases, so that the number of those working 
and producing surplus for each exploiter 
grows. In this way the class distinctions can 
enormously increase, and with them grow the 
social antagonisms. 

In the degree in which this development ad- 
vances society is more and more divided ; the 
class struggle becomes the principal, most gen- 
ieral and continuous form of the struggle of the 
individuals for life in human society ; in the same 
degree the social instincts towards society as a 
whole lose 'strength, they become, however, so 
much the stronger within that class whose wel- 
fare is for the mass of the individuals always 
more and more identical with that of the com- 
monweal-. 

But it is specially the exploited, oppressed and 
uprising classes in whom the class war thus 
strengthens the social instincts and virtues. And 
that because they are obliged to put their whole 
personality into this with much more intensity 
than the ruling classes, who are often in a posi- 
tion to leave their defence, be it with the weapons 
of war, be it with the weapons of the intellect, 



174 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

to hirelings. Besides that, however, the ruHng 
classes are often deeply divided internally 
through the struggles between themselves for the 
social surplus and over the means of production. 
One of the strongest causes of that kind of di- 
vision we have learnt in the battle of competi- 
tion. 

All these factors, which work against the social 
instincts, find none or little soil in the ex- 
ploited classes. The smaller this soil, the less 
property that the struggling classes have, the 
more they are forced back on their own strength, 
the stronger do their members feel their solidar- 
ity against the ruling classes, and the stronger 
do their own social feelings towards their own 
class grow. 

V. THE TENETS OF MORALITY. 

a. Custom and Convention, 

We have seen that the economic development 
introduces into the moral factors transmitted 
from the animal world an element of pronounced 
mutability, in that it gives a varying degree 
of force to the social instincts and virtues at 
different times, and also at the same time in 
different classes, that it, however, in addition 
widens and then again narrows down the scope 
within which the social impulses have effect, on 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 175 

the one side expanding its influence from the 
tiny tribe till it embraces the entire humanity, 
on the other side limiting it to a certain class 
within the society. 

But the same economic development creates 
in addition a special moral factor, which did not 
exist at all in the animal world, and is the most 
changeable of all, since not only its strength but 
also its contents are subject to far reaching 
change. These are the tenets of morality. 

In the animal world we find only strong moral 
feelings, but no distinct moral precepts which are 
addressed to the individual. That assumes that 
a language has been formed which can describe 
not only impressions but also things or at least 
actions, a language for whose existence in the 
animal world all signs fail, for which also a need 
first arises with the common work. Then is it 
possible to address distinct demands to the in- 
dividual. Do these demands arise from individ- 
ual and exceptional needs, then they will again 
disappear with the individual exceptional case. 
If on the other hand they have their origin in the 
social relations, they will revive again and again, 
so long as these relations last ; and in the begin- 
nings of society, where the development is very 
slow, one can allow hundreds of thousands of 
years for the endurance of particular social con- 
ditions. The social demands in the individual 



176 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

repeat themselves so often, and so regularly that 
they become a habit^ of which the outline is 
finally inherited, as the tendency to peculiar kinds 
of hunting by the sporting dogs, so that certain 
suggestions suffice to arouse the habit in the de- 
scendants as well, also for instance the feeling of 
shame, the habit of covering certain portions of 
the body whose nude state appears immoral. 

Thus arise demands on the individual in so- 
ciety, so much the more numerous, so much the 
more complicated it is, which demands finally 
by force of habit become without long considera- 
tion recognized as moral commands. 

From this customary character many material- 
ist Ethical writers have concluded that the entire 
being of morals rise alone on custom. With that 
it is nevertheless by no means exhausted. In 
the first place only such views become moral 
commands through habit which favor the con- 
sideration of the individual for the society, and 
regulate his conduct to other men. If it be 
brought against this, that there are individual 
vices which count as immoral, yet their original 
condemnation was certainly also in the interest 
of society. Thus for example, masturbation if 
general must prejudice the chance of securing a 
numerous progeny — and such a progeny ap- 
peared then when Malthus had not yet spoken, 



CONCEPTION OF HISTOUY 177 

as one of the weightiest foundations of the well 
being and progress of society. 

In the Bible (Genesis XXXVIII) Onan was 
killed by Jehovah, because he allowed his sper- 
matazoa to fall to the ground instead of attending 
to his duty and having intercourse with the wife 
of his dead brother, so as to raise up seed for this 
latter. 

The moral rules could only for this reason 
become customs because they met deep lying, 
ever returning social needs. Finally, however, a 
simple custom cannot explain the force of the 
feeling of duty, which often shows itself more 
powerful than all the instincts of self preserva- 
tion. The customary element in morals only 
has the effect that certain rules are forthwith 
recognized as moral, but it does not produce the 
social instincts which compel the performance of 
already recognized moral laws. 

Thus for example it is a matter of habit that 
counts it as disreputable, when a girl shows her- 
self in her night gown to a man, even when this 
garment goes down to the feet, and takes in the 
neck, while it is not improper if a girl ap- 
pears in the evening with a much uncovered 
bosom at a ball before all the world, or if she 
exhibits herself to the licentious gaze of men 
of the world at a watering place in a wet bathing 
gown. But only the force of the social instincts 



178 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

can bring it about that a strongly moral girl 
should at no price submit to that which conven- 
tion, fashion, custom, in short society has once 
stamped as shameful, and that she should occa- 
sionally even prefer death itself to that which 
she regards as shame. 

Other moralists have carried the idea of the 
moral regulations as simple customs still farther 
and described them as simple conventional fash- 
ions, basing this on the phenomenon that every 
nation, nay, each class, has its own particular 
moral conceptions which often stand in absolute 
contradiction to each other, that consequently an 
absolute moral law has no validity. It has been 
concluded from that that morality is only a 
changing fashion, which only the thoughtless 
philistine crowd respect, but which the overman 
can and must raise himself above as things 
that appertain to the ordinary herd. 

But not only are the social instincts something 
absolutely not conventional, but something deeply 
grounded in human nature, the nature of man as 
a social animal; even the moral tenets are noth- 
ing arbitrary but arise from social needs. 

It is certainly not possible in every case to fix 
the connection between certain moral concep- 
tions and the social relations from which they 
arose. The individual takes moral precepts from 
his social surroundings without being aware of 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 179 

their social causes. The moral law becomes then 
habit to him, and appears to him as an emana- 
tion of his own spiritual being, given a priori 
to him, without any practical root. Only scien- 
tific investigation can gradually show up in a 
series of cases the relations between particular 
forms of society, and particular moral precepts, 
and then much remains dark. The social forms, 
from which moral principles arose which still 
hold good at a later period, often lie far back, in 
very primitive times. Besides that to under- 
stand a moral law, not only the social need must 
be understood which called it forth, but also the 
peculiar thought of the society which created it. 
Every method of production is connected not 
only with particular tools and particular social 
relations, but also with the particular content 
of knowledge, with particular powers of intelli- 
gence, a particular view of cause and effect, a 
particular logic, in short a particular form of 
thought. To understand earlier modes of 
thought is, however, uncommonly difficult, much 
more difficult than to understand the needs of 
another or his own society. 

All the same^ however, the connection between 
the tenets of morals and the social needs has 
been already proved by so many practical ex- 
amples, that we can accept it as a general rule. 
If, however, this connection exists then an alter- 



l8o ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

ation of society must necessitate an alteration in 
many moral precepts. Their change is thus not 
only nothing strange, it would be much more 
strange if with the change "of the cause the effect 
did not also change. These changes are neces- 
sary, for that very reason necessary because 
every form of society requires certain moral 
precepts suited to its condition. How diverse 
and changing are the moral rules is well known. 
Hence one example suffices to illustrate a mor- 
ality differing from the present day European. 

Fridtjof Nansen gives us in the tenth chapter 
of his " Esquimaux Life " a very fascinating 
picture of Esquimaux morals, from which I take 
a few passages. 

One of the most beautiful and marked features in the 
character of the Esquimo is certainly their honorable- 
ness. . . . For the Esquimo it has especial value 
that he should be able to rely on his fellows and neigh- 
bors. In order, however, that his mutual confidence, 
without which common action in the battle for life is 
impossible, should continue, it is necessary that he 
should act honorably to others as well. . . . For 
the same reasons they do not lie readily to each other, 
especially not the men. A touching proof of that is 
the following incident related by Dalager : " If they have 
to describe to each other anything, they are very careful 
not to paint it more beautiful than it deserves. Nay, 
if any one wants to buy anything which he has not seen, 
the seller describes the thing, however much he may 
wish to sell it, always as something less good than 
it is." 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY l8l 

The morals of advertising are unknown to the 
Esquimaux as yet. Certainly that applies to 
their intercourse with each other. To strangers 
they are less strict. 

" Fisticuff fights and that sort of ruffianism is not 
to be seen among them. Murder is also a great rarity 
and where it happens is not a consequence of economic 
quarrels but of love affairs." They consider it dread- 
ful to kill a fellovvman. War is hence quite incom- 
prehensible to them and abominable ; their language 
has not even a word for it, and soldiers and officers 
who have been trained to the calling of killing people 
are to them simply butchers of men. 

" Those of our commandments, against which the 
Greenlanders oftenest sin is the sixth. Virtue and 
chastity do not stand in great esteem in Greenland. 
Many look on it (on the west coast) as no great shame 
if an unmarried girl has children. While we were in 
Gothhael, two girls there were pregnant, but they in 
no way concealed it, and seemed from this evident 
proof that they were not looked down upon to be 
almost proud. But even of the east coast Holm says 
that it is there no shame if an unmarried girl has 
children." 

" Egede also says that the women look on it as 
an especial bit of luck and a great honor, to have 
intimate connection with an Angekok, that is, one of 
their Prophets, and v/ise men, and adds — even many 
men are very glad and will pay the Angekok for sleep- 
ing with their wives, especially if they themselves can- 
not have children by them. 

" The freedom of Esquimo Vvomen is thus very 
different to that appertaining to the Germanic women. 



1 82 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

The reason certainly lies in the fact that while the 
maintenance of the inheritance, of the race and family 
has always played a great role by the Germans, this 
has no importance for the Esquimos because he has 
nothing to inherit, and for him the rnain point is to 
have children . . . ." 

" We naturally look on this morality as bad. With 
that, however, is by no means said that it is so for 
the Esquimos. We must absolutely guard against con- 
demning from our standpoint views which have 
been developed through many generations and after 
long experience by a people, however much they con- 
tradict our own. The views of good and bad are 
namely extraordinarily different on this earth. As 
an example I might quote, that when this Egede 
had spoken to an Esquimo girl of love of God and' 
our neighbor, she said ' I have proved that I love my 
neighbor because an old woman who was ill and could 
not die, begged me that I would take her for a pay- 
ment to the steep cliff, from which those always are 
thrown who can no more live. But because I love my 
people, I took her there for nothing and threw her 
down from the rocks.' " 

" Egede thought that this was a bad act, and said 
that she had murdered a human being. She said no, 
she had had great sympathy with the old woman and 
had wept as she fell. Are we to call this a good or 
bad act?" 

We have seen that the necessity of killing old 
and sick members of society very easily arises 
with a limited food supply and this killing be- 
comes then signalized as a moral act. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 183 

"When the same Egede at another time said that 
God punished the wicked, an Esquimo said to him he 
also belonged to those who punished the wicked, since 
he had killed three old women who were witches. 

" The same difference in the conception of good and 
bad is to be seen in regard to the sixth commandment. 
The Esquimo puts the commandment : ' Be fruitful and 
multiply ' higher than chastity. He has every reason for 
that as his race is by nature less prolific." 

Finally a quotation from a letter sent by a 
converted Esquimaux to Paul Egede who 
worked in the middle of the i8th century in 
Greenland as a missionary and found the Esqui- 
maux morals almost untouched by European in- 
fluence. This Eskimo had heard of the colonial 
wars, between the EngHsh and Dutch and ex- 
presses his horror over this inhumanity. 

" If we have only so much food that we can satisfy 
our hunger and get enough skins to keep out the cold, 
we are contented, and thou thyself knowest that we let 
the next day look after itself. We would not on that 
account carry war on the sea, even if we could. . . . 
We can say the sea that washes our coasts belongs to 
us as well as the walruses, whales, seals and salmon 
swimming in it; yet we have no objection when others 
take what they require from the great supply, as they 
require it. We have the great luck not to be so greedy 
by nature as them. . . . It is really astonishing, my 
dear Paul ! Your people know that there is a God, the 
ruler and guider of all things, that after this life they 
will be either happy or damned, according as they have 



184 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

behaved themselves, and yet they live as though they 
had been ordered to be wicked, and as if sin would 
bring them advantage and honor. My countrymen 
know nothing either of God or Devil and yet they be- 
have respectably, deal kindly and as friends with each 
other, tell each other everything and create their means 
of subsistence in common. 

It is the opposition of the morality of a primi- 
tive communism to capitalist morality which ap- 
pears here. But still another distinction arises. 
In the Eskimo society the theory and practice of 
morality agree with one another; in cultivated 
society a division exists between the two. The 
reason for that we will soon learn. 

b. The System of Production and Its Super- 
structure. 

The moral rules alter with the society, yet 
not uninterruptedly and not in the same fashion 
and degree as the social needs. They become 
promptly recognized and felt as rules of conduct 
because they have become habit. Once they 
have taken root as such they can for a long time 
lead an independent life, while technical progress 
advances, and therewith the development of the 
method of production and the transformation of 
the social needs goes on. 

It is with the principles of morality as with 
the rest of the complicated sociological super- 
structure which raises itself on the method of 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 185 

production. It can break away from its founda- 
tion and lead an independent life for a time. 

The discovery of this fact has overjoyed all 
those elements who could not escape the influence 
of the Marxian thought, but to whom neverthe- 
less the consequences of the economic develop- 
ment are extremely awkward, who in the manner 
of Kant would like to smuggle in the spirit as an 
independent driving power in the development 
of the social organism. To these the discovery 
of the fact that the intellectual factors of society 
can temporarily work independently in it was 
very convenient. With that they hoped to have 
finally found the wished for reciprocal action — 
the economic factor works on the spirit and this 
on the economic factor, both were to rule the 
social development, either so that at one period 
the economic factor, at another again the spirit- 
ual force drives the society forwards, or in the 
manner that both together and side by side pro- 
duce a common result, that in other words our 
will and wishes can at least occasionally break 
through the hard economic necessity of their own 
strength and can change it. 

Undoubtedly there is a reciprocal action be- 
tween the economic basis and its spiritual super- 
struction — morality, religion, art, etc. We do 
not speak here of the intellectual influence of 
inventions ; that belongs to the technical con- 



l86 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

ditions, in which the spirit plays a part by the 
side of the tool ; technic is the conscious discov- 
ery and application of tools by thinking men. 

Like the other ideological factors morality can 
also advance the economic and social develop- 
ment. Just in this lies its social importance. 
Since certain social rules arise from certain social 
needs they will render the social co-operation so 
much the more easy, the better they are adapted 
to the society which creates them. 

Morality thus reacts on the social life. But 
that only holds good so long as it is dependent 
from the latter, as it meets the social needs from, 
which it sprang. 

So soon as morality begins to lead a life in- 
dependent of society, so soon as it is no longer 
controlled by the latter, the reaction takes on 
another character. The further it is now devel- 
oped the more is that development purely logical 
and formal. As soon as it is separated from the 
influence of the outer world it can no more cre- 
ate new conceptions, but only arrange the al- 
ready attained ones so that the contradictions 
disappear from them. Getting rid of the contra- 
dictions, winning a unitary conception, solving 
all problems which arise from the contradictions, 
that is the work of the thinking spirit. With 
that it can, however, only secure the intellectual 
superstructure already set up, not rise superior 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 187 

to itself. Only the appearance of new contra- 
dictions, new problems can affect a new develop- 
ment. The human spirit does not, however, cre- 
ate contradictions from out of its own inner be- 
ing; they are produced in it only by the impress 
of the surrounding world on it. 

So soon as the moral principles grow inde- 
pendent they cease to be in consequence, an ele- 
ment of social progress. They ossify, become 
a conservative element, an obstacle to progress. 
Thus something can happen in the human so- 
ciety that is impossible in the animal ; morality 
can becom.e instead of an indispensable social 
bond, the means of an intolerable restraint on 
social life. That is also a reciprocal action but 
not one in the sense of our anti-materialist mor- 
alists. 

The contradictions between distinct moral prin- 
ciples and distinct social needs can arrive at a 
certain height in primitive society; they then 
become, however, still deeper with the appear- 
ance of class antagonisms. If in the society 
without classes, the adherence to particular moral 
principles is only a matter of habit, it only re- 
quires for their supersedence that the force of 
habit be overcome. From now on the mainte- 
nance of particular moral principles becomes a 
matter of interest, often of a very powerful in- 
terest. And now appear also weapons of force, 



1 88 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

of physical compulsion, to keep down the ex- 
ploited classes, and this means of compulsion is 
placed also at the service of " morality," to se- 
cure obedience to moral principles which are in 
the interest of the ruling classes. 

The classless society needs no such compulsory 
weapons. Certainly even in it the social instincts 
do nof always suffice to achieve the observance 
by every individual of the moral code ; the 
strength of the social impulses is very different 
in the different individuals, and just as different 
that of the other instincts, those of self mainte- 
nance and reproduction. The first do not al- 
ways win the upper hand. But as a means of 
compulsion, of punishment, of warning, for 
others, public opinion of the society, suffices in 
such cases for the classless society. This does 
not create in us the moral law, the feeling of 
duty. Conscience works in us when no one sees 
us and the power of public opinion is entirely 
excluded; it can even under circumstances in a 
society filled with class antagonisms and contra- 
dictory moral codes force us to defy public opin- 
ion. 

But public opinion works in a classless society 
as a sufficient weapon of policy to secure the 
public obedience to moral codes. The individual 
is so weak compared to society, that he has not 
the strength to defy their unanimous voice. This 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 189 

has so crushing an effect, that it needs no further 
means of compulsion or punishment, to secure 
the undisturbed course of the social life. Even 
today in the class society we see that the public 
opinion of their own class or where that has 
been abandoned of the class or party which they 
form, is more powerful than the compulsory 
weapons of the state. Prison, poverty and death 
are preferred by people to shame. 

But the public opinion of one class does not 
work on the opposite class. Certainly society 
can, so long as there are no class antagonisms in 
it, hold the individual in check through the power 
of its opinion and force obedience to its laws, 
when the social instincts in the breast of the 
individual do not suffice. But public opinion 
fails where it is not the individual against society 
but class against class. Thus the ruling class 
must apply other weapons of compulsion if they 
are to prevail, means of superior physical or 
economic might, of superior organization, or 
even of superior intelligence. To the soldiers, 
police, and judges are joined the priests as an 
additional means of rule, and it is just the ec- 
clesiastical organization to whom the special task 
falls of conserving the traditional morality. This 
connection between religion and morality is 
achieved so much easier as the new religions 
which appear at the time of th^ decay of the 



190 ETHICS AND THE xMATERIALIST 

primitive communism and the gentile society, 
stand in strong opposition to the ancient nature 
religions, whose roots reach back to the old class- 
less period, and which know no special priest 
caste. In the old religions Divinity and Ethics 
are not joined together. The new religions on 
on the other hand grow on the soil of that philos- 
ophy in which Ethics and the belief in God are 
most intimately bound up together, the one fac- 
tor supporting the other. Since then religion 
and Ethic have been intimately bound together 
as a weapon of rule. Certainly the moral law 
is a product of the social nature of man ; cer- 
tainly the moral code of the time is the product 
of particular social needs; certainly have neither 
the one nor the other anything to do with re- 
ligion. But that kind of morals, which must be 
maintained for the people in the interests of the 
ruling class, that requires religion badly and the 
entire ecclesiastical organism for its support. 
Without this it would soon go to pieces. 

c. Old and New. 

The longer, however, the outlived moral 
standards remain in force, while the economic 
development advances and creates new social 
needs, which demand new moral standards, so 
much the greater will be the contradiction be- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY IQI 

tween the ruling morals of society and the life 
and action of its members. 

But this contradiction shows itself in the dif- 
ferent classes in different manners. The con- 
servative classes, those whose existence rests on 
the old social conditions, cling firmly to the old 
morality. But only in theory. In practice they 
cannot escape the influence of the new social 
conditions. The well known contradiction be- 
tween moral theory and practice begins here. 
It seems to many a natural law of morals; that 
its demands should be something desirable but 
unrealizable. The contradiction between theory 
and practice in morality can, however, here again 
take two forms. Classes and individuals full of 
a sense of their own strength ride roughshod 
over the demands of the traditional morality, 
whose necessity they certainly recognize for oth- 
ers. Classes and individuals which feel them- 
selves weak, transgress secretly against the moral 
codes, which they publicly preach. Thus this 
phase leads according to the historical reiteration 
of the decaying classes either to cynicism or 
hyprocrisy. At the same time, however, there 
disappears, as we have seen, very early in this 
very class the power of the social instincts in 
consequence of the growth of private interests, 
as well as the possibility of allowing their place 
in the coming battles to be taken by hirelings 



192 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

wherever they avoid entering personally into the 
fray. 

All that produces in conservative, or ruling 
classes, more phenomena which we sum up as 
immorality. 

Materialist moralists, to whom the moral 
codes are simple conventional fashions, deny the 
possibility of an immorality of that kind as a 
social phenomenon. As all morality is relative, 
that which is called immorality is simply a de- 
viating kind of morality. 

On the other hand idealist moralists conclude 
from the fact that there are entire immoral 
classes and societies that there must be a moral 
code eternal and independent of time and 
space ; a standard independent of the changing 
social conditions on which vre can measure the 
morals of every society and class. 

Unfortunately, however, it is that element of 
human morality which, if not independent of 
time and space is yet older than the chang- 
ing social relations, the social instinct, is just that 
which the human morality has in common with 
the animal. What, however, is specifically hu- 
man in morality, the moral codes, is subject to 
continual change. That does not prove all the 
same, that a class or a social group cannot be 
immoral, it proves simply that so far at least as 
the moral standards are concerned, there is just 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY IQ^ 

as little an absolute morality as an absolute im- 
morality. Even the immorality is in this respect 
a relative idea. Only the lack of mere social 
impulses and virtues, which man has inherited 
from the social animals, is to be regarded as 
absolute immorality. 

If we look on the other hand on immorality 
as an offence against the laws of morality, then 
it implies no longer the divergence from a dis- 
tinct standard, holding good for all times and 
places, but the contradiction of the moral prac- 
tice to its own moral principles, it implies the 
transgression against moral laws which peo- 
ple themselves recognize and put forward as 
necessary. It is thus nonsense to declare par- 
ticular moral principles of any people or class, 
which are recognized as such, to be immoral 
simply because they contradict our moral code. 
Immorality can never be more than a deviation 
from our own moral code, never from a strange 
one. The same phenomenon, say of free sexual 
intercourse or of indifference to property can in 
one case be the product of moral depravity, in a 
society where a strict monogamy and the sanctity 
of property are recognized as necessary ; in 
another case it can be the highly moral product 
of a healthy social organism which requires for 
its social needs neither property in a particular 



194 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

woman nor that in particular means of consump- 
tion and production. 

d. The Moral Ideal. 

If, however, the growing contradiction between 
the changing social conditions and the stagnating 
morality of the conservatives, that is, the ruling 
classes, tends to growing immorality and shows 
itself in an increase of hypocrisy and cynicism, 
which often goes hand in hand with a weakening 
of the social impulses, so does it lead to quite 
other results in the rising and exploited class. 
Their interests are in complete antagonism to 
the social foundation, which created the ruling 
morality. They have not the smallest reason to 
accept it, they have every ground to oppose it. 
The more conscious they become of their an- 
tagonism to the ruling social order, the more will 
their moral indignation grow as well, the more 
will they confront to the old traditional morality 
a new moral, which they are about to make the 
morality of society as a whole. Thus comes up 
in the uprising classes a moral ideal, which 
grows ever bolder, the more they win in strength. 
And at the same time, as we have already seen, 
the power of the social instincts in the same 
classes will be especially developed by means of 
the class struggle so that with the daring of the 
new moral ideal the enthusiasm for the same also 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY IQS 

increases. Thus the same evolution which pro- 
duces in conservative or down going classes in- 
creasing immorality produces in the rising classes 
a mass of phenomena which we sum up under 
the name of ethical idealism, which is not, how- 
ever, to be confused with the philosophical ideal- 
ism. The very uprising classes are indeed often 
inclined to philosophical materialism which the 
declining class oppose from the moment when 
they become conscious that reality has spoken the 
sentence of death over them and feel that they 
can only look for salvation from supernatural 
powers divine or ethical. 

The content of the new moral ideal is not 
always very clear. It does not emerge from any 
scientific knowledge of the social organism, which 
is often quite unknown to the authors of the 
ideal, but from a deep social need, a burning 
desire, an energetic will for something other than 
the existing, for something which is the opposite 
of the existing. And thus also this moral ideal 
is fundamentally only something purely negative, 
nothing more than opposition to the existing 
hypocrisy. 

So long as class rule has existed, the ruling 
morality has guarded wherever a sharp class an- 
tagonism has been formed, slavery, inequality, 
exploitation. And thus the moral ideal of the 
uprising classes in historical times has always had 



196 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

the same appearance, always that which the 
French Revolution summed up with the words, 
Freedom, Equality, and Fraternity. It would 
seem as if this was the ideal implanted in every 
human breast independent of time and space, as 
if this were the task of the human race to strive 
from its beginning for the same moral ideal, as 
if the evolution of man consisted in the gradual 
approach to this ideal which continually looms 
before them. 

But if we examine more closely, we find that 
the agreement of the moral ideal of the various 
historical epochs is only a very superficial one 
and that behind there lie great differences of so- 
cial aims, which correspond to the differences of 
the social situation at the time. 

If we compare Christianity, the French Revo- 
lution, the Social Democracy today we find that 
Liberty and Equality for all meant something 
quite different according to their attitude to- 
wards property and production. The primitive 
Christians demanded equality of property in the 
manner that they asked for its equal division for 
purpose of consumption by all. And under Free- 
dom they understood the emancipation from all 
work as is the lot of the toilers of the field who 
neither toil nor spin and yet enjoy their life. 

The French Revolution again understood by 
equality, the equality of property rights. Pri- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 197 

vate property it declared to be sacred. And true 
freedom was for it the freedom to apply prop- 
erty in economic life, according to pleasure in 
the most profitable manner. 

Finally the Social Democracy neither swears 
by private property nor does it demand its di- 
vision. It demands its socialization, and the 
equality which it strives for is the equal rights 
of all in the products of social labor. 

Again the social freedom which it asks for is 
neither freedom to dispose arbitrarily of the 
means of production and to produce at will, but 
the limitation of the necessary labor through the 
gathering in of those capable of working and 
through the most extended application of labor- 
saving machinery and methods. In this way the 
necessary labor which cannot be free but must 
be socially regulated can be reduced to a mini- 
mum for all and to all a sufficient time assured 
of freedom, for free artistic and scientific activ- 
ity, for free enjoyment of Hfe. Social freedom 
— we do not speak here of political — through 
the greatest possible shortening of the period of 
necessary labor : that is freedom as meant by the 
social democracy. 

It will be seen that the same moral ideal of 
Freedom and Equality can embrace very differ- 
ent social ideals. The external agreement of the 
moral ideals of different tim.es and countries is, 



198 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

however, not the result of a moral law independ- 
ent of time and space, which springs up in man 
from a supernatural world, but only the conse- 
quence of the fact that despite all social differ- 
ences the main outlines of class rule in human 
society have always been the same. 

All the same a new moral ideal cannot simply 
arise from the class antagonism. Even within 
the conservative classes there may be individuals 
who develop with their class socially only loose 
ties and no class consciousness. With that, how^- 
ever, they possess strong social instincts and 
virtues, which makes them hate all hypocrisy and 
cynicism, and they dispose of a great intelli- 
gence which shows them clearly the contradic- 
tion between the traditional moral code and the 
social needs. Such individuals are bound also 
to come to the point of lifting up the new moral 
ideal. But whether this new ideal shall obtain 
social force, depends upon whether they result in 
class ideals or not. Only the motive power of 
the class struggle can work fruitfully on the 
moral ideal. Because only the class struggle and 
not the single handed endeavors of self interested 
people possesses the strength to develop society 
farther and to meet the needs of the higher de- 
veloped method of production. And so far as 
the moral ideal can in any degree be realized it 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY I99 

can be attained only through an alteration of 
society. 

A peculiar fatality has ruled hitherto that the 
moral ideal should never be reached. That will 
be easily understood when we consider its origin. 
The moral ideal is nothing else than the complex 
of wishes and endeavors which are called forth 
by the opposition to the existing state of affairs. 
As the motor power of the class struggle is a 
means to collect the forces of the uprising classes 
to the struggle against the existing and to spur 
them on, it is a powerful lever in the overturning 
of this existing. But the new social conditions, 
which come in the place of the old, do not depend 
on the form of the moral ideal but from the given 
material conditions, the technical conditions, the 
natural milieu, the nature of the neighbors and 
predecessors of the existing society, etc. 

A new society can thus easily diverge a con- 
siderable way from the moral idea of those who 
brought it about, so much the more the less the 
moral indignation was allied with knowledge of 
the material conditions. And thus the ideal ended 
continually with a disillusionment ; proving itself 
to be an illusion after it had done its historical 
duty and had worked as an impulse in the de- 
struction of the old. 

We have seen above how in the conservative 
classes the opposition between moral theory and 



200 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

practice arises^ so that morality appears to them 
as that which everybody demands but nobody 
practices, something which is beyond our 
strength, what it is only given to supernatural 
powers to carry out. Here we see in the revolu- 
tionary classes a different kind of antagonism 
arise between moral theory and practice ; the an- 
tagonism between the moral ideal and the reality 
created by the social revolution. Here again 
morality appears as something w^hich everybody 
strives for but nobody obtains — as in fact the 
unattainable for earthly beings. No wonder that 
then the moralists think that morality has a su- 
pernatural origin and that our animal being 
which clings to the earth is responsible for the 
fact that we can only gaze wistfully at its picture 
from afar without being able to arrive at it. 

From this heavenly height morality is drawn 
down to earth by the historical materialism. We 
make acquaintance with its animal origin and 
see how its changes in human society are condi- 
tioned by the changes which this has gone 
through, driven on by the development of the 
technic. And the moral ideal is revealed in its 
purely negative character as opposition to the 
existing moral order, and its importance is recog- 
nized as the motor power of the class struggle as 
a means to collect and inspire the forces of 
the revolutionary classes. At the same time. 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 201 

however, the moral ideal will be deprived of its 
power to direct our policy. Not from our 
moral ideal, but from distinct material conditions 
does the policy depend which the social devel- 
opment takes. These material conditions have 
already at earlier periods to a certain extent de- 
termined the moral will, the social aims of the 
uprising classes, but for the most part uncon- 
sciously. Or if a conscious directing social 
knowledge was already to hand, as in the i8th 
century, it worked all the same unsystematically 
and not consistently at the formation of the social 
aims. 

It was the materialist conception of history 
which has first completely deposed the moral 
ideal as the directing factor of the social evolu- 
tion, and has taught us to deduce our social aims 
solely from the knowledge of the material 
foundations. And with that it has shown for 
the first time the way through which it can be 
avoided, that the revolutionary reality should 
not come up to the social ideal, how illusions and 
disappointments are to be avoided. Whether 
they can be really avoided depends upon the de- 
gree of the insight acquired into the laws of de- 
velopment and of the movements of the social 
organism, its forces and organs. 

With that the moral ideal will not be deprived 
of its influence in society ; this influence will sini' 



202 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

ply be reduced to its proper dimensions. Like the 
social and the moral instinct, the moral ideal is 
not an aim but a force or a weapon in the social 
struggle for life; the moral ideal is a special 
weapon for the peculiar circumstances of the class 
war. 

Even the Social Democracy as an organization 
of the Proletariat in its class struggle cannot do 
without the moral ideal, the moral indignation 
against exploitation and class rule. But this 
ideal has nothing to find in scientific sociaHsm, 
which is the scientific examination of the laws 
of the development and movement of the social 
organism, for the purpose of knowing the neces- 
sary tendencies and aims of the proletariat class 
struggle. 

Certainly in Socialism the student is always a 
fighter as well, and no man can artificially 
cut himself in two parts, of which the one has 
nothing to do with the other. Thus even with 
Marx occasionally in his scientific research there 
breaks through the influence of a moral ideal. 
But he always endeavors and rightly to banish 
it where he can. Because the moral ideal be- 
comes a source of error in science, when it takes 
it on itself to point out to it its aims. Science 
has only to do with the recognition of the neces- 
sary. It can certainly arrive at prescribing a 
shall, but this dare only come up as a conse- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 203 

quence of the insight into the necessary. It must 
dechne to discover a " shall " which is not to be 
recognized as a necessity founded in the world 
of phenomena. The Ethic must always be only 
an object of science ; this has to study the moral 
instincts as well as the moral ideals and explain 
them ; it cannot take advice from them as to 
the results at which it is to arrive. Science 
stands above Ethics, its results are just as little 
moral or immoral as necessity is moral or im- 
moral. 

All the same even in the winning and mak- 
ing known scientific knowledge morality is not 
got rid of. New scientific knowledge implies 
often the upsetting of traditional and deeply 
rooted conceptions which had grown to a fixed 
habit. In societies which include class antagon- 
isms, new scientific knowledge, especially that of 
social conditions, implies in addition, how- 
ever, damage to the interests of particular classes. 
To discover and propagate scientific knowledge 
which is incompatible with the interests of the 
ruling classes, is to declare war on them. It 
assumes not simply a high degree of intelligence, 
but also ability and willingness to fight as well as 
independence from the ruling classes, and before 
all a strong moral feeling : strong social instincts, 
a ruthless striving for knowledge and to spread 



204 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

the truth with a warm desire to help the oppressed 
uprising classes. 

But even this last wish has a misleading tend- 
ency if it does not play a simple negative part, 
as repudiation of the claims of the ruling con- 
ceptions to validity, and as a spur to overcoming 
the obstacles which the opposing class interests 
bring against the social development but aspires 
to rise above that and to take the direction lay- 
ing down certain aims which have to be attained 
through Social Study. 

Even though the conscious aim of the class 
struggle in Scientific Sociahsm has been trans- 
formed from a moral into an economic aim it 
loses none of its greatness. Since what appeared 
to all social innovaters hitherto as a moral ideal, 
and what could not be attained by them, for this 
the economic conditions are at length given, 
that ideal we can now recognize for the first 
time in the history of the world as a necessary 
result of the economic development, viz. : the 
abolition of class. Not the abolition of all pro- 
fessional distinctions. Not the abolition of divis- 
ion of labor, but certainly the abolition of all so- 
cial distinctions and antagonisms which arise 
from the private property in the means of produc- 
tion and from the exclusive chaining down of the 
«3:iass of the people in the function of material 
production. The means of production have be- 



CONCEPTION OF HISTORY 205 

come so enormous, that they burst today the 
frame of private property. The productivity of 
labor is grown so huge that today already a con- 
siderable diminution of the labor time is possi- 
ble for all workers. These grow the founda- 
tions for the abolition not of the division of 
labour, not of the professions, but for the an- 
tagonism of rich and poor, exploiters and ex- 
ploited, ignorant and wise. 

At the same time, however, the division of 
labor is so far developed as to embrace that ter- 
ritory which remained so many thousands of 
years closed to it, the family hearth. The wom- 
an is freed from it and drawn into the realm 
of division of labor, so long a monopoly of the 
men. With that naturally the natural distinctions 
do not disappear which exist between the sexes; 
it can also allow many social distinctions, as well 
as many a distinction in the moral demands 
which are made to them to continue to 
exist or even revive such, but it will certainly 
make all those distinctions disappear from state 
and society which arise out of the fact that the 
woman is tied down to the private household 
duties and excluded from the callings of the 
divided labor. In this sense we shall see not 
simply the abolition of the exploitation of one 
class by another, but the abolition of the sub- 
jection of woman by man. 



206 ETHICS AND THE MATERIALIST 

And at the same time world commerce attains 
such dimensions, the international economic re- 
lations become so close that therewith the founda- 
tion is laid for superseding private property in 
the means of production, the overcoming of na- 
tional antagonisms, the end of war, and arma- 
ments, and for the probability of permanent peace 
between the nations. 

Where is such a moral ideal which opens such 
splendid vistas? And yet they are won from 
sober economic considerations and not from 
intoxication through the moral ideals of free- 
dom, equality and fraternity, justice, humanity! 

And these outlooks are no mere expectations 
of conditions which only ought to come, which 
we simply wish and will, but outlooks at con- 
ditions which must come, which are necessary. 
Certainly not necessary in the fatalist sense, that 
a higher power will present them to us of itself, 
but necessary, unavoidable in the sense, that the 
inventors improve technic and the capitalists in 
their desire for profit revolutionize the whole 
economic life, as it is also inevitable that the 
workers aim for shorter hours of labor and higher 
wages, that they organize themselves, that they 
fight the capitalist class and its state, as it is 
inevitable that they aim for the conquest of po- 
litical power and the overthrow of capitalist rule. 
Socialism is inevitable because the class struggle 
and the victory of the proletariat is inevitable. 



>K 



